Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



'■\ 



i ' 



THE MYSTERY OP 
THE KINGDOM OF GOD 



THE MYSTERY OF 
THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

THE SECRET OF 
JESUS' MESSIAHSHIP AND PASSION 



BY 

ALBERT SCHWEITZER 

Anthor of "The Quest of the Historical Jesus" 



SKnutatnt wUk an hitroduetlon bg 

WALTER LOWRIE 



^ «^ " -J - 






NEW YORK 
DODD, MEAD AND COMPANY 

1914 



THE NEW YORK 

PUBLIC LIBRARY 

679265 

A«7ca. LtNOX AMt 
T>4.DEN FOUNDAT'ONI, 



COFTSIGBT. 1914 

BT DODD HEAD & COMPANY 



• •• 

•• a 



• • • 
..." - 






• . . • - • 

• • • • 



. • 






DEDICATED 
WITH SINCERE RESPECT 
AND DEVOTION 
TO 

DR. H. J. HOLTZMANN 

BY 
HIS GRATEFUL PUPIL 
ALBERT SCHWEITZER 

J -- ' "• i 

- - -^ • ", - ^ ^ ' ' -^ \' 

«• J * *. . • •• 









I* » 



PREFACE 

Thb attempt to write a life of JesnSi com- 
mencing not at the beginning but in the mid- 
dle, with the thought of the Passion, must of 
necessity sometime be made. Strange that it 
has not been made earlier, for it is in the air I 

The fact is that all presentations of the 
life of Jesus are satisfactory up to a certain 
point, — ^the inception of the thought of the 
Passion. There, however, the connection 
fails. Not one of them succeeds in rendering 
intelligible why Jesus now suddenly counts 
his death necessary, and in what sense he con- 
ceives it as a saving act. In order to estab- 
Ush this connection one must try the experi- 
ment of making the thought of the Passion 
the point of departure, for the sake of ren- 
dering the former and latter periods of the 
life of Jesus comprehensible. If we do not 
understand the idea of the Passion, may not 
that be due to the fact that we have formed 
an erroneous notion of the first period of the 
life of Jesus and so have precluded for our- 
selves in advance all possibility of attaining 
insight into the genesis of the Passion idea? 

The last years of research have revealed on 

3 



PREFACE 

what slight grounds our historical conception 
of the life of Jesus really rests. It cannot 
be concealed that we are confronted by a diffi- 
cult antinomy. Either Jesus really took him- 
self to be the Messiah, or (as a new tendency 
of the study now seems to suggest) this dig- 
nity was first ascribed to him by the early 
Church. In either case the **Life of Jesus'' 
remains equally enigmatical. 

If Jesus really regarded himself as Mes- 
siah, how comes it that he acted as if he were 
not Messiah! How is it to be explained that 
his office and dignity seem to have nothing 
to do with his public activity! How are we 
to account for the fact that only after his pub- 
Uc activity was ended (not to reckon the last 
few days at Jerusalem) did he disclose to his 
Disciples who he was, and at the same time 
enjoined upon them strict silence with regard 
to this secret? It explains nothing to sug- 
gest that such conduct was prescribed by mo- 
tives of prudence or by pedagogical consid- 
erations. In the Synoptical accounts where 
is there even the slightest hint that Jesus 
wished to educate the Disciples and the peo- 
ple up to a knowledge of his messiahship t 

The more one thinks about it the more 
clearly one recognises how little the assump- 
tion that Jesus took himself to be the Messiah 

4 



1.'' 



I 

< 

\ 



PREFACE 

suffices to explain his ^^life," inasmuch as no 
connection whatever results between his self- 
conscionsness and his public activity. It may 
sound banal to ask the question, but it is one 
which cannot on that account be avoided, why 
Jesus never tried through instruction to raise 
the people up to the new ethical conception of 
messiahship. The attempt would not have 
been so hopeless as one commonly assumes, 
for at that time there was a deep spiritual 
movement going on in Israel. Why did Jesus 
maintain persistent silence about his concep- 
tion of messiahshipt 

On the other hftnd, if one assumes that he 
did not take himself to be the Messiah, it 
must be explained how he came to be made 
Messiah after his death. Certainly it was 
not on the ground of his public activity, for 
this had nothing to do with his messiahship. 
But then again, what was the significance of 
the revelation of the secret of his messiahship 
to the Twelve and the confession before the 
high-priest t It is a mere act of violence to 
declare these scenes unhistorical. If one re- 
solves upon such aggression, what is there 
then left of the whole Gospel tradition! 

And withal one should not forget, that if 
Jesus did not take himself to be the Messiah, 
this means the death blow to the Christian 

6 



/ 



PREFACE 

faith. The judgment of the early Church is 
not binding upon us. The Christian religion 
is founded upon the messianic consciousness 
of Jesus, whereby he himself in a signal man- 
ner sharply distinguished his own person 
from the rank of other preachers of religious 
morality. If now he did not take himself to 
be the Messiah, then the whole of Christianity 
rests — to use honestly a much perverted and 
abused word — ^upon a ** value judgment 
formed by the adherents of Jesus of Nazareth 
after his death I 

Let us not forget that we are dealing here 
with an antinomy from which only one con- 
clusion can be drawn, namely, that what has 
hitherto been accounted the **historicaP' con- 
ception of the messianic consciousness of 
Jesus is false, because it does not explain the 
history. Only that conception is historical 
which makes it intelligible how Jesus could 
take himself to be the Messiah without finding 
himself obliged to make this consciousness of 
his tell as a factor in his public ministry for 
the Kingdom of God, — rather, how he was ac- 
tually compelled to make the messianic dig- 
nity of his person a secret I Why was his 
messiahship a secret of Jesus t To explain 
this means to understand his life. 

This new conception of the life of Jesus has 

6 



PREFACE 

grown out of a perception of the nature of 
this antinomy. How far it is capable of solv- 
ing the problem may be determined by the re- 
sult of further discussion. I publish this new 
view as a sketch, since it belongs of necessity 
within the frame of this work on the Lord's 
Supper. I hope, however, from the criticism 
of its general lines to reach greater clearness 
with regard to many exegetical details before 
I can think of giving these thoughts definitive 
shape in an elaborated **life of Jesus.'' 

I have generally been able only to suggest 
the Uterary foundation, as comports with the 
sketchy character of this presentation. Any 
one, however, who is thoroughly familiar with 
this subject will readily perceive that behind 
many an assertion here made there lurks more 
detailed study of Synoptic texts than appears 
at the first glance. 

For the Synoptic question especially, the 
new conception of the life of Jesus is of great 
importance. From this point of view the 
composition of the Synoptists appears much 
simpler and clearer. The artificial redaction 
with which scholars have felt themselves com- 
pelled to operate is very much reduced. The 
Sermon on the Mount, the commission to the 
Twelve, and the eulogy of the Baptist are not 
** composite speeches," but were for the most 

7 



PREFACE 

part delivered as they have been handed down 
to us. Also the form of the prophecy of the 
Passion and the Resurrection is not to be 
ascribed to the early Church, but Jesus did 
actually speak to his Disciples in these words 
about his future. This very simplification of 
the literary problem and the fact that the 
credibility of the Gospel tradition is thereby 
enhanced is of great weight for the new inter- 
pretation of the life of Jesus. 

This simplification rests, however, not upon 
a naive attitude towards the Gospel accounts, 
but is brought about by insight into the laws 
whereby the early Christian conception and 
estimate of the person of Jesus conditioned 
the representation of his life and work. Here 
is a question which hitherto has not been 
treated perhaps systematically enough. 

On the one hand it is indeed certain that 
the early Church had a significant influence 
upon the representation of the public activity 
of Jesus. But on the other hand we have 
again in the very nature of the early Christian 
faith justification for the presumption that 
the Church did not alter the main lines of the 
account, and above all that it did not * * fabri- 
cate facts'' in the life of Jesus. For in fact 
the early Church maintained an attitude of 
indifference towards the life of Jesus as such ! 

8 



PREFACE 

The early Christian faith had not the least 
interest in this earthly life, because the mes- 
siahship of Jesus was grounded upon his res- 
urrection, not upon his earthly ministry, and 
the disciples looking forward expectantly to 
the coming of the Messiah in glory were in- 
terested in the earthly life of Jesus of Naza- 
reth only in so far as it served to illustrate 
his sayings. There was absolutely no such 
thing as an early Christian conception of the 
life of Jesus, and the Synoptic Gospels con- 
tain nothing of the sort. They string to- 
gether the narratives of the events of his pub- 
lic ministry without trying to make them in- 
telligible in their sequence and connection, or 
to enable us to perceive the * * development' ^ of 
Jesus. Then in the course of time, as the 
eschatological expectation waned, as the em- 
phasis upon the earthly appearing of Jesus 
as the Messiah began to preponderate, and 
thus led to a particular view (a theory) of the 
life of Jesus, the accounts of his public min- 
istry had already assumed so fixed a form 
that they could not be affected by this process. 
The Fourth Gospel furnishes a historical pic- 
ture of the lif e.of Jesus, but it stands in much 
the same relation to the Synoptic account of 
the public ministry of Jesus as does Chron- 
icles to the books of Samuel and Kings. The 

9 



PREFACE 

difference between the Fourth Gospel and the 
Synoptics consists precisely in the fact that 
the former furnishes a **life of Jesus'* 
whereas the Synoptics give an account of his 
public ministry. 

The faith of the early Church influenced 
by immanent laws the mode in which the pub- 
lic ministry of Jesus was represented, just as 
the Deuteronoroic reform affected men's con- 
ception of the course of events during the 
period of the Judges and the Ejngs. It was ^ 
a case of inevitable and unconscious shifting 
of the perspective. The new view here pre- 
sented takes due account of this shifting of the 
perspective, and from this reckoning it re- 
sults that the influence which the belief of the 
early Christian community exerted upon the 
Synoptical accounts does not go nearly so 
deep as we have hitherto been inclined to sup- 
I)ose. 

StrasBburg> August^ 1001, / 



10 



TABLE OP CONTENTS 

PAOI 

Author's Preface 3 

Translators' Introduction • . . .17 

CHAPTER I 

THE HODEBN ''HISTORICAL" SOLUTIOIf 

1. Summary account of it .60 

2. The four assumptions upon which it is based ... 63 

3. The two contrasted periods (first assumption) . . 64 

4. The influence of the Pauline theory of the atone- 

ment upon the formulation of the Synoptical 
prediction of the Passion (second assumption) . 70 

5. The Kingdom of God as an ethical entity in the 

Passion Idea (third assumption) 73 

6. The form of the Prediction of the Passion (fourth 

assumption) 80 

7. E^um6 81 

CHAPTER II 

THE ''development" OF JESUS 

1. The Kingdom of Grod as an ethical and as an eschato- 

logical fact 84 

2. The eschatological character of the charge to the 

Twelve 87 

3. The new view 92 

CHAPTER ni 

THE FBEACHINO OF THE KINGDOH OF GOD 

1. The new morality as repentance 04 

2. The ethics of Jesus and modem ethics .... 99 

CHAPTER rV 

THE SECBET OF THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

1. The parables of the secret of the Kingdom of God . 106 

2. The secret of the Kingdom of Grod in the address to 

the people after the mission of the Twelve . .110 



TABLE OF CONTENTS 

PAca 

3. The secret of the Kingdom of God in the light of the 

Prophetic and Jewish expectation . . . . .112 

4. The secret of the Kingdom of God and the assumption 

of a fortunate Galilean period 115 

5. The secret of the Kingdom of God and the universal- 

ism of Jesus 117 

d. The secret of the Kingdom of God and Jesus' attitude 

towards the Law and the State 110 

7. The modem element of Jesus' eschatology . . . 120 

CHAPTER V 

The secret of the Kingdom of God In the thought of the 
Passion 124 

CHAPTER VI 

THB CHASACTEB ASCBIBED TO JESUS ON. THE GBOUND OF HIS 

PUBLIC MINISTRY 

1. The problem and the facts 127 

2. Jesus as Elijah through his solidarity with the Son 

of Man 135 

3. Jesus as Elijah through the signs which proceed from 

Him 130 

4. The victory over demons and the secret of the King- 

dom of God 143 

6. Jesus and the Baptist 145 

6. The Baptist and Jesus 147 

7. The blind man at Jericho and the ovation at the 

entrance of Jesus to Jerusalem 166 

CHAPTER VII 

AFTEB THE MISSION OF THE TWELVE UTEBABY AND HISTOBICAL 

PBOBLEMS 

1. The voyage on the lake after the return of the 

Twelve 164 

2. The supper by the seashore 168 

3. The week at Bethsaida 174 

CHAPTER Vm 

THE SECRET OF MESSIAHSHIP 

1. From the Mount of Transfiguration to Ceesarea 

Philippi 18a 

2. The futuristic character of Jesus' Messiahship . 185 



TABLE OF CONTENTS 

PAcn 

3. The Son of Man and the futuristic character of Jesus' 

Messiahship 190 

4. The resurreetion of the dead and the futuristic char- 

acter of Jesus' Messiahship 201 

6. The betrayal by Judas — ^the last disclosure of the 

secret of Messiahship 214 

CHAPTER rX 

THE SECBBT OF THE PASSION 

1. The pre-messianic affliction 219 

2. The Idea of the Passion in the first period . . . 223 

3. The ''Temptation" and the divine omnipotence . . 226 

4. The idea of the Passion in the second period . . 230 

5. Isaiah 40-66: the secret of the Passion foretold in 

the Scripture 236 

6. The "human" element in the secret of the Passion . 240 

7. The idea of the Passion in the primitive Church. 

The shifting of the perspective 242 

CHAPTER X 

Summary of the Life of Jesus 253 

Postscript ... . •: • • !• ..J :•: >• .. . . 274 



THE MYSTERY OF 
THE KINGDOM OF GOD 



AN INTRODUCTION 

BT THE TBANSLA.IOB 

1. An Account of Schweitzer's Work and its 
Reception. 

The work wMch is here translated was pub- 
lished in 1901 as the second part of a treatise 
entitled Das AbendmaM. The full title 
reads: The Lord's Supper in connection 
with the Life of Jesus and the History of 
Early Christianity. This second part was is- 
sued separately and bore also the following 
sub-title: Das Messianitdts umd Leidensge- 
heimnis. Fine Skizze des Lehens Jesu. 

It implies no disparagement of Schweitz- 
er's novel and important study of the Lord's 
Supper that this second part is here sepa- 
rated from the first and published by itself in 
English, This part is really independent. 
It has moreover a much broader scope and 
appeals to a far wider interest than does 
the treatise as a whole. There is reason to 
fear that, appearing as a part of a study of 
the Lord's Supper and under that title, it 
might be ignored by many of the persons who 
most would desire to read it. The scant at- 

17 



INTRODUCTION 

tention accorded at first to Schweitzer's work 
in Germany may be ascribed in part to that 
very cause, and there appears to be no other 
reason to account for the fact that the 
** Sketch '^ has not yet been publicly noticed 
in England or America, so far as the trans- 
lator is aware. 

It will not be denied, even by those who 
are least inclined to agree with the views of 
the Author, that this first work of the young 
Strassburg student did not deserve the obliv- 
ion which seemed to threaten it for some 
years after its appearance. It is manifest 
now that Schweitzer's theory, to say the least 
of it, must be reckoned with by every one who 
would seriously study the Gospels or the Life 
of Jesus. Obviously it was not the weakness 
of the book, but rather its strong originality, 
and in particular the trenchant way in which 
it demolished the ** liberal life of Jesus,'' 
which accounts for the passive hostility with 
which it was greeted. In fact it contained 
more than could be readily digested at once 
either by a liberal or a conservative mind. 
Most of the New Testament students in Ger- 
many had collaborated in the fabrication of 
the ** liberal life of Jesus" and they could not 
patiently endure to see their work destroyed. 
Those among us who fancy that Gerftaan pro- 

18 



INTRODUCTION 

fessors are bloodless beings who live in an at- 
mosphere purified of passion and prejudice, 
need to be informed that on the contrary they 
are human, all too human. The animosities* 
of party and school and the jealousies of the 
cathedra have been proverbial for genera- 
tions. The reception accorded to Schweitz- 
er's work does not seem creditable. It was 
met by something like a conspiracy of silence. 
Schweitzer, however, compelled attention 
by the publication in 1906 of a much larger 
work entitled, "Fow Reimarus zu Wrede/' 
which is a history of the study of the life of 
Jesus during the last century. A work like 
this, practically the only one of its sort, sup- 
plied a felt need and could not be passed by 
without notice. Schweitzer's own view, how- 
ever, though it was presented clearly in this 
volume, was still not taken due account of 
in Germany. Julicher's supercilious criti- 
cism in '^Neue Linien" (190 — ) is character- 
istic of the treatment it received. The trans- 
lator knows of no prominent scholar in Ger- 
many who has cordially welcomed Schweitz- 
er's view, nor of any that has thoroughly and 
ably opposed it. ^They have been occupied 
there rather with Wrede 's ^ acute criticism 
of the messianic element in. the Gospels and 

iDaa Messiasgeheimnis in den Evangelien, 1901. 

19 



INTRODUCTION 

with the denial by Drews ^ and others of the 
historical existence of Jesus. To destructive 
criticism of this sort Schweitzer's own work 
is the best answer. The only work which 
seriously reckons with this new point of view 
is a brief but magisterial book by H. J. Holtz- 
mann : Dds messianische Bewusstsein Jesu. 
1907- 

Very different was the reception of 
Schweitzer's latter work in England. The 
interest there centred at once upon Schweitz- 
er's own view. In 1907, the year after its 
publication, Professor Sanday delivered a 
course of lectures at Oxford and Cambridge 
in which he enthusiastically accepted 
Schweitzer's position with hardly a reserva- 
tion.^ In 1910 this second work of Schweitz- 
er's was translated into English and pub- 
lished under the title: The Quest of the 
Historical Jesus, with a preface by Professor 
Burkitt. By this time the interest in 
Schweitzer and his theory had become a fu- 
rore among the younger men in Oxford and 
Cambridge. But just then there came an 
emissary from Germany, Professor Ernst von 
Dobschiitz, who essayed to disprove Schweitz- 
er's theory in a course of lectures delivered at 

2 ChHstuamythe. 

» The Life of Christ in Recent Research, 1907. 

go 



INTRODUCTION 

Oxford in 1909.* Whereupon Professor San- 
day, in a pathetic article in the Hibbert Jour- 
nal for October, 1911, retracted his support 
of Schweitzer's position. He felt that he had 
been over hasty in adopting it. And so in- 
deed it seems he was, for it appears that in 
preparing his lectures he had not taken the 
pains to read the ** Sketch,'* that is to say, 
Schweitzer's first and fundamental and most 
carefully reasoned argument for his view. 
By the same token Canon Sanday seems to 
have been over hasty in making his retrac- 
tion, for he had not yet read the ** Sketch," 
— and von Dobschiitz' criticism after all is 
not very impressive. 

In America the whole question has been 
simply ignored. It generally takes, in fact, 
about a decade for an important foreign work 
to reach us,— except in the case of a very few 
scholars who have already gained our ear. 
According to this reckoning it is time the 
** Sketch" were translated. In view both of 
the acceptance which Schweitzer's theory has 
met with in England and of the opposition 
made to it there, it is high time that his most 
cogent and careful statement of his position 
be made known. For although Schweitzer's 
position is restated in his latter work already 

^Eaohatology of the OospeU, 1910, 

21 



INTRODUCTION 

translated into English, and is there also il- 
luminated from various sides, particularly in 
its relation to Wrede 's work — ^which appeared 
in the same year as the ** Sketch '* and is so 
strikingly like it so far as its criticism goes 
and so different in its result, — ^yet it cannot 
be adequately appreciated without a study 
of the earlier work. 

It is known that Albert Schweitzer [has; 
for some time been preparing to go as 
medical missionary to the Congo. But 
in spite of his medical studies he has re- 
cently found time to publish a brilliant 
*' History of Pauline Study since the Ee- 
formation.*'*^ This is in a way a con- 
tinuation of the history of the study of the 
life of Jesus. Here again Schweitzer has a 
view of his own: in all the complexity of 
Paul *s thought he perceives a unity which is 
due to the pervading eschatological outlook. 
Fortunately, this view of his own, instead of 
being appended to the historical study, as in 
the former book, is to be published separately 
under the title: Die Mysti^des Apostels 
Paulus. This practical measure will insure 
that it shall not be overlooked. It is to be 
hoped too that it will not have to wait long 
for an English translation. 

^Qeschichte der pauUnischen Forschungi 1911, 

2g 



INTRODUCTION 

Professor Schweitzer found time also to 
prepare a new and much enlarged edition 
of his Geschichte der Lehen-Jesvr-Forschung 
(History of the Study of the Life of Jesus), 
which is the title by which he now more 
aptly describes his well known work. He 
has brought this history down to date, and 
in the short concluding chapter he suggests 
a number of pregnant reflections which will 
later be referred to in this introduction with 
the aim of conciliating this archaeological 
world of Jesus' thought with our religious 
estimate of his person. It must be recog- 
nised from the outset that time is necessary 
for such an adjustment. The perception of 
the eschatological character of the Gospels 
is a sudden emergency : we have not yet had 
time to assimilate it. 

At this writing Professor Schweitzer is 
already at work as medical missionary in 
Africa. It is of interest to know that his 
plan is to return after three years to Eu- 
rope, and again after an equal period, to 
Africa. On account of the radical charac- 
ter of his critical works he was not accepted 
as a fellow-worker in any of the German 
missions and is labouring in conjunction 
with (though independently and at his own 
expense) the station of the Paris Evangeli- 



INTRODUCTION 

cal Missionary Society at Lambarene in 
French Equatorial Africa^ — ^the country 
which used to be called the French Congo. 
*^ Schweitzer as Missionary*' is the title of 
an article in the Hibbert Journal for July 
1914 based upon the printed circular letters 
which he sends to his friends and support- 
ers. In a letter to the translator he speaks 
of his efforts to mitigate the scourge of 
leprosy and the sleeping sickness as an ex- 
ample of ** practical eschatology. * ' 

2. The Significance of Schweitzer's Work. 

The opportuneness of Schweitzer's eschato- 
logical interpretation of the life of Jesus ap- 
pears the more manifest the more one knows 
of the recent history of Gospel study. To 
bring that out clearly is the special purpose 
of the Author in his, Quest of the Historical 
Jesus, particularly in chapters I, XIX, and 
XX. It could not be done better. At all 
events such a task is obviously beyond the 
scope of this introduction. Here it need 
only be pointed out that Schweitzer's theory, 
striking as it is, did not spring into being 
without roots in a soil prepared for it. The 
eschatological question itself had been sharply 
brought to the fore. Contention for and 
against the recognition of it as an important 



INTRODUCTION 

element in the Gospels was the order of the 
day. All that tended to concentrate attention 
npon the problem of the personal conscious- 
ness of Jesus (as, in particular, Baldensperg- 
er's work),® was a direct preparation for 
Schweitzer. Johannes Weiss had already 
stood out as the foremost champion of 
eschatology in the Gospel.'^ His recognition 
of eschatology was confined, however, to the 
teaching of Jesus. Hence he did not avail 
himself of it for the solution of the historical 
problems. For this reason he cannot be re- 
garded as an exponent — ^to use Schweitzer's 
phrase— of ** thoroughgoing eschatology*' 
(konsequente Eschatologie). But the solu- 
tion Schweitzer proposed was already **in the 
air,** as he said himself in his preface. That 
presentiment was strikingly fulfilled in the 
fact that in the selfsame year Wrede pub- 
lished a book with a title almost identical, 
which envisaged the same problems in the 
same way, only that it sought to solve them 
by eliminating eschatology as an intrusion in 
the historical narrative, thus resulting in 
* thoroughgoing scepticism.** Schweitzer is 
justified in insisting that his work and 

« Das Selhsthewusataein Jesu, 1st ed., 1888. 
f Die Predigt Jeau vom Reiche Oottea, 2d ed., 1900; also 
Das alteste EvangeUum, 1903. 



INTRODUCTION 

Wrede's cannot be played off against each 
other, but constitute a combined attack, 
so far as concerns the criticism of the com- 
mon, liberal life of Jesus. 

There is nothing audacious in Schwieitzer's 
proclamation of the collapse of the liberal life 
of Jesus. He does not claim to have de- 
stroyed it, he merely attests the fact of its 
collapse. **The Jesus of Nazareth who ap- 
peared as the Messiah, proclaimed the moral- 
ity of the kingdom of God, established the 
kingdom of b^.yen upon earth, and died in 
order to cons^ci4t6 his work, — ^this Jesus 
never existed. It is a' figri^e sketched by Ea- 
tionalism, enlivened by Liberalism, and 
dressed up by Modem Theology in the clothes 
of historical science. * * ® This fabric did not 
fall by reason of the strength of any attack 
from without, but collapsed through its in- 
herent weakness, ** shattered and cloven by 
the actual historical problems which one after 
another emerged and would not down in spite 
of all the cunning, art, artifice, and force'* 
which was expended upon this picture of 
Jesus during the last hundred years. In 
spite of the protestation that this picture still 
stands undemolished, no one can be found 
any more to write a liberal life of Jesus. On 

8 Quest of the Historical Jesus, cap. XX. 

^6 



INTRODUCTION 

the other hand sceptical works have multiplied 
so rapidly that it would be difficult to enu- 
merate them here. After Kalthoff® and 
Drews *® the designation of ** thoroughgoing 
scepticism '* can hardly be applied to Wrede's 
theory. All the books of this class owe what 
appearance of strength they have, not to their 
inherent worth, but to the weakness of the 
theory which opposes them — ^the current lib- 
eral life of Jesus. Solely with a view to 
maintaining the integrity of this picture it 
has been found necessary from time to time 
to sacrifice so much of the documentary evi- 
dence — the Synoptic Gospels or their sources 
— ^upon which the history of Jesus reposes, 
that in the end it seems not very unreasonable 
for Drews and others to assume, from the ad- 
missions of their opponents, that there is no 
convincing historical evidence for the exist- 
ence of Jesus, and that the real task of the 
scholar is to show how such a figure was 
invented. 

**It is extraordinary, '' says Schweitzer in 
the last chapter of the new edition of his 
History of th^ife of Jesus .^tudy, **how it 
has fared with the study of the life of 
Jesus. It set out to find the historical 

9 Das ChriatuS'Prollem^ 1902. 

10 Op. cit. 

27 



INTRODUCTION 

Jesns, and fancied that when he was fonnd 
he could be set, just as he is, in the 
midst of our age as Teacher and Saviour. 
It loosed the bands which fettered him 
to the rock of ecclesiastical dogma, and 
rejoiced when life and movement returned to 
the figure and the historical man Jesus was 
seen approaching. He did not stay, however, 
but passed our age by and returned again to 
his own. That is what astonished and 
alarmed the theology of the last decades, — 
that by no violence of misinterpretation could 
they succeed in keeping him in our age, but 
had to let him go. He returned to his own 
age with the same necessity that the freed 
pendulum swings back to its original posi- 
tion. 

**The historical foundation of Christian- 
ity, as rationalism, liberalism, and modem 
theology count it, exists no longer, — which, 
however, is not to say that Christianity has 
therefore lost its historical foundation. The 
work which historical theology believed it 
must carry out, and which it sees falling to 
pieces at the very moment when the com- 
pletion was near, is only the terra cotta veneer 
of the true, indestructible, historical founda- 
tion, which is independent of any historical 

28 



INTRODUCTION 

knowledge and proof — simply because it is 
there, it exists. 

** Jesus is something to our world because 
a mighty stream of spiritual influence has 
gone forth from him and has penetrated our 
age also. This fact will be neither shaken 
nor confirmed by an historical knowledge. 

* * One fancied he could be more to our time 
by the fact that he entered it vitally as a man 
of our humanity. That, however, is not pos- 
sible. For one reason, because this Jesus 
never so existed. Also, because historical 
knowledge, though it can clarify spiritual life 
already existing, can never awaken life. It 
is able to reconcile the present with the past; 
to a certain degree it can transport the 
present into the past; but to construct the 
present is not within its power. 

**One cannot estimate highly enough what 
the study of the life of Jesus has accom- 
plished. It is a great and unique demon- 
stration of veracity and love of the truth, — 
one of the most significant occurrences in the 
whole spiritual life of mankind. What the 
modem-liberal and the popularising investi- 
gation has done, in spite of all its errors, for 
the present and for the coming state of re- 
ligion can only be measured when one takes 

S9 



INTRODUCTION 

into oomparison the Boman Catholic — or 
more broadly the Latin — culture and litera- 
ture which has been touched little or not at 
all by the influence of these spirits, 

**And yet the disillusion had to come. We 
modem theologians are too proud of our his- 
torical learning, too proud of our historical 
Jesus, too confident in our faith in what oup 
historical theology can spiritually contribute 
to the world. The notion that by historical 
knowledge we can construct a new and vigor- 
ous Christianity and let loose spiritual forces 
in the world dominates us like a fixed idea 
and does not permit us to perceive that all 
we have done thereby is to assail, not the 
great religious problem itself, but one of the 
problems of general culture which is en- 
trenched in front of it, and which we would 
solve as well as we can. We thought that 
we had to lead our age as it were through a 
by-path, through the historical Jesus, — ^in 
order that it might come to Jesus who is 
present spiritual power. The by-path is now 
barred by real history. 

**We were in danger of putting ourselves 
between men and the Gospels and not leaving 
the individual any longer alone with the say- 
ings of Jesus. 

**We were in danger, too, of presenting to 

30 



INTRODUCTION 

fhem a Jesns that was too little, because wd 
had forced him into man's measure and into 
the mould of average human psychology. 
Bead through the * lives of Jesus' since the 
sixties and behold what they have made of 
the imperial words of our Lord, what a weak 
and ambiguous sense they have put upon 
his peremptory, other-worldly requisitions, 
in order that he might not clash with our 
ideals of civilisation and his other-worldli- 
ness might be brought to terms with our this- 
worldliness. Many of his greatest words one 
finds lying in a comer, a heap of discharged 
spring-bolts. We make Jesus speak with our 
time another language than that which passed 
his lips. 

** Thereby we ourselves became impotent 
and deprived our own thoughts of their 
proper energy by transposing them into his- 
tory and making them si>eak to us out of 
antiquity. It is nothing less than a tragedy 
for modem theology that it confounds with 
history everything it attempts to expound, 
and is actually proud of the virtuosity with 
which it contrives to discover its own 
thoughts in the past. 

** Therefore there is hopeful significance in 
the fact that modern theology with its study 
of the life of Jesus, however long it may re- 

31 



INTRODUCTION 

sist by the invention of fresh shifts and ex- 
pedients, must in the end find itself deluded 
in its manufactured history, overcome by real 
history and by the facts — ^which according to 
Wrede^s fine saying are often more radical 
than theories. 

**What is the historical Jesus to us when 
we keep him clear of any admixture of the 
present with the past! We have. the im- 
mediate impression that his person, in spite 
of all that is strange and enigmatical, has 
something great to say to all ages, as long as 
the world endures, may views and knowledge 
change never so much, and that it means 
therefore to our religion also a far-reaching 
enrichment. It behooves us to bring this ele- 
mentary feeling to a clear expression, so that 
it may not soar away in dogmatic assertions 
and phrases and beguile historical science 
ever anew into the hopeless undertaking of 
modernising Jesus by diluting or explaining 
away what is historically conditioned in his 
preaching, as though he would become more 
to us thereby. 

* * The whole study of the life of Jesus has 
in fine only the one aim, of establishing the 
natural and unbiased conception of the earli- 
est accounts. In order to know Jesus and to 
apprehend him there is need of no prepara- 

S2 



INTRODUCTION 

tory erudition. It is also not requisite that 
a man comprehend the details of Jesus' pub- 
Uc ministiy and be able to construct with 
them a *life of Jesus.' His nature, and 
that which he is and wills, appears in cer- 
tain lapidary expressions of his and forces 
itself upon us. One knows him without 
knowing much about him, and apprehends 
the eschatological note even if he attain no 
clear conception of the details. For this is 
the characteristic thing about Jesus, that he 
looks beyond the perfection and blessedness 
of the individual to the perfection and 
blessedness of the world and of an elect hu- 
manity. His will and his hope is fixed upon 
the Kingdom of God.'' 

It is much to be wondered at that conserva- 
tive scholars have not generally recognised 
the strong constructive consequences of 
Schweitzer's theory, — ^in particular the proof 
it incidentally affords of the historical worth 
of the Synoptic Gospels. Schweitzer rehabil- 
itates the credit of S. Mark's Gospel simply 
by showing that no important parts of it 
need be discarded on the ground that they are 
inconsistent with the sketch which he draws 
of the history of Jesus. When it is objected 
to him that he bases his view upon **the weak- 
est passages," it is time we make clear to 

33 



INTRODUCTION 

ourselves that ** strong" and * Veak" in this 
connection mean no more than consistent or 
inconsistent with the assumptions of the mod- 
em ** liberal life of Jesus." It is only a 
roundabout way of begging the question, 
generally speaking, such a document as Mark, 
antecedent to any theory we may attempt to 
apply, must be presumed to be of pretty equal 
value throughout. That theory which, with- 
out artifice or violence, best accords with 
the greatest number of facts recorded, and so 
best preserves the credit of the documents 
upon which it seeks to found itself, is presum- 
ably the right theory. Schweitzer's view, as 
he himself says in the Preface, greatly simpli- 
fies and clarifies the Synoptic problem. It is 
no longer necessary to attribute so much to 
*Hhe editor's hand." The Sermon on the 
Mount, the Charge to the Twelve, and the 
Eulogy over the Baptist are not collections of 
scattered sayings, but were in the main de- 
livered as they have come down to us. Es- 
pecially important is the recognition that 
even for constructing the history of Jesus 
Mark by itself does not suffice : the discourses 
in Matthew are invaluable indications. 

Nor is this the only positive and comfort- 
ing element in Schweitzer's view. In the 
Postscript he has himself laid stress upon the 

34 



INTRODUCTION 

aim of his work : * ^ to impress upon the modem 
age and upon modem theology the figure of 
Jesus in its overwhehning heroic greatness. ' ' 
And this he has accomplished in unexpected 
ways. The figure of Jesus which we have 
striven so hard to bring into nearness and 
sympathy through our psychological analysis 
has eluded our grasp, and under the hands 
of the historian and archaeologist it has re- 
ceded inexorably into the remote past and 
into a comer of Galilee. It looks to us 
strange and even petty in its remote Galilean 
surroundings. Now that figure, by the force 
of an elemental energy, is seen to break the 
shackles which would bind it to a particular 
time and place and become— not modem, in- 
deed, but — ^universal. 

One may easily be so much absorbed witH 
the difficulties in the way of accepting 
Schweitzer's construction as to ignore the 
light which it sheds upon some of the major 
difficulties of the traditional view with which 
we have long wrestled in vain. One may 
mention at least eight obscure points which 
are illuminated for the first time by the 
eschatological view of the Gospel history. 
1. Jesus' use of the title **Son of Man,'' — 
commonly in the third i>erson and with a 
futuristic sense, as denoting a dignity and 

86 



INTRODUCTION 

power which were not yet his. Jesus was 
the Messiah designate. 2. The position of 
John the Baptist: it was Jesns alone that 
discovered in him the character of Elijah. 
''the Coming One'' (cf. Jn 1:21). 3. The 
conception of the Kingdom of God as a gift, 
to be received passively as by a little child 
— and yet as a thing that ** violent men'' 
must wrest to themselves **by force." 4. 
The relation of Jesus' messianic expecta- 
tion to that which was current among the 
people. Jesus moralised the popular es- 
chatological ideal by combining it with the 
preaching of the Prophets. That Jesus op- 
posed a purely moral ideal to a popular po- 
litical agitation is doubly a fiction. 5. The 
significance of the Mission of the Twelve and 
its connection with the popular excitement 
which drew five thousand men into the desert 
by the seashore. 6. The significance of the 
Transfiguration, coming before the Confes- 
sion of Peter, and explaining how the knowl- 
edge of Jesus ' Messiahship was given by 
divine revelation. 7. The character of the 
secret which Judas possessed and was in a 
position to betray. Our notion that during 
the last days in Jerusalem every one knew 
of Jesus' claim to be the Christ is plainly 
contrary to the record. The famous dis- 

36 



INTRODUCTION 

putes of those days would have taken a very 
different form if the question which agitated 
all minds was, Is he the Christ! or is he not! 
8. Jesus' notion of the necessity of his 
death, his resolution to die at Jerusalem, 
and his conception that he was giving his 
life as **a ransom for many.'' 

Unquestionably it is no easy matter to as- 
similate so novel and striking a view as that 
of Schweitzer. To bring it into relation with 
the presuppositions of our religious view in 
general involves demolition and reconstruc- 
tion — a labor heavy and grievous to the soul. 
The mind instinctively recoils from such a 
labour and is fain to protect itself by a gen- 
eral repudiation and denial. Moreover the 
Author has presented his view with a naked 
simplicity which, while it renders it easier to 
understand and more diflScult to confute, 
makes it also, one must confess, more difficult 
to accept. We are not inclined to accept 
opinions in the face of a display of forcey 
and as it were at the muzzle of a gun — even 
when the gun is loaded with logic. Practi- 
cally we must first contrive to see how the 
opinions may be made acceptable. This task 
the Author has not unreasonably left to us, — 
although a careful study of his work will re?- 
veal many suggestions helpful to this end. 

S7 



INTRODUCTION 

The translator has read this little book not 
onoe but many times and through a course 
of yeaxs, with ever increasing appreciation 
of its worth — ^not only in view of its logical 
force but of its acceptability. On the other 
hand, many of us have felt that the liberal 
life of Jesus was becoming increasingly more 
tmacceptahle. 

Canon Sanday confesses " that he recoils 
from Schweitzer's view chiefly on account of 
his ** tendency to push things to extremes at 
the dictates of logical consistency/' It is 
too * Hhoroughgoing. ' ' It seems indeed as 
though the Author were inclined to press this 
word to an extreme, proposing to explain all 
the words and acts of Jesus with reference to 
his eschatological outlook. But that is only 
a threat. What he has done falls very far 
short of it, and it is upon that we have to 
pass judgment. That, in fact, is ** thorough- 
going'' enough to justify the term even if it 
went no further. The principle of * thor- 
ough" might very well apply to the con- 
struction of the history as a whole without 
implying that every trait of Jesus' life and 
teaching was coloured by it and that he him- 
self was so obsessed by a single idea that 
he was unable to see things as they are. 

11 Hihhert Journal, Oct., 1911, p. 84. 

38 



INTRODUCTION 

.This is precisely what the Gospels do not 
permit us to believe. It is manifest that 
Jesus had a peculiarly acute sensibility to 
his surroundings, whether it were nature 
or human society, and responded feelingly, 
spontaneously. His sense of right and 
wrong was so clearly intuitive that he could 
deal sovereignly with the Law. Schweit- 
zer himself furnishes suggestions which 
tend to render even the word **Inter- 
imsethik ' ' acceptable. Jesus ' moral teaching 
was oriented towards the coming Kingdom. 
It was ** penance'' in preparation for the 
Kingdom of God. But it was not for all this 
an arbitrary penance: like the ethics of the 
Prophets it was the prescription of righteous- 
ness. In one sense at least, it was not of 
merely transitory importance. From the ex- 
pectation of the approaching Kingdom it re^ 
oeived a sharpness of emphasis which it could 
not otherwise have had, — ^but it was a true 
emphasis. It described the conduct appro- 
priate to man in this present world so long 
as this world shall last — a conduct which is 
justified here by the expectation of a better 
world to come, * * beyond good and evil'' if you 
will. 

*' Thoroughgoing eschatology" is surely not 
incompatible with the recognition of a deeper 

39 



INTRODUCTION 

intuition in Jesus which is necessary to ex- 
plain the intensity of this very eschatology 
itself. It would be a rigorous extreme in- 
deed which would exclude the recognition of 
Jesus' God-consciousness — ^his consciousness 
of God as Father — as the primary and all- 
controlling fact of his religious experience. 
Nothing is more obvious than that out of that 
consciousness he acted and spoke immedi- 
ately. And when his acts were influenced 
and his speech coloured by the eschatological 
outlook, what was that ultimately but the 
consciousness of God's nearness? How 
could the expectation of a divine world be so 
constant and so vivid without the feeling that 
it is in a sense locally near, imminent, im- 
pending, ready to break in, indeed actually 
intruding upon this present world, as it were 
* * the finger of God' ' touching us here ? Intu- 
itional feeling, presentiment, insight, does not 
readily distinguish between nearness in time 
and in space. Jesus' eschatology was an ex- 
pression of his God-consciousness — the most 
eminent expression of it. 

Eschatology in the strict sense, with all its 
apocalyptic features, has long ago passed out 
of our view of the world. Schweitzer shows 
us with what justification the Church dis- 
carded it. But the feeling that was behind 

40 



INTRODUCTION 

it remains, and still constitutes the funda- 
mental experience of religion. It is the feel- 
ing of a divine environment, close to us, un- 
speakably close, imminent, intruding even 
upon the every-day world. 

"This is the finger of God, 
The flash of the wiU that can. 
Existent behind aU laws. 
That made them, and lo! they are.'' 

Intuitional feeling is not especially in- 
clined to express the sense of God in terms of 
time. Space is the category more familiar to 
it. Wordsworth finds terms to express what 
is so intangible. 

''Those obstinate questionings 

Of sense and outward things. 

Fallings from us, vanishings; 

Blank misgivings of a creature 
Moving about in worlds not realised 
High instincts, before which our mortal nature 
Bid tremble like a guilty thing surprised." 

Apocalyptic eschatology no one could even 
wish to revive. But this does not mean that 
Biblical eschatology — ^the expectation of the 
great Event — ^must be dissolved in the mod- 
ern hope of the gradual amelioration of the 
world in the course of historical evolution. 
We cannot but feel how great a breach that 
would constitute between our thought and the 

41 



INTRODUCTION 

mind of Jesus. Schweitzer remarks upon the 
heavy dose of "resignation'' which such a 
view implies. Strange that we do not more 
often realise this 1 Does our optimism blind 
us to the fact that we shall not partake in 
*Hhe far off divine event'' — except our spirit 
survive the bodily death ? There — ^in the hope 
of life beyond death — ^is the expectation which 
we substitute for apocalyptic eschatology, 
— ^a substitution so natural that it came 
about without observation. S. Paul lived 
in the expectation of the coming of the 
Lord, but he evidently felt no sense of 
incongruity when he expressed the feel- 
ing that **to depart and be with Christ 
is very far better"— he was referring to the 
natural death of the body and the hope of 
life ioamediately beyond it. "this is the hope 
which has ever since characterised the Chris- 
tian Church. To dwell upon that hope, to set 
our ** affections upon things above, where 
Christ is, seated at the right hand of God" — 
that is ** heavenly mindedness." With re- 
spect to the feeling at the base of it, it is not 
so very different from apocalyptical escha- 
tology. In this view Christian ethics still re- 
mains ** conditional" — ^you may call it Inter- 
imsethik if you like. The conduct it requires 
of us is conditioned by the hope of a future 



INTRODUCTION 

life and is absurd under any other supposi- 
tion. **The practicie of the presence of Otod^^ 
is the most fundamentally important reli- 
gious exercise. But if we succeed in per- 
suading ourselves that here and now we have 
the only kingdom of God we shall ever know ; 
if all our interest and effort is absorbed in 
realising a kingdom of God upon earth ; then 
not only have we need of "resignation,'' but 
we cannot avoid feeling the breach between 
our thought and activity and that of Jesus. 
We are puzzled to distinguish between 
worldly and heavenly mindedness because 
even our religious interest is f ocussed upon 
this earth, as the sphere not only of our 
moral duty but of our ultimate hope — ^the 
gradual evolution of a perfect human society. 
That is what we have made of the Kingdom 
of God, interpreting it uneschatologically.. 
Is not this after all a more credulous hope 
than that which expects a divine interven- 
tion, a ** regeneration'' of heaven and earth, 
jrhich shall prepare the fit abode for the per- 
fect society? And does it not strike at the 
very roots of the religious sentiment when we 
distract the mind from its natural interest 
and curiosity about the Beyond? Our per- 
sonal fate is not so much involved in the far 
off amelioration of human society as in some- 

43 



INTRODUCTION 

thing much, nearer, very near and imminent, 
the estate just beyond death. It is not alto- 
gether without reason that in Christian dog- 
matics the name of eschatology has been ap- 
plied to this topic. The earlier type of 
eschatology Jesus himself has rendered for- 
evermore impossible. It is likely that the 
first objection we feel to apocalyptic escha- 
tology lies in the fact that it was expressed in 
terms of an erroneous cosmology and is there- 
fore incompatible with our modem view of 
the world. But as a matter of fact apocalyp- 
tic eschatology vanished from the vital creed 
of the Church long before the cosmology 
upon which it was founded was proved to be 
false. It was Jesus who brought it to an 
end. Another sort of eschatology promptly 
took its place — another heavenly hope, which 
was substajitially not apocalyptic. Yet this 
doctrine too— the early Christian notion of 
the soul and of heaven — ^was necessarily 
founded upon the opinions of ancient science; 
The doctrine of the soul and the doctrine of 
heaven, being less directly affected by the 
findings of modem science, have been more 
slow to change in conformity with our 
changed view of the world than has, for exr- 
ample, the doctrine of creation. But in their 
old form they are none the less incompatible 

44 



INTRODUCTION 

with our modem thought ; and for this reason 
we feel forced to put everi/ sort of eschatol- 
ogy aside, we are no longer able to place the 
heavenly hope, and the heavenly mindedness 
which it prompts, in the central position 
which belongs to them. That is to say, we 
urgently need to express the Christian doc- 
trine of the soul in terms of the highest mod- 
em psychology and to express our heavenly 
hope in terms of a modem cosmology. We 
need a new cosmology! That may seem to 
express an unpractical and fantastic desire. 
But it will not so seem to any one who knows 
what his theory of the soul and his grandiose 
cosmology meant practically and religiously 
to Gustav Theodor Fechner,^^ qj. ^j^q has ex- 
perienced what this may mean for the ori- 
entation of his own personal religion. The 
old view of the world has passed away: we 
have been too slothful and cowardly to take 
full possession of the new. There is really 
nothing in the modem view of the world 
which effectually precludes us from directing 
our hope and orienting our life towards the 
Beyond, as did Jesus in his way, and as the 
early Church did in its way. From the mo- 
ment that Jesus passed into the invisible and 
was there felt and recognised as the corre- 

12 Vide The Living Word by Elwood Worcester, 1908. 

46 



INTRODUCTION 

spondent of our religions facility we find that 
special terms better express the substance 
of onr heavenly mindedness than do temporal. 
We **seek the things that are above, where 
Christ is, seated on the right hand of God'' 
To recognise that our ** citizenship is in 
heaven'' is not to render ourselves inept for 
the performance of our duty upon earth. 
Bather it needs to be reflected whether, with- 
out the detachment, without the superiority 
to earthly circumstance, happy or untoward, 
which comes from setting our *'mind on the 
things that are above," we possess any ful- 
crum for doing a real work upon the world. 

The eschatological interpretation of the 
Gospels does not thrust Jesus so far from us 
as we are prone to think: rather calls us to 
approach nearer to him, to share again more 
closely * * the mind which was in Christ Jesus ' ' 
and which in one form or another has been at 
all times the chief inspiration of the Church. 

In his ** Concluding Eeflections" Schweit- 
zer says: ** Every full view of life, cosmic 
philosophy, Weltanschauung (the German 
word it is impossible to translate) con- 
tains side by side elements which are con- 
ditioned by the age as well as others which 
are unconditioned, for it consists in the very 
fact that a penetrating will has pervaded and 

46 



INTRODUCTION 

oonstitnted the conceptual material fnmislied 
it by history. This latter is subjected to 
change. Hence there is no Weltanschauung, 
however great and profound it may be, which 
does not contain perishable material. But 
the will itself is timeless. It reveals the un- 
searchable and primary nature of a person 
and determines also the final and fundamental 
definition of his Weltanschauung. May the 
conceptual material alter never so much, with 
consequent diversity between the new Wel- 
tanschauung and the old, yet these in reality 
only lie just so far apart as the wills which 
constitute them diverge in direction. The 
differences which are determined by the al- 
teration of the conceptual material are in the 
last analysis merely secondary in importance, 
however emphatically they may make them- 
selves felt; for the same will, however dif- 
ferent be the conceptual material in which it 
manifests itself, always creates Weltan- 
schauungen which in their nature correspond 
with one another and coincide. 

^* Since the time when man attained the 
conditions precedent to such an apprehension 
and judgment of things as we might call in 
our sense a Weltanschauung — that is, since 
the' individual learned to take into considera- 
tion the totality of being, the world as a 

47 



INTRODUCTION 

whole, and to reflect as a knowing and willing 
subject upon the reciprocal relations of a pas- 
sive and active sort which subsist between 
himself and the All — ^no f ar-reaishing develop- 
ment has really occurred in the spiritual life 
of humanity. The problems of the Greeks 
turn up again in the most modem philosophy. 
The scepticism of to-day is essentially the 
same as that which came to expression in an- 
cient thought. 

* * The primitive, late- Jewish metaphysic in 
which Jesus expressed his Weltanschammg 
aggravates exceedingly the difficulty of trans- 
lating his ideas into the formulas of our time. 
The task is quite impossible so long as one 
tries to accomplish it by distinguishing in de- 
tail between the permanent and the transi- 
tory. And what results as the consequence 
of this procedure is so lacking in force and 
conclusiveness that the enrichment it con- 
tributes to our religion is rather apparent 
than real. 

**In truth there can be no question of mak- 
ing distinction between transitory and per- 
manent, but only of transposing the original 
constitutive thought of that Weltanschauung 
into terms familiar to us. How would the 
Will of Jesus — apprehended in its immedi- 
ateness, in its definiteness and in its whole 

48 



INTRODUCTION 

compass — ^how would it vitalise our thought 
material and construct from it a Weltan- 
schauung of so moral and so mighty a sort 
that it could be counted the modem equiva- 
lent of that which he created in terms of the 
late- Jewish metaphysics and eschatology? 

'*If one tries, as has been done hitherto al- 
most invariably, to reconcile Jesus ^ Weltan- 
schawwng with ours any way it will go— 
which can be accomplished only by paring 
away all that is characteristic — this proced- 
ure strikes also at the will which is mani- 
fested in these conceptions. 

**It loses its originality and is no longer 
able to exert an elemental influence upon us. 
Hence it is that the Jesus of modem theology 
is so extraordinarily lifeless. Left in his 
eschatological world he is greater and, for all 
the strangeness, he affects us more elemen- 
tally, more mightily than the modem Jesus. 

** Jesus ^ deed consists in the fact that hi& 
original and profound moral nature took pos- 
session of the late-Jewish eschatology and so- 
gives expression, in the thought material 
of the age, to the hope and the will which are 
intent upon the ethical consummation of the 
world. All attempts to avert one^s vision 
from this Weltanschauung as a whole and to 
make Jesus' significance for us to consist in 

49 



INTRODUCTION 

his revelation of the '^ fatherhood of God/' 
the ** brotherhood of man,'' and so forth, must 
therefore of necessity lead to a narrow and 
peculiarly insipid conception of his religion. 
In reality he is an authority for us, not in the 
sphere of knowledge, but only in the matter 
\of the will. His destined role can only con^ 
fiist in this, that he is a mighty spirit, quickens 
the motives of willing and hoping which we 
and our f ellowmen bear within us and brings 
them to such a height of intensity and clarity 
as we could not have attained if we were left 
to ourselves and did not stand under the 
impression of his personality, and that he 
thus conforms our Weltanschauung to his 
own in its very nature, in spite of all the di- 
versity of thought material, and awakens 
in it the energies which are active in his. 

*^The last and deepest knowledge of things 
comes from the will. Hence the movement 
of thought which strives to frame the final 
synthesis of observations and knowledge in 
order to construct a Weltanschauung is de- 
termined in its direction by the will, which 
constitutes the primary and the inexplicable 
ultimate essence of the persons and ages in 
question. 

**If our age and our religion have not ap- 
prehended the greatness of Jesus and have 

50 



INTRODUCTION 

been frightened back by the eschatological col- 
our of his thought, this was due only in part 
to the fact that they could not acconunodate 
themselves to the strangeness of it alL The 
decisive reason was another. They lacked the 
strong and clear stamp of a will and a hope 
directed towards the moral consummation of 
the world, which are decisive for Jesus and 
for his Weltanschammg. They were devoid 
of eschatology, — ^using the word here in its 
broadest and most general sense. They found 
in themselves no equivalents for the thoughts 
of Jesus, and were therefore not in a posi- 
tion to transpose his Weltanschammg from 
the late-Jewish terms of thought into their 
own. 

^ * There was no answering chord of sympar 
thy. Hence the historical Jesus had to re- 
main strange to them to a very great extent, 
and that not only with respect to his thought 
material but also with respect to his very 
nature. His ethical enthusiasm and the im- 
mediateness and might which characterised 
his thought seems to them excessive because 
they know nothing that corresponds to it in 
their own thought and experience. So they 
were constantly intent upon making out of 
the ^'enthusiast'' a modem man and the- 
ologian duly observant of metes and bounds 

51 



INTRODUCTION 

in all his doings. Conservative theology, like 
the older orthodoxy to which it is akin, was 
not able to do anything with the historical 
Jesus, because it likewise makes far too little 
of the great moral ideas which in his escha- 
tology were struggling for life and practical 
expression. 

**It was therefore the lack of an inward 
tuning to the same pitch of will and hope and 
desire which made it impossible to attain a 
real knowledge of the historical Jesus and a- 
comprehensive religious relationship with 
him. Between him and a generation which 
was lacking in all immediateness and in 
all enthusiasm directed towards the final 
aims of humanity and of being, there could 
be no lively and far-reaching fellowship. 
For all its progress in historical perception 
it really remained more estranged from him 
than was the rationalism of the eighteenth 
and the beginning of the nineteenth century, 
which was brought closer to him by its en- 
thusiastic faith in the possibility of rapid 
progress towards the moral perfection of hu- 
manity. ^ ^ 

I marvel that Schweitzer in his ** Con- 
cluding Eeflections^' can dwell so insist- 
ently upon one side of Jesus^ eschatology 
and ignore so completely the othen Jesus* 

5& 



INTRODUCTION 

eschatology, the white light of his conception 
of the Kingdom of God, has come to us 
through the medium of history refracted in 
two rays of different colour and of different 
direction. One represents more specifically 
the other-worldly side of Jesus ^ preaching, 
the hope of eternal blessedness beyond 
death,— which the dogmatic theologians are 
pleased to call **eschatology,'^ as though our 
modem idea really reflected Jesus' concep- 
tion in its totality. Commonly this is what 
we understand by the * ' Kingdom of Heaven, ' ' 
To denominate tiie other ray, Schweitzer has 
appropriated (with as questionable a right) 
the ** Kingdom of God/' He means to indi- 
cate by this simply the moral development of 
humanity, here and under present terrestrial 
conditions. We readily understand what he 
means, because that is what we mean com- 
monly by *'the kingdom of God upon earth/' 
We are convinced that the progress of man- 
kind in true worldly culture and civilisation 
constitutes a high moral aim which we dare 
not relinquish; but we have all experienced 
the difficulty of reconciling this secular en- 
thusiasm with the other-worldliness of JesHs. 
Schweitzer helps us in a measure to surmount 
this difficulty. He also makes it in a measure 
clear to us how (for the fact itself was 

53 



INTRODUCTION 

patent) this enthusiasm for the progress of 
humanity has been reinforced by Jesus* 
preaching. But it is a mistake to expect of 
this one coloured ray that it can ever give 
back to us the whole white light of Jesus* in- 
spiration. We can not return again to Jesus ' 
conception. History stands in the way — real 
history, not written narrative. Nor shall we 
ever be able to combine again in one white 
light the ** broken lights** which have come to 
us from his teaching. But we have the two 
rays, and in their separateness they are both 
familiar to us. Our eyes bear better the 
coloured light. Celestial blue denotes the 
heavenly hope ; red will do for this earth and 
our passionate hopes for its betterment. But 
why behave as if we had only one colour and 
all of Jesus' light must be forced into that? 
Schweitzer ignores the heavenly hope (the 
thought of life beyond death) as though it 
were no longer open to the modem man. One 
may get a notion of what it still may mean to 
the modem scientific mind from Gustav Theo- 
dor Fechner*s BiicMein vom Leben nach dem 
Tode, or more largely from his Zend-Avesta, 
or his Tagesansicht. Though to be sure it 
can mean nothing to one who is bound by a 
materialistic philosophy. At all events it is 
certain that Jesus * will and aspiration can be 

54 



INTRODUCTION 

much more readily and fully expressed in 
these terms than in the terms of ethical and 
social progress here below. To translate his 
thought into these terms requires no elab- 
orate effort The first generation of his dis- 
ciples did it without knowing what they did. 
Schweitzer himself observes in Miother place 
that our modem faith in the final but slow 
perfection of the world ** requires a larger 
dose of resignation^^ than most people are 
aware. And how can any perfection upon 
this earth be final, since none can be eternal? 

We are all of us feeling after a solution 
of our modem difficulties. Schweitzer ^s ef- 
fort after a tolerable accommodation is 
poignantly personal like ours — and like ours 
it is tentative. It is too early to hope for 
complete satisfaction. Yet his efforts ob- 
viously tend in the same direction as ours. 
Schweitzer perceives that **in the last resort 
our relation with Jesus is a mystical one.*' 
For the sake of this acknowledgment, as 
well as for other reasons which will be evi- 
dent, I am fain to conclude this Introduction 
with Schweitzer's own words — ^the words 
with which he concludes his latest book : 

*'In the last resort our relationship to 
Jesus is of a mystical sort. No personality 
of the past can be installed in the present 

55 



INTRODUCTION 

by historical reflection or by affirmations 
about his authoritative significance. We 
get into relation with him only when we are 
brought together in the recognition of a 
conmion will, experience a clarification, en- 
richment, and quickening of our will by his, 
and find ourselves again in him. In this 
sense every deeper relationship between 
men is of a mystical sort. Oar reUgion, 
therefore, so far as it proves itself specific- 
ally Christian, is not so much 'Jesus-cult' 
as Jesus-mystic. 

^'It is only thus that Jesus creates fellow- 
ship among us. It is not as a symbol that he 
does it, nor anything of the sort. In so far 
as we with one another and with him are of 
one will, to place the Kingdom of God above 
all, and to serve in behalf of this faith and 
hope, so far is there fellowship between him 
and us and the men of all generations who 
lived and live in the same thought. 

*'From this it will be manifest also in what 
way the free and the confined movements of 
religion which now go side by side will come 
together in unity. False compromises are of 
no avail. AU concessions by which the free 
conception seeks to approach the confined 
can only result in ambiguity and inconse- 
quence. The differences lie in the thought 

66 



INTRODUCTION 

material which is presupposed on either 
side. All efforts after an agreement in this 
sphere are hopeless. These differences ap- 
pear so prominent because there is a lack of 
elementary and vital religiousness. Two 
threads of water wind along side by side 
through the boulders and gravel of a great 
stream bed. It is of no avail that one seeks 
here and there to clear out of the way the 
masses that are piled up between them, in 
order that they may flow on in one bed. 
But when the water rises and overflows the 
boulders they find themselves together as a 
matter of course. So will the confined and 
the free spirit of religion come together when 
will and hope are directed again towards the 
Kingdom of God, and the fellowship with 
the spirit of Jesus becomes in them some- 
thing elemental and mighty, and they are 
thereby brought so near together in the es- 
sence of their Weltanschauung and religion 
that the differences of thought material 
still exist indeed, but sink beneath the sur- 
face, as the boulders are covered by the ris- 
ing flood and in the end barely glimmer out 
of the depths. 

* * The names by which Jesus was called in 
the thought material of late Judaism — 
Messiah, Son of Man, and Son of God — ^have 

57 



INTRODUCTION 

become to ns historical parables. Even 
when he applied these titles to himself, this 
was an historically conditioned expression 
of his apprehension of himself as a com- 
mander and ruler. We find no designation 
that might express his nature for us. 

*^ Unknown and nameless he comes to us, 
as he approached those men on the seashore 
that knew not who he was. He says the 
same word: But do thou follow me I and 
he sets before us the tasks which we in our 
generation must accomplish. He commands. 
And to those that obey him, wise and unwise, 
he will reveal himself in what may be given 
them to experience in his fellowship of peace 
and activity, conflict and suflfering, and as 
an unutterable secret they shall come to 
know who he is. 



• • • 



58 



CHAPTER I 

THE MODERN ' ' HISTOEIOAL ' ^ SOLUTION 

1. Summary account of it. 

The Synoptical texts do not explain how 
the idea of the Passion forced itself npon 
Jesus and what it meant to him. The 
speeches of Peter and Paul viewed the Pas- 
sion in the aspect of a divine necessity which 
was prophesied by the Scripture. The Pau- 
line theory likewise has nothing to do with 
history. 

Therefore the idea of the Passion as it is 
developed here in connection with an account 
of Jesus ' life is not directly furnished by the 
texts but is deduced from them by implica- 
tion. One is left here to the unavoidable 
necessity of formulating a theory, the truth 
of which 'can only be judged by the measure 
of clearness and order which it introduces 
into the Synoptic accounts. 

AH of the theoretical constructions which 
have an outspoken historical interest coin- 
cide in am alleged solution which we denom- 
inate the modem-historical. What is histor- 
ical about it is the interest which prompts 

69 



THE MYSTERY OF 

the endeavour to explain history. The mod- 
em factor in it is the psychological sympathy 
of comprehension by the help of which one 
endeavours to show how, under the impres- 
sion of particular experiences, the idea of the 
Passion forced itself upon Jesus and was 
given by him a religious significance. This 
solution is based upon the following con- 
siderations : 

For Jesus there could be no question of 
constituting a ground for the forgiveness of 
sins. That he already assumed, as the peti- 
tion in the Lord's Prayer shows, — ^it flowed 
indeed quite naturally from the pardoning 
father-love of God. Now the thought of the 
ransom (Mk 10 ^^) recalls the Pauline theory 
of the atonement with its juridical character. 
This, indeed, has reference to the forgive- 
ness of sins. It is therefore to be presumed 
that the juridical notion of the atonement, 
like the thought of the forgiveness of sins, 
was strange to Jesus, since it is not sug- 
gested by anything in the whole character of 
his teaching. Consequently the expressions 
about the significance of his Passion are in 
their traditional form influenced somehow or 
another by Pauline conceptions. 

If one takes due account of this influence, 
the historical saying (Mk 10 *^) contains the 

60 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

notion of serving through sacrifice. This 
thought is here expressed in its highest po- 
tency. We stand upon the border where the 
heightened conception of service leads to that 
of sacrifice and atonement. The value of 
this sacrifice for others consists in the fact 
that this suffering death which Jesus under- 
went is at the same time the inaugural act 
through which the new morality of the King- 
dom of God receives emphatic sanction and 
the new condition contemplated in the idea of 
the Kingdom is itself realised. This deed is 
the efficient first factor in a chain of trans- 
formations the supernatural conclusion of 
which is his '' coming again'' in glory, where 
the New Covenant which he sealed with his 
blood is fulfilled in him. 

Therewith it is also explained why the de- 
termination to encounter suffering and death 
could and must suggest itself. T];ie realisa- 
tion of the Kingdom of God was Jesus ' mis- 
sion. This he had undertaken to effect at 
first within narrow limits during his Galilean 
ministry. Through his preaching of the new 
morality grounded upon faith in the divine 
Father, and under the influence of the power 
which proceeded from him, the beginnings of 
this Kingdom developed. It was a happy, 
successful period — the *' Galilean spring 

61 



THE MYSTERY OP 

time,*' Keim called it The climax of this 
period was reached with the mission of the 
Disciples. Through their preaching the glor- 
ious seed was to be strewn abroad every- 
where. As they upon their return announced 
to him their success he broke out with the cry 
of exultation which accounted the victory al- 
ready present (Mt 11 ^^■^''). 

Then came the time of defeat. The opposi- 
tion was contrived and carried out from Jeru- 
salem (Mk 7 ^). Before this the sympathy 
of the people delivered him from the conse- 
quences of occasional friction with the offi- 
cials. Now, however, as the opposition was 
systematically pursued, even his followers fell 
away from him. It was ominous that the dis- 
cussion about ceremonial purification brought 
to light the contradiction in which Jesus found 
himself with the legal tradition (Mk 7 ^'^^). 
Before spring had again returned to the land 
he had been obliged to leave Galilee. Far 
away in the north, in quiet and solitary retire- 
ment, he collected his energies in the effort 
perfectly to understand himself. 

For ihe realisation of the Kingdom there 
remained but one way still open to him, — 
namely, conflict with the power which opposed 
his work. He resolved to carry this conflict 
into the Capital itself. There fate should de- 
es 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

cide. Perhaps the victory would fall to him. 
But, even if it should turn out that in the 
course of earthly events the fate of death 
awaited him inevitably, so long as he trod the 
path which his office prescribed, this very 
suffering of death must signify in (Jod's plan 
the performance by which his work was to be 
crowned. It was then God's will that the 
moral state appropriate to the Kingdom of 
God should be inaugurated by the highest 
moral deed of the Messiah, With this 
thought he set out for Jerusalem — ^in order 
to remain Messiah. 

2. The Four Assumptions of the Modern^ 
Historical Solution. 

1. The life of Jesus falls into two con- 
trasted epochs. The first was fortunate, the 
second brought disillusion and ill success. 

2. The form of the Synoptical Passion-idea 
in Mk 10 ^^ (his giving himself a ransom for 
many) and in the institution of the Lord's 
Supper (Mk 14 ^^: his blood given for many) 
is somehow or another influenced by the Pau- 
line theory of the atonement. 

3. The conception of the Kingdom of God 
as a self-fulfilling ethical society in which 
service is the highest law dominated the idea 
of the Passion. 

63 



THE MYSTERY OF 

4. If Jesus' Passion was the inaugural act 
of the new morality of the Kingdom of God, 
the success of it depended upon the Disciples 
being led to understand it in this sense and to 
act in accordance with it. The Passion-idea 
was a reflection. 

Are these assumptions, considered individ- 
ually, justified! 

3. The Two Contrasted Periods. (First As- 
sumption.) 

The period of ill success is dated from the 
time following the mission of the Twelve. 
What are the events of the supposedly for- 
tunate period! We pass over the vexatious 
discussion with the Pharisees about the heial- 
ing of the paralytic (Mk 2 ^•^^), over the ques- 
tion of fasting (Mk 2 18-22)^ and that of the 
observance of the Sabbath (Mk 2 23-3. «). Al- 
ready in Mk 3 ^ it has come to the point of a 
murderous attack. Jesus has to renounce his 
family because they wish to fetch him home 
by force as one who is mentally incompetent 
(Mk 3 20-22. 81-85)^ ^t Nazareth he is rejected 

(Mk6i«). 

In the same period occurs the attack which 
shocked him most profoundly; The Phari- 
sees discredited him with the people by 

64 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

charging that he was in league with the 
devil (Mk 3 22-8OJ g^^ deeply this saying 
wounded him may be seen from his reference 
to it in the commission to the Twelve, He 
prepared his Disciples for a similar expe- 
rience. **If they have called the master of 
the house Beelzebub, how much more those of 
his household^' (Mt 10 ^s). 

Such are the well known events of the * * suc- 
cessful period ^M But they are nothing in 
comparison with those which he hints at when 
he is sending out the Twelve. In general 
terms he has already pronounced those 
blessed who are reproached and persecuted 
for his sake (Mt 5 ^^» ^^). Now he leads his 
Disciples to expect oppression and distress 
(Mt 10 1^-25). Faithfulness to him involves 
the endurance of enmity (Mt 10 2^), the sev- 
erance of the dearest ties (Mt 10 ^'^), and the 
bearing of the cross (Mt 10 ^®) . The Galilean 
period is to be regarded as a happy one: the 
commission to the Twelve is pfissimistic in 
tone. How does that agree! 

The hints also which he drops at that time 
in the presence of the people point to bitter 
catastrophes. What must have occurred in 
Chorazin, in Capernaum, and in Bethsaida 
that he calls down upon them the wrath of 

66 



THE MYSTERY OF 

the Day of Judgment, in which, it shall be 
more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon than for 
them (Mt 11 20-24) j 

Because this gloomy tone accords ill with 
the happy Galilean period, there is an obvious 
temptation to regard the Matthean speeches 
of the time of the Apostles' mission as com- 
positions which include fragments belonging 
to a later period. Where, however, could 
Jesus have spoken such words! So long as 
he remained in the north after the flight he 
made no speeches, and the utterances of the 
Jerusalem days have their own peculiar char- 
acter, so that it is hard to know where to 
introduce references to Galilean occurrences 
and warnings to the Disciples in prospect of 
their journey. 

Moreover, it is a fact that nothing is re- 
lated about conspicuous successes in the first 
period. The successes first begin with the 
mission of the Twelve. Jesus celebrates the 
great moment of their return with words of 
enthusiasm (Mt 11 26-27)^ j^^^ ^^ ^q suppose 

now that in the sequel the Pharisees tri- 
umphed over him completely and the people 
deserted himf Of such a retrogression of 
his cause the texts, however, record nothing. 
The discussion about ceremonial purification 
(Mt 7 ^'^^) does not furnish what was ex- 

66 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

pected of it. Jesus had already at an earlier 
time come into much hotter conflict with the 
theologians of the capital (Mk 3 22-80 j^ jjj^ 
the question about the laws of purification it 
was not he that was worsted. 

Jesus* defeat has been inferred from the 
fact that the ^^flighf to the north followed 
this scene (Mk 7 ^* ff). But the accounts do 
not in the least represent this departure as a 
flight, nor do they account for this journey to 
the north as a result of the previous contro- 
versy; rather it is we who interpolate a fic- 
titious causal connection in the chronological 
sequence of the narrative. 11 Jesus imme- 
diately before this was supported by the pop- 
ular favour and now leaves the region, we 
have a fact before us which stands unex- 
plained in the texts. That it was a flight is 
an unprovable conjecture. 

No importance need be attached to the fact 
that subsequently Jesus again appears on 
two occasions surrounded by a multitude 
(Mk 8 i» : feeding of the 4000 ; and Mk 8 «* ff : 
the scenes before and after the Transfigura- 
tion). This fact might perhaps be attributed 
to a literary reconstruction of the respective 
accounts, — as may be considered established, 
for example, in the case of the douhlette of 
the feeding of the multitude. 

67 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Decisive, however, is the reception which 
the Passover caravan accorded to Jesus as 
he overtook it at Jericho. This ovation was 
not accorded to the man who had lost ground 
before the Pharisees in his own country and 
among his own people and at last had been 
forced to flee, but to the celebrated prophet 
emerging from his retirement. If this Gali- 
lean populace supported him now by their ac- 
claim and enabled him to terrorise the mag- 
istrates in the capital for several days — ^f or 
his purification of the Temple was nothing 
else but that — ^and to expose the scribes with 
his dry irony, is it possible that they did it 
for the man who a few weeks before had to 
yield to these theologians in his own land! 

If one insists upon speaking of a successful 
period, it is the second that must be so de- 
nominated. For wherever Jesus appears in 
public after the return of the Twelve he is 
accompanied by a devoted multitude — ^in Gal- 
ilee, from the Jordan to Jerusalem, and in 
the Capital itself. The surly Jewish popu- 
lace is an invention of the Fourth Evangelist. 
Then, too, the illegality of his secret arrest 
and hasty conviction shows what the Council 
feared from the popular favour in behalf of 
Jesus. That was the only ^^illsuccess*^ of 

68 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

the second period. It was indeed a fatal one. 

The first and successful Galilean period is 
therefore in reality a time of humiliation and 
illsuccess. There is a double reason for re- 
garding it nevertheless as a ** happy** time. 
In the first place there is an aesthetic element 
in it, which Keim in particular strongly em- 
phasises. A series of parables drawn from 
nature, as well as the wonderful speech 
against worldly care (Mt 6 26-84^^ seem hardly 
intelligible except as the reflection of a glad 
and cheerful sense for the beauty of nature. 

With this is associated, in the second place, 
an historical postulate. In the first period no 
trace is discoverable of the idea of the Pas- 
sion: the second is dominated by it. Hence 
the first was successful, the second unsuccess- 
ful, — for otherwise there is no way of ac- 
counting, psychologically or historically, for 
the change. 

The historical facts speak differently. In 
the real period of illsuccess the resolution to 
sujffer did not come to light. In the success- 
ful second period, on the other hand, Jesus 
disclosed to his Disciples that he must be put 
to death by the scribes. Thus the relation 
was the reverse. Herewith modem-histori- 
qbX psychology finds itself before an enigma. 

69 



THE MYSTERY OP 

4. The Influence of the Pauline Theory of 
the Atonement upon the Formulation of 
the Synoptical Prediction of the Passion. 
(Second Assumption.) 

No proof can be brought to support the con- 
tention that the Passion passages in the Syn- 
optic Gospels are influenced by Pauline con- 
ceptions. Here again we have a sort of pos- 
tulate. For if the juridical character of Mk 
10 *^ and Mk 14 ^* cannot be set down to the 
account of the Pauline medium, one must as- 
sume that Jesus* own notion of the Passion 
contained this bold conception of atonement. 
The modern-historical solution, however, is 
not adapted to that alternative. 

As a matter of fact it is demonstrable that 
no Pauline influence can be discerned here. 
According to Paul, Jesus said at the Last 
Supper: My body for you (1 Oor. 11 ^*). In 
the same manner Luke has : My body which 
is given for you; the blood which is shed for 
you (Lk 22 !»• ^o)^ ^^^ ^j^^ ^1^^^ Synoptists 

invariably write instead of this: for many. 
Mk 10 *^» Mt 20 ^® : to give his life a ransom 
for many. Mk 14 ^^ Mt 26 ^^i my blood of 
the covenant which is shed for many. In 
the one case the persons who are to benefit by 
the Passion are definitely determined: they 

70 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

are the Disciples, In the other case it is a 
question of an indefinite number. 

Nothing is accomplished by. the argument 
that it comes in the end substantially to the 
same thing. Why, according to the older 
Synoptists, did Jesus speak of the many, ac- 
cording to Paul, of his own? The sole ex- 
planation lies in the fact that Paul wrote 
from the standpoint of the Church after the 
death of Jesus. From this point of view the 
saving eflScacy of Jesus' death is applied to 
a determinate community, to those, namely, 
who believe on him. The Disciples represent 
this community of believers in the historical 
sayings of Jesus, because from the standpoint 
of the Church, founded as it was upon belief 
in the Messiah, one could not conceive that 
Jesus' words about his Passion could have 
any other reference but to the believers* 

The early Synoptic **for many'' is uttered, 
however, from the historical standpoint. 
That is to say, it is appropriate to the time 
when Jesus did not yet require belief in his 
messiahship, when consequently the number 
of persons whom his death is to benefit is left 
indeterminate. Of only one thing is he cer- 
tain, that it is greater than the circle of his 
Disciples: hence he said, **for many." Had 

71 



THE MYSTERY OF 

hie used the expression, **for you/^ which 
Paul thought it natural to attribute to him, 
the Disciples must have concluded from it that 
he was dying for them alone, inasmuch as 
they could not then have the feeling that they 
were representatives of a future community 
of believers, according to the conception 
which was so obvious to Paul and the Church. 

Inasmuch as this ^^for many'' has held its 
place, in spite of the fact that Paul, writing 
from the churchly point of view, felt instinct- 
ively the necessity of substituting ^^for you'' 
(though he thereby coined an expression 
which is historically impossible), one is not 
justified in assuming any sort of Pauline in- 
fluence upon the traditional form of the early 
Synoptic Passion-idea. The bold theory of 
the atonement in the Synoptists is therefore 
historical. Any softening of it, such as the 
modem-historical solution must assume is 
without justification. 

Hence in the interpretation of Jesus ^ say- 
ing the first requisite is to do justice to the 
expression **for many.'* Because they have 
not done this, all expositions of the signifi- 
cance of Jesus' death — ^from Paul to Ritschl 
— are imhistorical. One has but to substi- 
tute, for the community of believers with 
which they deal, the indeterminate and un- 

72 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

qualified ^^inany'* of the historical saying, 
and their interpretations become simply 
meaningless. That interpretation alone is 
historical which renders it intelligible why, 
according to Jesus, the atonement accom- 
plished by his death is to redound to the bene- 
fit oi^ a number which is intentionally left in- 
determinate. 

5. The Kingdom of God as an Ethical Entity 
in the Passion Idea. (Third Assump- 
tion. ) 

(a). Mk 10 *^"^^- Service as the ethical 
conduct prescribed in expectation of the com- 
ing Kingdom. 

The sons of Zebedee had advanced the 
claim to sit on either side of the Lord in his 
glory, i. e. when he should reign as Messiah 
upon his throne. The other Disciples object 
to this. Jesus calls them together and speaks 
to them about serving and ruling in connec- 
tion with the Kingdom of God. 

In this saying one is accustomed to find the 
ethical conception of the Kingdom of God. 
There is to be a revaluation of all values. 
The greatest in the Kingdom of heaven is 
he who becomes least, like a child (Mt 18*), 
and the ruler is he who serves. Self-humilia- 
tion and the meekness of service, such is the 

73 



THE MYSTERY OF 

new morality of the Kingdom of God which 
comes into force through Jesns' service unto 
death. 

With this, however, the fact is ignored that 
the Kingdom in which one reigns is thought 
of as a future thing, whereas the serving ap- 
plies to the present 1 In our ethical fashion 
of viewing the matter, serving and reigning 
coincide logically and chronologically. With 
Jesus, however, it is not at all a question of 
a purely ethical exchange of the notions of 
serving and ruling; rather it is a contrast 
which develops in a chronological sequence. 
There is a sharp distinction made between the 
present and the future aeon. He who is one 
day to count among the greatest in the King- 
dom of God must now be as a child I He who 
advances a claim to a position of rule therein 
must now serve 1 The more lowly the posi- 
tion of humble service which one now as- 
sumes, in the time when the earthly rulers 
exercise authority by force, so much the more 
lofty will be his station as ruler when earthly 
force is done away and the Kingdom of God 
dawns. Hence he especially must humble 
himself even unto death who is to come as the 
Son of Man upon the clouds of heaven to 
judge and to rule the world. Before he 
mounts his throne he drinks the cup of suffer- 

.74 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

ing, which they also miist taste who would 
reign with him 1 

So soon as one pays dne attention to this 
**now and then'* in Jesus* speech, the trivial 
parallelism of phrase is replaced by a real 
and effective climax. The descending stages 
of service correspond to the ascending stages 
of rule, 

1. Whosoever would become great among 
you, shall be your servant — Mk 10 *®' 

2. Whosoever of you would be first, shall be 
bondservant of all (others) — ^v. **• 

3. Therefore the Son of Man expected the 
post of highest rule because he was not come 
to be served but to serve, in giving his life a 
ransom for many — ^v. ^^' 

The climax is a double one. The service 
of the Disciples extended only to their circle : 
the service of Jesus to an unlimited number, 
namely, to all such as were to benefit by his 
suffering and death. In the case of the Dis- 
ciples it was merely a question of unselfish 
subjection: in the case of Jesus it meant the 
bitter suffering of death. Both count as serv- 
ing, inasmuch as they establish a claim to a 
position of rule in the Kingdom. 

The ordinary explanation does not satisfy 

the early Synoptic text but only that of Luke 
22 2*-27. rpj^g ^^^ jjg^g ^Qj^ j^^ uarrativc from 

76 



THE MYSTERY OF 

its proper connection, so that it appears as 
a dispute among the Disciples ** which of 
them is accounted to be the greatest/* 

With this, the **now and then*' is elimi- 
nated from the situation, and it is only a ques- 
tion of a purely ethical inversion of the ideas 
of ruling and serving. Accordingly, Jesus* 
speech, too, runs on in a lifeless parallelism. 
He that is greater among you, let him become 
as the younger, and he that is chief, as he that 
doth serve (Lk 22 ^®). Instead of exemplify- 
ing by his own sacrifice of himself unto death 
for the great generality of men the conduct 
required of those who would reign with him, 
he speaks only of his serviceable character 
as displayed towards the Disciples: But I 
am in the midst of you as he that serveth (Lk 
22 2*^). By this he means a serving that is at 
the same time ruling. In the case of the two 
older Synoptists, however, it is not at all a 
question of the proclamation of the new mor- 
ality of the Kingdom of God, where serving 
is ruling ; rather it is a question of the signifi- 
cance of humility and service in expectation 
of the Kingdom of God. Service is the fun- 
damental law of interim-ethics. 

This thought is much deeper and more vital 
than the modem play upon words which we 
attribute to the Lord. Only through lowli- 

.76 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

ness and childlikeness in this aeon is one 
worthily prepared to reign in the Kingdom of 
God. Only he who is here morally purified 
and ennobled through suffering can be great 
there. Hence suffering is for Jesus the moral 
means of acquiring and confirming the mes- 
sianic authority to which he is designated. 

Earthly rule, because it depends upon force, 
is an emanation of the power of ungodliness. 
Authority in the Kingdom of God, where the 
power of this world is destroyed, signifies 
emanation from the divine power. Only he 
can be the bearer of such authority who has 
kept himself free from the contamination of 
earthly rule. To allot it to such as have pre- 
pared themselves through suffering is God's 
affair and his alone (Mk 10 ^^* ^^). 

But if service does not represent the mor- 
ality of the Kingdom of God, Jesus' concep- 
tion of the Passion does not deal with the cor- 
responding notion of the Kingdom as a self- 
developing ethical society, but rather with a 
super-moral entity, namely, the Kingdom of 
God in its eschatological aspect. 

(&). The idea of the Passion and the Es- 
chatological Expectation. 

The investigation of the accounts of the 
Lord's Supper [in the first part of this work] 
revealed a close connection between the escha- 

77 



THE MYSTERY OP 

tological conclusion (Mk 14 ^^) and the ex- 
pression about the blood shed for many (v. 
^^). The other passages about the Passion 
suggest a similar connection. 

After Jesus with his **Tes'' had himself 
pronounced the verdict of death he speaks of 
his ** coming again '* upon the clouds of 
heaven. Hereby, according to Mark^s text, 
he associates the two events in a single 
thought. Mk 14 ^^: I am, and ye shall see 
the Son of Man sitting at the right hand of 
the Power and coming with the clouds of 
Heaven. This logical connection is already 
weakened by Matthew, as in the case of the 
word about the cup. He substitutes for the 
**and'* an expression which denotes a tem- 
poral seqtiMce merely. Mt 26 ^*: Thou hast 
said : nevertheless I say unto you, henceforth 
shall ye, etc. The eschatological reference is 
lacking in Luke : he has omitted it also from 
the word about the cup. 

A close connection between the thought of 
the Passion and eschatology is implied also 
in Jesus ^ saying about the path of suffering 
which his foUowers must tread (Mk 8 3*— ^9 ^). 
Whosoever shall be ashamed of Jesus when he 
suffers reproach and persecution in this adul- 
terous and sinful world, of him will the Son of 
Man be ashamed when he cometh in the glory 

78 



r' 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

of his Father with the holy angels. For this 
generation shall not sink into the grave until 
they see the Kingdom of God come with 
power ! 

This connection mnst have appeared ex- 
tremely prominent to the hearers. After the 
departure from Caesarea Philippi, under the 
impression of the secret of the Passion, which 
filled them with a sense of sadness and fear 
(Mk 9 80-82 J ^ — jTj^Q Disciples dispute which of 

them shall receive the highest place in the 
Kingdom. In the house at Capernaum Jesus 
had to rebuke them (Mk 9 ^^•^'^). That was 
after he had spoken for the second time about 
his Passion. 

On the way to Jerusalem the same scene 
was reenacted in closest conjunction with the 
third prediction of the Passion. (Mk 10 ^^•^^) . 
The sons of Zebedee advance their claim to 
the seats upon the throne. This is not in the 
least a case of childish misunderstanding on 
the part of his followers, for Jesus in fact 
treats their suggestion with perfect serious- 
ness. The eschatological expectation must 
accordingly have been thrown into such strong 
relief for the Disciples by Jesus ' prediction of 
his Passion that they necessarily reasoned 
within themselves about the position they 
should occupy in the coming Kingdom. 

79 



THE MYSTERY OF 

The modern-Mstorical solution eliminates 
the eschatological conception of the Kingdom 
of God from the Passion, reducing it to the 
notion of an apotheosis, *'the coming again y^ 
as it is called. This expression is entirely 
false. Jesus never spoke of his coming again 
but only of his coming or of the advent of the 
Son of Man. We use the expression ** com- 
ing again'' because we connect death and 
glory by contrast, as though the new situation 
were conditioned merely upon a victorious 
transfiguration of Jesus. Our view makes 
him say : * * I shall die, but I shall be glorified 
through my coming again. ' ' Asa matter of 
fact, however, he said: **I must suffer and 
the Son of Man shall appear upon the clouds 
of heaven.'' But that for his hearers meant 
much more than an apotheosis — ^for with the 
appearing of the Son of Man dawned the es- 
chatological Kingdom. Jesus therefore sets 
his death in temporal-causal connection with 
the eschatological dawning of the Kingdom. 
The eschatological notion of the Kingdom, not 
the modern-ethical notion, dominates his idea 
of the Passion. 

6. The Form of the Prediction of the Passion. 
(Fourth Assumption.) 

If the modemhistorical solution be correct 

80 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

in its conception, Jesus must have communi- 
cated the thought of the Passion to his Dis- 
ciples in the form of an ethical reflection. 
If they were to comprehend the approaching 
catastrophe as the inauguration of the new 
morality, and were to derive from it incentive 
to a change of conduct, then he must have 
familiarised them with the character of this 
event from the very beginning, as soon as 
ever he announced it. 

As a matter of fact, however, he imparted 
to them the thought of the Passion, not in the 
form of an ethical reflection, but as a secret, 
without further explanation. It is dominated 
by a **must,'' the expression for incompre- 
hensible divine necessity. The fact that the 
Passion-idea was a secret stands opposed to 
the modern-historical solution. 

7. Resume. 

1. The assumption of a fortunate Galilean 

period which was followed by a time of 
defeat is historically untenable. 

2. Pauline influence cannot have con- 

ditioned the form of the early Synoptic 
sayings about the Passion. 

3. Not the ethical but the hyper-ethical, the 

eschatological, notion of the Kingdom 

81 



THE MYSTERY OF 

dominates the Passion as Jesus con- 
ceived it. 
4b The utterances of the Passion-idea did 
not occur in the form of an ethical re- 
flection but it was a question of an in- 
comprehensible secret which the Dis- 
ciples had not the least need to under- 
stand and in fact did not. 

Such is the situation with regard to the four 
pillars of the modem-historical solution. 
With them the whole structure collapses. It 
is after all a lifeless thought! The feeble 
modernity of it is visible in the fact that it 
does not get beyond a sort of representative 
significance of Jesus * death. Jesus effects by 
his offering of himself nothing absolutely new, 
since throughout his whole public ministry 
he assumes that the Kingdom of God is al- 
ready present as a dispensation of the for- 
giveness of sin or as the morally developing 
society. With his very appearance upon 
earth it is there. The performance of atone- 
ment, however, requires a real significance in 
Jesus' death. 

Herein lies the weakness of the modem dog- 
matic in contrast with the old. Paul, Anselm, 
and Luther know of an absolutely new situa- 
tion which follows in time the death of Jesus 

8% 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

and results as a consequence of it. Modem 
theology talks all around the subject; it has 
nothing specific to say, however, but involves 
itself in the cloud of its own assumptions. 
Both accounts, indeed, are unhistorical. Ee- 
ligiously considered, only the modem view is 
justifiable. The old dogmatic, however, is in 
this point the more historical, for it postulates 
at all events a real effect of the death of Jesus, 
as the Synoptical passages require. 

In what, however, does this absolutely new 
thing consist which is there made to depend 
upon the death of Jesus ? The Synoptic say- 
ings give but one answer to this : the eschato- 
logical realisation of the Kingdom I The 
coming of the Kingdom of God with power 
is dependent upon the atonement which Jesus 
performs. That is substantially the secret of 
the Passion. 

How is that to be understood? Only the 
history of Jesus can throw light upon it. In 
place of the modern-historical solution we ad- 
vance now the eschatological-historical. 



83 



CHAPTER II 

THE "development'' OF JESUS 

1. The Kingdom of God as an Ethical and as 
an Eschatological Fact. 

The concurrence in Jesus of an ethical with 
an eschatological line of thought has always 
constituted one of the most difficult problems 
of New Testament study. How can two such 
different views of the world, in part dia- 
metrically opposed to one another, be united 
in one process of thought? 

The attempt has been made to evade the 
problem, with the just feeling that the two 
views cannot be united. Critical spirits like 
T. Colani {Jesus-Christ et les croyance mes- 
sianique de son tempjs. 1864, pp. 94 ff., 169 
ff.) and G. Volkmar {Die Evangelien. 1870, 
pp. 530 ff.) went to the length of eliminating 
altogether eschatology from the field of Jesus ' 
thought. All expressions of that sort were 
accordingly to be charged to the account of 
the eschatological expectation of a later time. 
This procedure is frustrated by the stubborn- 
ness of the texts: the eschatological sayings 
belong precisely to the best attested passages. 

84 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

The excision of them is an act of violence. 

No more successful has been the attempt to 
evade the problem by sublimating the escha- 
tology, as though Jesus had translated the 
realistic conceptions of his time into spiritual 
terms by using them in a figurative sense. 
The work of Eric Haupt {Die eschatologi- 
schen Aussagen Jesu in den synoptischen 
Evangelien, 1895) is based upon this thought 
But there is nothing to justify us in assum- 
ing that Jesus attached to his words a non- 
natural sense, whereas his hearers, in accord- 
ance with the prevailing view, must have un- 
derstood them realistically. Not only are we 
at a loss for a rational explanation of such a 
method on Jesus' part, but he himself gives 
not the slightest hint of it. 

So the problem remains as urgent as ever, 
how the juxtaposition of two discordant views 
of the world is to be explained. The sole 
solution seems to lie in the assumption of a 
gradual development. Jesus may have en- 
tertained at first a purely ethical view, look- 
ing for the realisation of the Kingdom of 
God through the spread and perfection of the 
moral-religious society which he was under- 
taking to establish. - When, however, the op- 
position of the world put the organic comple- 
tion of the Kingdom in doubt, the eschato- 

85 



THE MYSTERY OF 

logical conception forced itself upon him. By 
the course of events he was brought to the 
pass where the fulfilment of the religious- 
ethical ideal, which hitherto he had regarded 
as the terminus of a continuous moral de- 
velopment, could be expected only as the re- 
sult of a cosmic catastrophe in which God's 
omnipotence should bring to its conclusion 
the work which he had undertaken. 

Thus a complete, revolution is supposed to 
have occurred in Jesus' thought. But the 
problem is veiled rather than solved by dis- 
posing the terms of the contrast in chrono- 
logical sequence. The acceptance of the 
eschatological notion, if it is to be rendered 
intelligible in this fashion, signifies nothing 
less than a total breach with the past, a 
break at which all development ceases. For 
the eschatological thought, if it be taken ser- 
iously, abrogates the ethical train of thought. 
It accepts no subordinate place. To such a 
position of impotence it was brought for the 
first time in Christian theology as the result 
of historical experience. Jesus, however, 
must have thought either eschatologically or 
uneschatologically, but not both together — 
nor in such a wise that the eschatological was 
superadded to supplement the uneschatologi- 
cal. 

86 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

It has been proved that in the thought of 
the Passion it is only the eschatological idea 
of the Kingdom of God which is in view. It 
has been shown likewise that the assumption 
of a period of illsuccess after the mission of 
the Twelve is without historical justification. 
This, however, constitutes the indispensable 
presumption for every such development as 
has been assumed on the part of Jesus. 
Therefore the eschatological notion cannot 
have been forced upon Jesus by outward ex- 
periences, but it must from the beginning, 
even in the first Galilean period, have lain 
at the base of his preaching I 

2. The Eschatological Character of the 
Charge to the Twelve. 

*^The Kingdom of God is at hand'' (Mt 10 
'^) — this word which Jesus commissions his 
Disciples to proclaim is a summary expres- 
sion of all his previous preaching. They are 
to carry it now throughout the cities of 
Israel. The charge of Jesus to the Twelve 
furnishes no means of determining in what 
sense this proclamation is meant. 

If the common conception is right about 
the significance of this mission of the Twelve, 
the words with which he dismisses them pre- 
sent an extraordinary riddle. Full of hope 

87 



THE MYSTERY OF 

and with the joy of productive effort he goes 
about to extend the scope of his activity for 
the founding of the Kingdom of God. The 
commission to the Twelve ought therefore to 
contain instruction about the missionary 
propaganda they were to carry out in this 
sense. One must hence expect that he would 
direct them how they should preach about the 
new relation to God and the new morality of 
the Kingdom. 

The commission, however, is anything but a 
summary of the * * teacBing of Jesus. ' ' It does 
not in the least contemplate instruction of a 
thoroughgoing kind, rather what is in ques- 
tion is a flying proclamation throughout 
Israel. The one errand of the Apostles as 
teachers is to cry out everywhere the warn- 
ing of the nearness of the Kingdom of God — 
to the intent that all may be warned and 
given opportunity to repent. In this, how- 
ever, no time is to be lost; therefore they are 
not to linger in a town where men are unsus- 
ceptible to their message, but to hasten on in 
order that they may pass through all the 
cities of Israel before the appearing of the 
Son of Man takes place. But ' ' the coming of 
the Son of Man*' signifies — the dawning of 
the Kingdom of God mth power. 

When they persecute you in this city flee 

88 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tuito another, for verily I say unto yon, Ye 
shall not have gone through the cities of 
Israel till the Son of Man be come (Mt 10 
2^). If one so understands the comission 
to the Twelve as to suppose that Jesus would 
say through his Disciples that the time is 
now come for the realisation of the Kingdom 
by a new moral behaviour, that eschatologi- 
cal saying Ues like an erratic boulder in the 
midst of a flowery meadow. If, however, one 
conceives of the embassage eschatologically, 
the saying acquires a great context: it is a 
rock in the midst of a wild mountain land- 
scape. One cannot affirm of this saying that 
it has been interpolated here by a later age ; 
rather with compelling force it fixes the pres- 
ence of eschatological conceptions in the days 
of the mission of the Twelve. 

The one and only article of instruction that 
is required is the call to repentance. Whoso- 
ever believes in the nearness of the Kingdom, 
repents. Hence Jesus gives the Disciples 
authority over unclean spirits, to cast them 
out and to heal the sick (Mt 10 ^). By these 
signs they are to perceive that the power of 
ungodliness is comir^g to an end and the 
morning-glow of the Kingdom of God already 
dawns. That belongs to their errand as 
teachers, for whosoever fails to believe their 

89 



THE MYSTERY OF 

signs, and therenpon brings forth no works of 
repentance nnto the Kingdom of God, — ^that 
man is damned. Thus have Corazin, Beth- 
saida, and Capernaum come into condemna- 
tion. Faith and repentance were made easy 
for them by the signs and wonders with 
which they were favoured beyond others — and 
yet they did not come to themselves, as even 
pagan cities like Tyre and Sidon would have 
done (Mt 11 20-24)^ rj^^^ saying addressed to 

the people shows what significance Jesus as- 
cribed to the signs in view of the escha to- 
logical embassage. 

Thus the Disciples were to preach the 
Kingdom, Repentance, and the Judgment. 
Inasmuch, however, as the event they pro- 
claimed was so near that it might at any 
moment surprise them, they must be pre- 
pared for what precedes it, namely, for the 
final insurrection of the power of this world. 
How they are to comport themselves in the 
face of this emergency so as not to be con- 
founded — ^here is the point upon which Jesus' 
parting words of instruction bear! In the 
general tumult of spirits all ties will be dis- 
solved. Faction will divide even the family 
(Mt 10 84-86)^ Whosoever would be loyal to 
the Eangdom of God must be ready to tear 
from out his heart those who were dearest 

90 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

to him, to endure reproach, and to bear the 
cross (Mt 10 ^''» ^®). The secular authority 
will bring upon them severe persecution 
(Mt 10 "• 31). Men will call them to ac- 
count and subject them to torture in order 
to move them to denial of their cause. 
Brother shall deliver up brother to death, and 
the father his child; and children shall rise 
up against parents and cause them to be put 
to death. Only he who remains steadfast in 
the midst of this general tumult, and con- 
fesses Jesus before men, shall be saved in the 
Day of Judgment, when he intervenes with 
God in their behalf (Mt 10 «2. ss)^ 

In the commission to the Twelve Jesus im- 
parts instruction about the woes of the ap- 
proaching Kingdom. In the descriptive por- 
tions of it there may be much perhaps that 
betrays the colouring of a later time. By 
this concession, however, the character of the 
speech as a whole is not prejudiced. The 
question at issue is not about a course of 
conduct which they are to maintain after his 
death. For such instruction not a single his- 
torical word can be adduced. The woes pre- 
cede the dawning of the Kingdom. There- 
fore the victorious proclamation of the near- 
ness of the Kingdom must accommodate itself 
to the woes. Hence this juxtaposition of op- 

91 



THE MYSTERY OP 

timism and pessimism which the current in- 
terpretation finds so nnacconntable. It is 
the sign manual of every eschatological 
Weltanschauimg. 

3. The New View. 

The idea of Passion is dominated only by 
the eschatological conception of the King- 
dom. In the charge to the Twelve the ques- 
tion is only about the eschatological — ^not 
about the ethical-nearness of the Kingdom. 
From this it follows, for one thing, that 
Jesus' ministry counted only upon the escha- 
tological realisation of the Kingdom. Then, 
however, it is evident that the relation of 
his ethical thoughts to the eschatological view 
can have suffered no alteration by reason of 
outward events but must have been the same 
from beginning to end. 

In what relation, however, did his ethics 
and his eschatology stand to each other? 
So long as one starts with the ethics and 
seeks to comprehend the eschatology as some- 
thing adventitious, there appears to be no 
organic connection between the two, since the 
ethics of Jesus, as we are accustomed to con- 
ceive it, is not in the least accommodated to 
the eschatology but stands upon a much 

92 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

higher level. One must therefore take the 
opposite course and see if the ethical procla- 
mation in essence is not conditioned by the 
eschatological view of the world. 



93 



CHAPTER III 

THE PBEACHIKG OF THE KIKGDOM 

1. The New Morality as Repentance. 

If the thought of the eschatological realisa- 
tion of the Kingdom is the fundamental fac- 
tor in Jesus ^ preaching, his whole theory of 
ethics must come under the conception of 
repentance as a preparation for the coming of 
the Kingdom. This conception seems to us 
too narrow a one to apply to the whole ex- 
tent of this moral-religious proclamation. 
This is due to the fact that the word repent- 
ance as we use it has rather a negative sig- 
nificance, laying emphasis as it does chiefly 
upon foregoing guilt. It is a far richer con- 
ception, however, which the Synoptists ex- 
press by the word repentance (/isrdpoea). 
It is not merely a recovery which stands in 
retrospective relation with a sinful condition 
in the past, but also — and this is its pre- 
dominant character — it is a moral renewal in 
prospect of the accomplishment of vmversal 
perfection in the futv/re. 

Thus * * the repentance in expectation of the 
Kingdom'* comprises all positive ethical re- 

94 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

qnirements. In this sense it is the lively echo 
of the ** repentance** of the early prophets. 
For what Amos, Hosea, Isaiah, and Jeremiah 
mean by repentance is moral renovation in 
prospect of the Day of the Lord. Thus 
Isaiah says : ** Wash you, make you dean; put 
away the evil of your doings from before mine 
eyes; seek judgment, relieve the oppressed, 
judge the fatherless, plead for the widow** 
(Isai. 1 ^®» ^''). It is precisely this Old Testa- 
ment conception- of repentance, with its em- 
phasis upon the new moral life, which one 
must have in mind in order to understand 
aright the Synoptical repentance. Both have 
a forward vision, both are dominated by the 
thought of a condition of perfection which 
God will bring to pass through the Judgment. 
This, in the Prophetic view, is the Day of the 
Lord; in the Synoptic it is the dawn of the 
Kingdom. 

The ethics of the Sermon on the Mount is 
therefore repentance. The new morality, 
which detects the spirit beneath the letter of 
the Law, makes one meet for the Kingdom of 
God. Only the righteous can enter into the 
Kingdom of God — ^in that conviction all were 
agreed. Whosoever, therefore, preached the 
nearness of the Kingdom must also teach the 
righteousness pertaining to the Kingdom. 

95 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Hence Jesus proclaimed the new rigliteon&- 
ness which is higher than the Law and tiie 
Prophets, — ^for they extend only up to the 
Baptist. Since the days of the Baptist, how- 
ever, one stands inmiediately within tiie pre- 
messianic period. 

The Day of Judgment puts this moral 
transformation to the proof: only he who 
has done the will of the heavenly Father can 
enter into the Kingdom (Mt 7 ^^). The claim 
that one is a follower of Jesus, or has even 
wrought signs and wonders in his name, is 
of no avail as a substitute for this new rights 
eousness (Mt 7 ^^» ^^). Hence the Sermon on 
the Mount concludes with the admonition to 
build, in expectation of the momentous event, 
a firmly founded structure capable of re- 
sisting storm and tempest (Mt 7 24-27)^ 

The Beatitudes (Mt 5 ^'^^) come under the 
same point of view. They define the moral 
disposition which justifies admission into tiie 
Kingdom. This is the explanation of the use 
of the present and the future tense in the 
same sentence. Blessed are the meek, those 
that hunger and thirst after righteousness, 
the merciful, the pure in heart, the peace- 
makers, the poor in spirit, those that endure 
persecution for righteousness* sake, because 
such character and conduct is tiieir security 

96 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

that with the appearing of the Kingdom of 
God they will be found to belong to it. 

A series of parables illustrates the same 
thought. Thus the parables of the treasure 
in the field and of the pearl of great price 
(Mt 13 ***^®) show how one must stake all 
upon the hope of the Kingdom when the pros- 
pect of it is held out to him, and must sacri- 
fice all other goods for the sake of acquiring 
this highest good that is proposed to him. 

Thus already in the ethics of the Galilean 
period we find the *'now and then'' which ac- 
counts for the estimate put upon serving 
(Mk 10 *^). As repentance imto the King- 
dom of God the ethics also of the Sermon on 
the Mou/nt is interim-ethics. In this we per- 
ceive that the moral instruction of Jesus re- 
mained the same from the first day of his 
public appearance unto his latest utterances, 
for the lowliness and serviceableness which 
he recommended to his Disciples on the way 
to Jerusalem correspond exactly to the new 
moral conduct which he developed in the Ser- 
mon on the Mount: they make one meet for 
the Kingdom of God. Only, they constitute 
a climax in the attainment of the new right- 
eousness, inasmuch as they render one meet 
not merely for entrance into the Kingdom but 
for bearing rule in it. 

97 



THE MYSTERY OF 

We encounter again the Leitmotiv of the 
Sermon on the Mount in the epilogue to the 
great parables uttered in Jerusalem. Noth- 
ing but the maintenance of the new morality 
in all relations of life guarantees entrance 
into the Kingdom. Hence Jesus can say to 
the Pharisee who agrees to the summary of 
this new morality as it is expressed in the 
commandment of love: Thou art not far 
from the Kingdom of God (Mk 12 »*). That 
does not mean that the Pharisee by such a 
disposition of mind has already well nigh 
risen to the height of the ** morality of the 
Kingdom. * ' For if the double commandment 
of love constituted the morality of the King- 
dom, Jesus must have said to him (since he 
entirely agreed to these commandments) : 
Thou belongest to the Kingdom. The **not 
far'' must in fact be understood in a purely 
chronological sense, not as denoting some 
small measure of perfection which the man 
still lacks. He is not far from the Kingdom 
of God because he possesses the moral qual- 
ity which will identify him as a member of 
the same when after a short space it appears. 
The **not far'' contains therefore the same 
mixture of present and future tense which we 
have remarked in the Beatitudes. 
Eeasoning from our ethical point of view 

98 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

we are inclined to apply the conception of 
reward to this relation between membership 
in the Kingdom and the new morality. This, 
however, does not completely render the 
thonght of Jesus, which had to do above all 
with the immediateness of the transition from 
the condition of moral renewal into the super- 
moral perfection of the Kingdom of God. 
Whosoever at the dawning of the Eongdom 
is in possession of a character morally reno- 
vated, he will be found a member of the same. 
This is the adequate expression for the re- 
lation of morality to the coming Kingdom of 
God. 

« 

2. The Ethics of Jesus and Modern Ethics. 

The depth of Jesus* religious ethics en- 
courages us to expect that we can find our 
own modem-ethical consciousness reflected in 
it. With respect to its eternal inward truth 
it is indeed independent of history and un- 
conditioned by it, since it already contains 
the highest ethical thoughts of all times. 
Nevertheless there exists a great difference 
between Jesus' sentiment and ours. Modem 
ethics is ** unconditional,** since it creates of 
itself the new ethical situation, — the presump- 
tion being that this situation will evolve unto 
final perfection. Ethics is here an end in it- 

99 



^^-:.Cv^^l^ 



OJx--** ^-^ 



THE MYSTERY OF 

self, inasmuch as the moral perfection of 
mankind comes to the same thing as the per- 
fection of the Kingdom of God. That is 
Kant^s thought This self-sufficiency of 
ethics (which however, exacts a certain resig- 
nation in view of the distant consummation) 
shows that the modem-Christian theory is 
permeated by Hellenistic-rationalistic ideas 
and has undergone a development of two mil-^ 
lenniums. 
— The ethics of Jesus on the other hand is 
"conditional,*' in the sense that it stands in 
indissoluble connection with the expectation 
of a state of perfection which is to be super- 
naturally brought about. Thereby its Jew- 
ish origin is revealed, and its immediate 
connection with the Prophetic ethics, in which 
the moral conduct of the people was condi- 
tioned by a definite expectation. Hence, if 
any parallel at all may be adduced in expla- 
nation of the ethics of Jesus, it can be only 
the Prophetic, never the modem. For in 
proportion as the latter enters into it the 
mode of conception becomes unhistorical, 
Jesus' ethics being treated as self-sufficient, 
whereas in fact it is oriented entirely by the 
expected supernatural consummation. 
So there has been created the insoluble 

100 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

problem, that a person thoroughly modem so 
far as his ethics is concerned should inci- 
dentally give utterance to eschatological ex- 
pressions. But if we once perceive the con- 
ditional character of Jesus' ethics, and ser- 
iously consider its connection with the ethics 
of the Prophets, it is immediately clear that 
all conceptions of the Kingdom as a growth 
out of small beginnings, all notions about an 
ethics of the Kingdom, or about the develop- 
ment of it, have been foisted upon Jesus by 
our modern consciousness — simply because 
we could not readily familiarise ourselves 
with the thought that the ethics of Jesus is 
conditional. 

We make him conceive of the Kingdom of 
God as if its historical realisation repre- 
sented a narrow opening through which it 
had to squeeze before attaining the full sta- 
ture which belongs to it. That is a modem 
conception. For Jesus and the Prophets, 
however, it was a thing impossible. In the 
immediateness of their ethical view there is 
no place for a morality of the Kingdom of 
God or for a development of the Kingdom 
— ^it lies beyond the borders of good and evil ; 
it will be brought about by a cosmic catastro- 
phe through which evil is to be completely 

101 



THE MYSTERY OF 

overcome. Hence all moral criteria are to 
be abolished. The Kingdom of God is super- 
moral. 

To this height of hyper-ethical idealism the 
modem consciousness is no longer capable of 
soaring. History has aged ns too much for 
that. But for the historical understanding 
of the ethics of Jesus it is the indispensable 
assumption. 

In addition to this, when we think of the 
Kingdom, our thought stretches forward to 
the coming generations which are to realise 
it in ever increasing measure. Jesus' glance 
is directed backward. For him the Kingdom 
is composed of the generations which have 
already gone down to the grave and which 
are now to be awakened unto a state of per- 
fection. How should there be for him any 
ethics of sexual relations, when he explains 
to the Sadducees that in the Kingdom of God 
after the great Eesurrection there will be no 
longer any sexu£d relations at all, "but they 
will be like the angels of heaven *' (Mk 10 ^^) I 

Every ethical form of Jesus, be it never so 
perfect, leads therefore only up to the fron- 
tier of the Kingdom of God, while every 
trace of a path disappears so soon as one 
advances upon the new territory. There one 
needs it no more. 

102 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

We have a prejudice against this concep- 
tion of conditional ethics. It is an unjusti- 
fied prejudice if it is due to a suspicion that 
Jesus * ethics is thereby disparaged. Exactly 
the opposite is the case. For this condition- 
ality springs from an absolute ethical ideal- 
ism, which postulates for the expected state 
of perfection conditions of existence which 
are themselves ethical. In our unconditional 
and self-suflScing ethics we, however, assume 
that the conflict between good and evil must 
go on forever, as belonging constantly to the 
nature of the ethical. Ethics and theology 
do not stand for us in the same lively rela- 
tionship as they do with Jesus. The vivid- 
ness of the colours of the absolute ethical 
idealism has been faded by history. So, to 
render the ethics of Jesus unconditional and 
self-sufficing is not only unhistorical, but it 
means also the degradation of his ethical 
idealism. 

On one point, however, our ethical senti- 
ment is justified in its prejudice. If ethics 
has to do only with the expectation of the 
supernatural consummation, its actual worth 
is diminished, since it is merely individual 
ethics and is concerned only with the relation 
of each single .person to the Kingdom of God. 
The thought, however, that the moral com- 

103 



THE MYSTERY OF 

munity whicli has been constituted by Jesns ' 
preaching must as such be in some way the 
effective first stage in the realisation of the 
Kingdom of God — ^this thought belongs not 
alone to our ethical sentiment, but it ani- 
mated also the preaching of Jesus, for he 
wrought out in strong relief the social char- 
acter of his ethics. This explains the reluc- 
tance one feels to admit that the eschato* 
logical idea of the Kingdom of God lay at 
the basis of Jesus* preaching from beginning 
to end, since then one cannot explain how the 
new moral community which he formed about 
himself was in his thought organically con- 
nected with the Kingdom which was super- 
naturally to appear. 

One glides here xmintentionally into a 
modem line of thought. The idea of de- 
velopment furnishes what we want, allowing 
us to conceive of the moral community as 
an initial stage which by constant growth, 
extensive and intensive, is ever approaching 
the final stage. The gradually widening cir- 
cle represents, however, a modem way of 
viewing history. It is completely foreign to 
Jesus. Yet even though he cannot have made 
use of this explanation of ours, the fact that 
this new community stands in an organic re- 
lation with the final stage was for him as 

104 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

certain as for ns. But because lie expected 
this final stage as a purely supernatural 
event the connection was not to be appre- 
hended by human reflection, rather it was a 
divine secret, which he illuminated only by 
pointing to analogies in the processes of na^ 
ture. 



105 



CHAPTER IV 

THE SEGBBX OF THE KIKQDOM OF OOD 

1. The Parables of the Secret of the King- 
dom of God. 

We have to do here with the * * secret of the 
Kingdom of God^* (Mk 4 ^^), which is dealt 
with in the parables of the sower, of the 
self.growing seed, of the grain of mustard, 
and of the leaven. We commonly find in 
these parables the illustration of a constant 
and gradually unfolding through which the 
petty initial stage of a development is con- 
nected with the glorious final stage. The 
seed that is sown already contains the har- 
vest, inasmuch as each seed is devised for the 
production of plant and fruit. They develop 
from the seed by natural law. So it is like- 
wise with the development of the Kingdom of 
God from small and obscure beginnings. 

This attractive interpretation of the para- 
bles takes from them, however, the character 
of secrets, for the illustration of a steady un- 
folding through the processes of nature is no 
secret. Hence it is that we fail to under- 
stand what the secret is in these parables. 

106 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

We interpret them according to our scien- 
tific knowledge of nature which enables us to 
unite even such different stages as these by 
the conception of development. 

By reason of the immediateness with which 
the unschooled spirit of olden time observed 
the world, nature had, however, still secrets 
to offer, — ^in the fact, namely, that she pro- 
duced two utterly distinct conditions in a 
sequence, the connection of which was just 
a^ certain as it was inexplicable. This im- 
mediateness is the note of Jesus' parables. 
The conception of development in nature 
which is contemplated in the modem explana- 
tion is not at all brought into prominence, 
but the exposition is rather devised to place 
the two conditions so immediately side by 
side that one is, compelled to raise the ques- 
tion. How can the final stage proceed from 
the initial stage t 

1. A man sowed seed. A great part of the 
seed was lost on account of circumstances the 
most diverse — and yet the produce of the 
com which fell upon good ground was so 
great that it restored the seed sown thirty, 
sixty, even an hundred fold. 

The detailed interpretation of the descrip- 
tion of this loss, and the application to par- 
ticular classes of men, as it lies before us in 

107 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Mk 4 ^^'^^' is the product of a later view 
whicli perceived no longer any secret in the 
parable. Originally, however, the single 
points of the description were not independ- 
ent, but the seed which was lost upon the 
path, or upon the stony ground, or among the 
thorns, together with that which the fowls 
of heaven devoured, constituted altogether 
a unified contrast to that which fell upon 
good ground. The manner in which it was 
destroyed has no importance for the par- 
able. In spite of the description so won- 
derfully wrought out, this saying of Jesus 
expresses one single thought : So small, con- 
sidering all that was lost, was the sowing; 
and yet the harvest so great! — Therein lies 
the secret. 

2. A man scattered seed upon the ground. 
He slept, went about his affairs, and con- 
cerned himself no further about the seed. 
Before he realised it the harvest stood al- 
ready in the field, and he could send his ser- 
vants to gather it in. How did it come to 
pass that after the seed was sunk in the 
earth the ground of itself brought forth the 
blade, the ear, and the full com I — That is 
the secret. 

3. A grain of mustard seed was sown; 
from it sprouted a great shrub, with 

108 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

branches under which the birds of the heaven 
could lodge. How did it come to pass, since 
the mustard seed is so small f — That is the 
secret. 

4. A woman added a little leaven to a great 
mass of dough. Afterwards the whole lump 
was "leaven.'* How can a little leaven lea- 
ven a whole great lump 1 — ^That is the secret 

These parables are not at all devised to 
be interpreted and understood; rather they 
are calculated to make the hearers observant 
of the fact that in the affairs of the Kingdom 
of God a secret is preparing like that which 
they experience in nature. They are signals. 
As the harvest follows upon the seed-sowing, 
without it being possible for any one to say 
how it comes about; so, as the sequel to 
Jesus' preaching, will the Kingdom of God 
come with power. Small as is the circle 
which he gathers about himself in compari- 
son with the greatness of God's Kingdom, 
it is none the less certain that the Kingdom 
will come as a consequence of this moral re- 
newal, restricted as it is in scope. It is no 
less confidently to be expected than that the 
seed, which while he speaks is slumbering in 
the ground, will bring forth a glorious har- 
vest. Watch not only for the harvest, but 
watch for the Kingdom of God! — so speaks 

109 



THE MYSTERY OF 

the spiritual sower to the Galileans at the 
season of the seed-sowing. They ought to 
have the presentiment that the moral renewal 
in consequence of his preaching stands in a 
necessary but inexplicable connection with 
the dawning of the Kingdom of God. The 
same God who through his mysterious 
power in nature brings the harvest to pass 
will also bring to pass the Kingdom of 
God. 

Therefore, when it was the season of the 
harvest, he sent his Disciples forth to pro- 
claim: The Kingdom of God is at hand. 

2. The Secret of the Kingdom of God in the 
Address to the People after the Mission 
of the Twelve. 

Jesus was alone. The Disciples carried 
the news of the nearness of the Kingdom 
throughout the cities of Israel. "While the 
people thronged him there came the emis- 
saries of the Baptist with their question. 
He dismissed them with the answer: the 
Kingdom stands before the door, one needs 
only the language of the signs and wonders 
in order to understand. Turning to the peo- 
ple he speaks of the significance of the Bap- 
tist and of his oflfice. With this he lets drop 
a hint of mystery (Mt 11 ^*» **If you are able 

110 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

to conceive it,** Mt 11 ^^' **he that hath ears 
to hear, let him hear"). John is Elijah, i. e. 
the personality whose advent marks the im- 
mediate dawning of the Kingdom. **From 
the days of John the Baptist until this mo- 
ment the Kingdom of Heaven snffereth vio- 
lence, and men of violence take it by force. 
For all the Prophets and the Law prophesied 
nntil John; and, if ye are able to conceive it, 
this is Elijah, which is to come. He hath 
ears to hear, let him hear** (Mt 11 "•^*). 

This saying resists all exegesis, for it does 
not in the least contain the thought that the 
individuals gain access to the Kingdom by 
force. What might that mean anyway? In 
what sense does that come to pass from the 
days of the Baptist on? The picture which 
Jesus employs is unintelligible if it has to 
do with the entrance of individuals into the 
Kingdom. It remains just as incomprehen- 
sible, however, if it is supposed to refer to 
the realisation of the Kingdom through 
gradual development. In the first place, the 
image of an act of violence contradicts the 
notion of development; in the second place, 
the beginning of this compelling force must 
be dated not from John but from Jesus. 

It is a question of the secret of the King- 
dom of God, — Whence the hint: He that hath 

111 



THE MYSTERY OP 

ears to hear, let him hear. This phrase oc- 
curs only in connection with the parables of 
the secret of the Kingdom and as the con- 
clusion of apocalyptic sayings (cf. the use of 
the expression in the Apocalypse : 2 ^' ^^ ^^' ^*' 
3 6, 18, 22)^ Eepentance and moral renewal in 
prospect of the Kingdom of God are like a 
pressure which is exerted in order to com- 
pel its appearance. This movement had be- 
gun with the days of the Baptist. The men 
of violence who take it by force are they 
which put into practice the moral renewal. 
They draw it with power down to the earth. 
The saying in the speech about the Baptist 
and the parables of the Kingdom of God 
mutually explain and supplement one another. 
The parables bring chiefly into prominence 
the incommensurateness of the relation be- 
tween the moral renewal that is practised 
and the consummation of the Kingdom of 
God, while the image in the speech after the 
Mission dwells more upon the compelling con- 
nection between the two. 

3. The Secret of the Kingdom of God in the 
Light of the Prophetic and Jewish Eoo- 
pectation. 

Jesus' ethics is closely connected with that 
of the Old Testament prophets, inasmuch as 

112 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

both are alike conditioned by the expecta- 
tion of a state of perfection which God is to 
bring about. But also the secret of the 
Kingdom of God, according to which the 
moral renewal hastens the supernatural 
coming of the Kingdom, corresponds with the 
fundamental thought of the Prophets. In 
the case of the Prophets, the relation be- 
tween the moral reform which they would 
bring about and the glorious condition which 
God will bring to pass at the Day of Judg- 
ment is not that of a mere temporal sequence, 
but it rests upon a supernatural causal con- 
nection. Godless behaviour brings nearer 
the Day of Judgment and of condemtiation. 
Therefore, God chastises the people and gives 
them into the hand of their oppressors. 
When, however, they determine to reform 
their ways, when they seek refuge in him 
alone with trusting faith, when righteousness 
and truth prevail among them, then will the 
Lord deliver them from their oppressors, and 
his glory will be manifest over Israel, to 
whom the heathen will do service. In that 
day there will then be peace poured out over 
the whole world, over nature as well as man. 
After the Exile this thought was still 
operative in the conception of the Law. By 
the observance of the Law the promised glor- 

113 



THE MYSTERY OF 

ions estate will be wrong from God. Not the- 
individual but the collectivity, influences God 
through the Law. This generic mode of 
thought is the primary, the individual mode 
is secondary. ** Israel would be redeemed if 
only it observed two Sabbaths faithfully** 
(Schabbath 118&. Wiinsche, System der 
altsynagogalen Paldstinensischen Theologie, 
1880, p. 299). Here we meet with the early 
prophetic thought in legalistic form. 

In general, however, it was the indivi- 
dualistic view which prevailed later. The 
Law, and moral conduct in general, were 
only the preparation for the expected estate 
of glory. The lively generic view of the 
prophets was replaced by individualistic and 
lifeless conception. Eschatology became a 
problem of accounting and ethics became 
casuistry. 

Jesus, however, reached back after the 
fundamental conception of the prophetic 
period, and it is only the form in which he 
conceives of the emergence of the final event 
which bears the stamp of later Judaism. He 
no longer conceives of it as an intervention 
of God in the history of the nations, as did 
the Prophets; but rather as a final cosmicai 
catastrophe. His eschatology is the apoo< 

114 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

alyptio of the book of Daniel, since the King- 
dom is to be brought about by the Son of 
Man when he appears upon the clouds of 
heaven (MkS^^Q^). 

The secret of the Kingdom of God is there- 
fore the synthesis effected fey. a sovereign 
spirit between the early prophetic ethics and 
the apocalyptic of the hook of Daniel. 
Hence it is that Jesus ^ eschatology was 
rooted in his age and yet stands so high 
above it. For his contemporaries it was a 
question of waiting for the Kingdom, of ex- 
cogitating and depicting every incident of the 
great catastrophe, and of preparing for the 
same; while for Jesus it was a question of 
bringing to pass the expected event through 
the moral renovation. Eschatological ethics 
is transformed into ethical eschatology. 

4. The Secret of the Kingdom of God and 
the Assumption of a Fortu/nate Galilean 
Period. 

According to the secret of the Kingdom of 
God, the coming of the Kingdom is not de- 
pendent upon the broad success of Jesus' 
preaching. Indeed, he expressly emphasises 
the fact that the limitation of the circle which 
performs the moral renovation stands in no 

115 



THE MYSTERY OF 

relation whatever to the all-embracing great- 
ness of the Kingdona which is to come about by 
reason of their conduct. It suffices that a 
scanty part of the seed falls upon good 
ground — ^and the overplentiful harvest is 
there, through God^s power. Not by the 
multitude but by the men of violence is the 
Kingdom compelled to appear. 

Hence the secret of the Kingdom of God 
makes the assumption of a fortunate 
Galilean period entirely superfluous. Jesus 
can enjoy the expectation of the speedy reali- 
sation of the Kingdom even when he exper- 
iences the greatest illsuccess and when whole 
districts close themselves against his preach- 
ing. They do not thereby delay the coming 
of the Kingdom of God but only deliver 
themselves to the judgment, for the King- 
dom comes necessarily by reason of the 
moral renewal of the circle which gathered 
about Jesus. 

The justice of this interpretation of the 
secret of the Kingdom of God is shown 
therefore, in the fact that it renders unneces- 
sary, as an explanation of Jesus' life, an as- 
sumption which is otherwise absolutely un- 
avoidable but cannot in any way be histori- 
cally confirmed. 

116 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

5. The Secret of the Kingdom of God and the 
Universalism of Jesus. 

So long as the moral renewal upon the 
basis of Jesus' preaching is brought into re- 
lation with tiie realisation of the Kingdom 
through the modem thought of evolutionary 
development the factor correlative to the 
perfection of the Kingdom is likewise 
modem, that is, ** humanity as a moral 
whole. ' ' One attributes then to Jesus ' reflec- 
tion upon the growth of the new moral com- 
munity which he founded, foresight of its gra- 
dual extension till it embraces the whole of 
Israel — ^here, however, the thought of Jesus 
stops ; one may not attribute to him universa- 
listic ideas, for the commission to the Disci- 
ples shows that he did not reflect about a 
moral renewal beyond the borders of Israel. 
(Mt 10 ^» ®) : Go into any way of the Gentiles, 
and enter not into any city of the Samaritans : 
but go rather to the lost sheep of the house 
of Israel. 

The preaching of the Kingdom of God is 
therefore particularistic; the Kingdom it- 
self, however, is universalistic, **for they 
shall come from the east and from the west, 
from the north and from the south." The 
generation which required a miracle shall ex- 

117 



THE MYSTERY OF 

perience such: The Ninevites shall arise at 
the Day of Judgment and condemn it^ because 
they repented at the preaching of Jonah, 
'*and here is a greater than Jonah.'* Also 
the Queen of the South shall rise in judg- 
ment against the contemporaries of Jesus, 
because she came from the ends of the earth 
to hear the wisdom of Solomon, * * and behold, 
a greater than Solomon is here'* (Mt 12 *^ 

For the modern consciousness, because it 
applies to everything the rubrics of evolu- 
tion, there is an insuperable contradiction 
between the particularism of the preaching 
of the Kingdom and the uidversalism of ita 
consummation. In the secret of the Eang- 
dom of God, however, particularism and 
universalism go together. The Kingdom 
is universalistic, for it arises out of a 
cosmic act by which God awakes unto glory 
the righteous of all times and of all peoples. 
The bringing about of the Kingdom, on the 
other hand, is dependent upon particularism, 
for it is to be forced to approach by the moral 
renewal of the contemporaries of Jesu8. 
Salvation comes out of Israel. '^ 6 



118 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

6. The Secret of the Kingdom of God and 
Jesus' Attitude towards the Law and the 
State. 

Jesus did not declare himself either for the 
Law or against it. He recognised it simply 
as an existing fact without binding himself 
to it. He felt no obligation to decide in prin- 
ciple whether it was to be regarded as bind- 
ing or as not binding. For him this was a 
question of no practical importance. The 
real concern was the new morality, not the 
Law. This Law was for him holy and inviol- 
able in so far as it pointed the way to the 
new morality. But therewith it did away 
with itself, for in the Kingdom which comes 
into being on account of the new morality the 
Law is abrogated, since the accomplished 
condition is super-legal and super-ethical. Up 
to this point it had a right to last. Whether 
the Law should also be binding upon his 
followers in the future was a question which 
did not exist for Jesus ; it was history which 
first proposed this problem to the primitive 
Church. 

It was the same with regard to the State. 
The question which was put to him in the 
Jerusalem days had for him no practical im- 
portance. As he replied to the Pharisees' 
question, whether one should give tribute to 

119 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Caesar, he had no thought of defining his at-' 
titude towards the State or determining that 
of his followers. How could any one be con- 
cerned at all about such things I The State 
was simply earthly, therefore ungodly, do- 
minination. Its duration extended, there- 
fore, only to the dawn of God^s dominion.^ 
As this was near at hand, what need had one 
to decide if one would be tributary tb'M;^ 
world-power or nof One might as well sub- 
mit to it, its end was in fact near. Give to 
Caesar what is Caesar's and to God what is 
God's (Mk 12 ^'') — ^this word is uttered with 
a sovereign irony against the Pharisees, who 
understood so little the signs of the time that 
this still appeared to them a question of im- 
portance. They are just as foolish in the 
matter of the Kingdom of God as the Sad- 
ducees with their catch-question to which hus- 
band the seven times married wife should be- 
long at the resurrection ; for they, too, leave 
one thing out of account — ^the power of God 
(Mk 12 2^). 

7. The Modern Element in Jesus^ Escha- 
tology. 

^*Let it be the maxim in every scientific in- 
vestigation for one to pursue undisturbed 
the due course of it with all possible exacti- 

120 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tude and frankness, not considering what it^ 
may collide with outside of its own field, bnt 
following it out, so far as one can, truly and 
completely for itself alone. Frequent obser- 
vation has convinced me that whei^ one has 
brought this task to an end, that which in 
the midst of it appeared to me for the time 
being very questionable with respect to other 
teaching outside, if only I closed my eyes to 
this questionableness and attended merely to 
my task till it was finished, finally in unex- 
pected wise proved to be in perfect agree- 
ment with those very teachings, — ^though the 
truth had presented itself without the least 
reference to those teachings, without partial- 
ity and prejudice for them.'* (Footnote. 
Kritik der p,raktischen Vernunft. Ed. Ee- 
clam, p. 129.) 

Kant uttered this profound word at the 
moment when the correspondence of the no^- 
tion of transcendental freedom with the prac- 
tical first occurred to him. The case is the 
same with the relation of Jesus* ethics to his 
eschatology. It is a postulate of our Chris- 
tian conviction that the ethics of Jesus in its 
basic thoughts is modem. Hence we come 
back again and again to the search after 
the modern element in his ethics, and for this 
cause we force into the background his es- 

121 



^ 



THE MYSTERY OF 

chatology, since it appears to us nnmodem. 
If, however, one resolves to ignore for a mo- 
ment this interest, which is so deeply 
grounded in our being and so well justified, 
and regards the relation of Jesus' eschatol- 
ogy to his ethics simply for itself, as a purely 
historical question, the investigation brings 
to light the astonishing result that the latter 
(i. e. Jesus' ethics) is modem in a far higher 
degree than any one hitherto has dared to 
hope. Jesus' ethics is modem, not because 
the eschatology can be reduced somehow to a 
mere accompaniment, but precisely because 
the ethics is absolutely dependent upon this 
eschatology I The fact is, this eschatology it- 
self, as it is exhibited in the secret of the 
Kingdom of God, is thoroughly modern, raas- 
much as it is dominated by the thought that 
the Kingdom of God is to come by reason of 
the religious-moral renovation which the be- 
lievers perform. Every moral-religious per- 
formance is therefore labour for the coming 
of the Kingdom of God. 

As the eschatology in this ethical-eschato- 
logical Weltanschauung gradually faded in 
the course of history, there remained an ethi- 
cal Weltanschauung in which the eschatology 
persisted in the form of an imperishable 
faith in the final triumph of the good. The 

123 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

secret of the Eangdom of Gtod contains the 
secret of the whole Christian Weltans- 
chaunng. The ethical eschatology of Jesus 
is the heroic form in which the modem- 
Christian Weltanschannng first entered into 
history I 



12S 



CHAPTER V 

THE SEGBET OF THE KINGDOM OF OOD IN THB 
THOUGHT OF THE PASSION 

In the last period of his life Jesus again 
tittered parables of the Kingdom of God: 
God's vineyard (Mt 21 ^^**®) ; the royal mar- 
riage (Mt 21 ^'^^) ; the servant watching (Mt 
24 *2-*7) . the ten virgins (Mt 25 ^•^^) the tal- 
ents (Mt 25 ^^'^^). 

These parables, in contrast to those about 
the secret of the Kingdom, contain no secret, 
but rather they are teaching parables pure 
and simple, from which a moral is to be 
drawn. The Kingdom of God is near. 
Those only will be found to belong to it 
who by their moral conduct are prepared for 
it. 

The second period contains instead the 
secret of the Passion. Jesus' utterances, as 
we have seen, point to a mysterious causal 
connection between the Passion and the com- 
ing of the Kingdom, because the eschatology 
and the thought of the Passion always emerge 
side by side, and the Disciples' expectation 
of the future is in every case roused to the 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Hghest pitch by the proclamation of his 
suffering. 

The secret of the Passion takes up, there- 
fore, the secret of the Kingdom of God and 
carries it further. To the moral renewal 
which, according to the secret of the Kling- 
dom of God, exercises a compelling power 
npon the coming of the Kingdom, there is 
adjoined another factor — the redeeming death 
of Jesus. That completes the penitence of 
those who believe in the coming of the King- 
dom. Therewith Jesus comes to the aid of 
the men of violence who are compelling the 
approach of the Kingdom. The power which 
he thereby exerts is the highest conceivable 
—he gives up his life. 

The idea of the Passion is therefore the 
transformation of the secret of the Kingdom 
of God. . Hence it is no more designed to be 
understood than are the parables of the se- 
cret of the Kingdom. In each case it is a 
question of a fact which can be probed no 
further. 

The connection between the thought of the 
Passion and the secret of the Kingdom of 
God guarantees the continuity of Jesus' 
world of thought. All constructions which 
have been devised with a view to establish- 
ing this continuity have proved insufficient to 

126 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

accomplish what was expected of them. The 
acceptance of the thought of the Passion 
means in all cases a complete change in his 
idea of the Kingdom and in his Weltan- 
schauung. If, however, one places the 
thought of the Passion in the great context 
of the secret of the Kingdom of God, the 
continuity is furnished naturally. The 
thought of the supernatural introduction of 
the Kingdom of God runs through the whole 
of Jesus' life: the idea of the Passion is 
merely the fashion in which it is formulated 
in the second period. 

How comes it that the secret of the King- 
dom of God takes the form of the secret of 
the Passion? 

Why must the atonement of Jesus be added 
to complete the moral renewal and the pen- 
itence of the community which believes in 
the Kingdom? 

In what sense has the redeeming death of 
Jesus an influence upon the coming of- the 
Eongdom? 



X 



U6 



,/ 



CHAPTER VI 

THB CHABACTEB ASCBIBED TO JESUS ON THE 
GBOUND OF HIS PUBLIC MINISTEY 

1. The Problem and the Facts. 

The experience at the Baptism signified the 
inception of Jesus' messianic consciousness. 
In the neighbonrhood of Caesarea Philippi 
he revealed his secret to the Disciples. It 
was before the High Priest that he first 
openly made profession of his messianic of- 
fice. Therefore the messianic consciousness 
imderlay all the while his preaching of the 
Kingdom of God. But he does not assume 
on the part of his hearers any knowledge of 
the position which belonged to him. The 
faith which he required had nothing to do with 
his person, but it was due only to the mes- 
sage of the nearness of the Kingdom. It 
was the Fourth Evangelist who first pre- 
sented the history of Jesus as if it concerned 
itself chiefly with his personality. 

We cannot estimate how far his real char- 
acter may have shone through his message, 
for such as had an awakened understanding. 
One thing is certain: up to the time of the 

127 



THE MYSTERY OP 

mission of the Twelve no one had the faintest 
idea of recognising in him the Messiah. At 
CaBsarea Philippi the Disciples could only re- 
ply that the people took him for a prophet or 
for Elijah the Forenmner, and they them- 
selves knew no better, for Peter, as Jesus 
himself said, did not derive his knowledge 
from the Master's ministry in work and 
word, but owed it to a supernatural revela- 
tion. 

The Synoptical notices must be judged in 
accordance with this fundamental fact. In 
the first place, there is a series of Matthean 
passages which stand at variance with it. 

Mt 9 27-81: In the Galilean parallel to the 
healing of the blind man at Jericho it is re- 
lated that two blind men pursued him through 
the whole village with the cry, *'Son of 
David/' What Jesus means by the warn- 
ing, **See that no man knows it/' remains 
indeed obscure. 

Mt 12 28 : After a miraculous healing the 
people whisper to themselves whether this is 
not the Son of David. 

Mt 14 88; After their experience at sea 
in the boat the Disciples fall down before 
him, saying, "Truly thou art the Son of God.'' 

Mt 15 22; The Canaanitish woman ad- 
dresses him as the Son of David, — ^whereas 

128 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

according to Mark she simply falls at his 
feet and cries for help. 

All of these passages are peculiar to Mat- 
thew and belong to a secondary literary 
stratum. For the history of Jesus they have 
no importance, but a great deal for the his- 
tory of the history of Jesus. They show us, 
that is, how the later time was inclined even 
more and more to depict his life in harmony 
with the presumption that he not only knew 
himself to be the Messiah but that others also 
had this impression of him. 

In the second place, it is a question of the 
speeches of the demoniacs. According to 
Mk 3 ^^ the unclean spirits, as often as they 
saw him, threw themselves at his feet and 
addressed him as the Son of God (cf. also 
Mk 1 2^» ^'^). It is true, he rebuked this cry 
and commanded silence. But if we did not 
have the incontestably sure information that 
during the whole of his Galilean ministry the 
people knew no more than that he was a 
prophet or Elijah, we should be forced to 
assume that these cries of the demoniacs 
made the people somehow aware of his true 
character. As it is, however, we may dis- 
cern with precision, from the fact that the 
demon-cries were ignored, how very far men 
were from suspecting him to be the Messiah. 

129 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Who believed the devil and the wild speedi 
of the possessed? 

In the third place, it is a question of the ex- 
pression **Son of Man/' If Jesus used it as 
a self-designation before Caesarea Philippi, 
that would constitute in each case a mes- 
sianic suggestion, for every one must refer 
this expression of the book of Daniel to the 
person who was to characterise the last timj&. 

According to Mark, Jesus twice employed 
this expression as a self-designation lefore 
CaBsarea Philippi (Mk 2 ^°» 2 ^®), and it oc- 
curs in the same sense in a series of passages 
peculiar to Matthew (Mt 8 ^o. n i9. 12 82. 4o. 
13 ^''' *^» and 16 ^^). In judging these pas- 
sages also one must proceed from the sure 
ground which is furnished by the reply of the 
Disciples at Caesarea Philippi. 

Either Jesus had not used this expression 
up to that time, in which case these Son of 
Man passages are chronologically anticipated, 
and constitute a mere literary phenomena. 

Or else he had used the expression. Then 
he must have done so in such a way that no 
man could suppose that he assumed for him- 
self the dignity of the Son of Man of Daniel. 

The problem in the second period is still 
harder. The Disciples knew his secret, but 
they dared! reveal it to no one. But how 

ISO 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

about the people? Did they now have a pre- 
sentiment of the messianic dignity of Jesnst 
The problem has to do therefore with three 
facts : 

1. The whole discussion in the Jerusalem 
days turns in no wise upon the messianic 
dignity of Jesus, but has to do rather with 
legal propositions and with questions of the 
day. Far too little weight has been attached 
hitherto to the fact that neither the people 
nor the scribes took up a position towards him 
as the messianic personality. How different 
the Jerusalem days would have been if the 
question which agitated them was: Is he 
the Messiah — ^is he not? can he be— can he 
not? In reality he is merely the imoflScial 
authority of the Galilean people, before whom 
the scholars of the capital bring their ques- 
tions of the school, whether with a sincere 
mind, or with the perfidious intention of de- 
stroying his authority. 

2. In the second period Jesus had the 
people about him only for a few days, — from 
the crossing of the Jordan imtil his death. 
During this time he made to them no dis- 
closure about his messiahship, and gave them 
also no hint which they could and must imder- 
stand in this sense. The bribed witnesses 
know nothing of the sort to allege. What is 

131 



THE MYSTERY OF 

remarkable in their evidence — ^upon which 
too little weight has been laid— consists pre- 
cisely in the fact that they in no wise charge 
him with wishing to he the Messiah. For 
them his impious pretention exhausts itself 
in a disrespectful word about the Temple. 
Let one picture to himself what the pror 
cedure of the trial would have been if the 
hired accusers had of themselves discovered 
messianic hints in Jesus ^ speeches! 

3. From this point one arrives necessarily 
at the conclusion that up to the last moment 
he was for the people in Jerusalem just what 
he was in Galilee, — ^the great Prophet or the 
Forerunner, but in no wise the Messiah! 
There are two facts, however, which do not 
comport with this. 

The entrance into Jerusalem was — ^accord- 
ing to the common apprehension — a messianic 
ovation. Therefore the people must have had 
a^ presentiment of Jesus' dignity. 

The High Priest put to him the question, 
whether he were the Messiah. Therefore he 
knew of Jesus' claim. 

We have here a clear question to deal with : 
was Jesus regarded in the Jerusalem days 
as a messianic pretendant or no? One 
should not obscure this question by speaking 
of a more or less clear ** presentment'' in 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

this matter. The ** presentiment of the mes- 
siahship of Jesus*' is a modem invention. 
The populace would hardly be swayed hither 
and yon by a dark mysterious presentiment, 
but rather it must have been a question of 
belief or imbelief. Whosoever held that he 
was the Messiah must accompany him through 
fire and death — to glory. Whosoever held 
no such faith, but had only a presentiment 
of such a pretention on his part, must give 
the signal to stone the* blasphemer. There 
was no third course. 

The facts in general speak in favour of the 
opinion that the people and the Pharisees in 
the Jerusalem days ascribed to Jesus no mes- 
sianic pretention, — ^no more indeed than they 
did at an earlier period. Only in this case 
the entrance into Jerusalem, understood as 
a Messianic ovation, remains an enigma, and 
it is likewise unaccountable how it occurred 
to the High Priest to question him about his 
messiahship. 

On the one hand the situation must be 
understood in the way which is commonly 
assumed. Then one must renounce every 
hope of an historical understanding of the 
last public period of Jesus. It will not do 
to suppose that at the beginning of this 
period (entrance into Jerusalem) and at the 

133 



THE MYSTERY OF 

end of it (question of the High Priest at 
the trial) he was taken for the Messiah, 
while the Jerusalem days which lay in the 
interval knew nothing of this claim what- 
ever. 

Or else — ^the entrance into Jerusalem and 
the question of the High Priest have not 
been rightly and historically understood. 
Was the ovation offered to the messianic pre- 
tendant? Did the High Priest in his ques- 
tion give utterance to something which all 
knew? Did he deduce the claim of messiah- 
ship from Jesus' life, activity, and speech? — 
or did he perhaps learn through betrayal the 
innermost secret of Jesus, which since Csb- 
sarea Philippi was known only to his trusted 
intimates ? 

The problem of Jesus' messiahship in all 
its difficulty may be formulated as follows: 
How was it possible that Jesus knew himself 
as the Messiah from the beginning, and yet 
to the very last moment did not give in his 
public preaching any intimation of his mes- 
siahship? How coidd it in the long run re- 
main hidden from the people that these 
speeches were uttered out of a messianic con- 
sciousness? Jesus was a Messiah who dAir- 
ing his public ministry would not he one, did 
not need to he, and might not he, for the sake 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

of fulfilling his mission! It is th/us that his- 
tory puts the problem. 

2. Jesus is Elijah through his solidarity with 
the Son of Man. 

What character could and murst the people 
ascribe to Jesus on the ground of his public 
ministry? That is the question with which 
we have now to do. 

The Messiah and the messianic Kingdom 
belong inseparately together. Hence if 
Jesns had preached a present messianic 
Kingdom, it would have been at the same 
time incumbent upon him to indicate the 
Messiah, — ^he would have had to begin by 
legitimating himself as the Messiah before 
the people. 

The fact is, however, that he preached a 
future kingdom. With this the possibility 
was completely excluded that any one could 
suppose him to be the Messiah. If the King- 
dom was future, so also was the Messiah.. 
If Jesus nevertheless had messianic preten- 
sions, this thought was thoroughly remote 
from the people, for his preaching of the 
Kingdom excluded even the least conjecture 
of the sort. Hence even the cries of the 
demons did not avail to put the people on the 
right track. 

185 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Conjectures of that sort were rendered com- 
pletely impossible by the way in which Jesus 
spoke of the Messiah in the third person and 
as a character of the future. He intimated 
to the Disciples as he sent them upon their 
mission that the Son of Man would appear 
before they had gone through all the cities of 
Israel (Mt 10 ^s). In Mk 8 »« he gave 
promise to the people of the speedy appear- 
ing of the Son of Man for judgment and the 
coming of the Kingdom of God with power. 
In the same way at Jerusalem he still spoke 
of the judgment which the Son of Man will 
hold when he appears in his glory surrounded 
by the angels (Mt 25 ^^). 

Only the Disciples after the revelation of 
CaBsarea Philippi, and the High Priest after 
the *'Yes'' of Jesus, could trace a personal 
relation between him and the Son of Man of 
whose coming he spoke, — ^for they knew his 
secret. For his other hearers, however, 
Jesus of Nazareth and the individual who was 
the subject of his discourse, the Son of Man; 
remained two entirely distinct personalities. 

Before the people Jesus merely suggested 
the absolute solidarity between himself and 
the Son of Man whom he proclaimed. 

It was only in this form that his own gigan- 
tic personality obtruded in his preaching of 

136 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the Kingdom of God. Only lie who under 
all conditions confesses him, the proclaimer 
of the coming of the Son of Man, will be dis- 
covered as a member of the Klingdom at the 
Day of Judgment. Jesus, in fact, will inter- 
vene before God and before the Son of Man 
in his behalf (Mk 8 »«' 9 ^' Mt 10 ^^^ ss)^ One 
must be ready to give up the dearest things 
to follow him, for only so can one show one 's 
self worthy of him (Mt 10 ^'^* ^®). Hence 
Jesus is grieved when the rich young man 
cannot make up his mind to give up his riches 
in order to follow him (Mk 10 ^^), for now 
he cannot appear for him at the Day of Judg- 
ment to insure that he shall be accepted as 
a member of the Kingdom of God. Still, in 
the measureless omnipotence of God he finds 
reason to hope that this rich man will never- 
theless find entrance into the Kingdom 
(Mk 10 ^'''^^) . If this man, therefore, because 
Jesus cannot intervene in his behalf, is not 
sure *Ho inherit eternal life*' (Mk 10 ^"^ ), 
those, on the other hand who, confessing 
him and his message, endure death are 
certain to save their life, i. e. to be 
found as members of the Kingdom at the 
resurrection of the dead. (Mk 8 ^''). Hence 
in the beginning of the sermon on the 
mount he pronounces them blessed who 

1^7 



THE MYSTERY OF 

for his sake suffer reviling and persecution, 
because thereby, like the meek and the 
merciful, they are designated as members of 
the Kingdom (MtS^^'^^). 

From Jesus' standpoint, this absolute 
solidarity between God and the Son of Man 
on the one hand, and himself on the other 
presented no enigma, for it was based upon 
his messianic self consciousness ; he can speak 
thus because he is conscious of being himself 
the Son of Man. It was quite different for 
the people, and for the Disciples before the 
revelation at Caesarea Philippi. How can 
Jesus of Nazareth, in a manner so sovereignly 
self-confident, proclaim his absolute soli- 
darity with the Son of Man? This assertion 
forced the people to reflect upon his person- 
ality. Who was this whose manifestation 
mightily extended out of the pre-messianio 
and into the messianic aeon itself, so that God 
and the Son of Man receive into the Kingdom 
such as had confessed him, if this confession 
did not lose its value by reason of the defect 
of moral worthiness, as he himself once ex- 
pressly declared by way of warning? Such 
importance as Jesus claimed for himself be- 
longed to only one personality, — ^Elijah, the 
mighty Forerunner, — for his manifestation 
stretched out of tl^^e present into the mes- 

138 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

sianic aBon and bound both together. Hence 
the people held that Jesus was Elijah. In 
this was expressed the highest estimate which 
Jesus' personality could wring from the 
masses. In this case it is not a question of 
one of the customary misunderstandings so 
beloved of the secondary Gospel narrators, 
but the people could not, from Jesus' appear- 
ance and proclamation, come to any other 
conclusion about him. 

3. Jesus is Elijah through the Signs which 
proceed from Him. 

In order to render intelligible the attitude 
of Jesus ' contemporaries towards himself and 
his work, we must rid ourselves of two false 
presuppositions with which we constantly 
though unconsciously operate. First, the ex- 
pectation at that time was not fixed upon the 
Messiah but upon the Forerunner promised 
by prophecy. Secondly, np one in any way 
detected this Forerunner in the person of the 
Baptist. Both of our presuppositions run 
precisely to the contrary effect, and thereby 
we spoil our historical perspective. 

The appearing of the Messiah in conjunc- 
tion with the great crisis which he brings 
about constitutes the supernatural drama 
which the world awaits. But before the cur- 

139 



THE MYSTERY OP 

tain rises there must arise among the expec- 
tant sons of men the man who is to speak 
the prologue of the piece ; who then, so soon 
as the curtain is lifted, associates himself 
with the celestial personages which conduct 
the action of the drama. Hence men are in 
expectancy first of all not for the rising of 
the curtain and the appearing of the Messiah 
but for the speaker of the prologue. It was 
important to signalise the entrance of the 
Forerunner upon the stage in order to know 
to what hour the hand of the world clock 
pointed. 

Elijah, however, had not as yet appeared, 
for the Baptist had not legitimated himself 
as such. He lacked to this end the display 
of supernatural power. Signs and wonders, 
however, belonged necessarily to the epoch 
which immediately preceded the Kingdom. 
A general pouring out of the Spirit and 
prophesying, wonders in heaven and upon 
earth, — all that was to occur before the Day 
of God comes. So it was defined by the 
prophet Joel (3 ^^ ff.). Peter in his sermon 
at Pentecost appealed to this passage 
(Acts 2 i''-22). One ought to recognise from 
the supernatural ecstatic ** tongues '* that one 
is approaching the end of the days. The 
crucified Jesus hath God raised up to be the 

140 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Messiah in the Eesurrection, and the King- 
dom will soon dawn. 

This passage in Joel was therefore ap- 
plied to the time inmiediately preceding the 
messianic age, the time of miracles, in which 
according to the prophecy of Malachi the 
Forerunner should appear (Mai 3 ^'' ^*). 
Moreover, the selfsame refrain unites these 
two fundamental passages of pre-messianic 
expectation : Mai 4 ^ is the same as Joel 2 ^'^ 
— ^'^ Before the coming of the great and ter- 
rible Day of the Lord/' The Forerunner 
without miracles in an unmiraculous age was 
therefore unthinkable. 

For the contemporaries the characteristic 
difference between John and Jesus consisted 
precisely in the fact that the one simply 
pointed to the nearness of the Kingdom of 
God while the other confirmed his preaching 
by signs and wonders. Men had the con- 
sciousness of entering with Jesus upon the 
age of miracles. He was the Baptist, — ^but 
the Baptist, as it were, translated into the 
supernatural. After the mission of the 
Twelve, as his emergence and his signs be- 
came known abroad together with the news 
of the death of the Baptist, people said: 
The Baptist is raised from the dead. Hence 
the Disciples answered him at Caesarea Phil- 

141 



THE MYSTERY OF 

ippi tliat men took him for Elijah or for the 
Baptist (Mk 8 ^®). Herod as he heard of 
him would not give up the notion that he 
was the Baptist: **The Baptist is risen from 
the dead, and therefore do these powers 
work in him'' (Mk 6 ^^). 

Also the significance which Jesns ascribed 
to the signs must have led his hearers to sup- 
pose that they were in the midst of the era 
of the Forerunner. Their significance con- 
sisted, namely, in the fact that they con- 
firmed the nearness of the messianic King- 
dom. The people ought to believe him for 
the sake of the signs and repent imto the 
Kingdom of God. 

The signs are an act of God's grace 
through which he would make men aware 
what hour it is. Whosoever does not repent 
is damned. So it comes to pass with the in- 
habitants of Chorazin, Bethsaida, and Caper- 
naum. But whosoever blasphemes against 
the Holy Ghost and ascribes the signs to the 
power of ungodliness has no forgiveness in 
eternity. The scribes from Jerusalem made 
themselves guilty in Galilee of this offence 
(Mk 3 22 ff.). Those, however, who did not 
harden themselves held that the Kingdom of 
God stands at the door and that Jesus is the 
Forerunner, because they had evidently en- 

142 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tered the age of signs which the Scripture 
had prophesied. 

4. The Victory over Demons and the Secret 
of the Kingdom of God. 

For Jesus the signs signified the nearness 
of the Kingdom in a sense still higher than 
the purely temporal, chronological nearness. 
By his victory over the demons he was con- 
scious of influencing the coming of it. The 
secret of the Kingdom of God plays into this 
conception. The thought is contained in the 
parable with which he repels the false sus- 
picions of the Jerusalem scribes (Mk 3 ^^' ^^). 

The meaning of this parable is, in fact, 
not exhausted by the thought that the argu- 
ment that evil spirits do not undermine 
their own dominion by rising up one against 
another. In the concluding word we en- 
counter unexpectedly the **now and then^' 
which is characteristic of the secret of the 
Kingdom of God : * * No one can enter into the 
house of the strong man and spoil his goods, 
except he first bind the strong man, and then 
he will spoil his house. ^ * The casting out of 
demons, therefore, signified for Jesus the 
binding of the power of ungodliness and 
rendering it harmless. Hence this activity, 
like the moral renewal in the secret of the 

148 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Kingdom, stands in cansal relation with the 
dawning of the Kingdom of God. Through 
his conquest of the demons Jesus is the man 
of violence who compels the approach of the 
Kingdom. For when the power of ungodli- 
ness is bound, then comes the moment when 
the domilnion shall be taken from it. In or- 
der that this may happen it must first be 
rendered harmless. Hence in sending the 
Disciples upon their mission Jesus not only 
commands them to proclaim the nearness of 
the Kingdom, but he also gives them author- 
ity over the demons (Mt 10 ^). In that mo- 
ment of highest eschatological expectation he 
sends them out as the men of violence who 
are to deal the last blow. The repentance 
which is to be accomplished by their preach- 
ing, and the overcoming of the power of un- 
godliness in the demoniacs, work together 
for the hastening of the Kingdom. 

Thus the parables of the secret of the 
Kingdom (Mk 4), the parable in Jesus' apo- 
logy to the Pharisees (Mk 3 ^^* ^^), and the 
parable in the eulogy of the Baptist (Mt 11 
12. 15) all express the same thought. The two 
latter correspond even in the drastic image of 
violent action, whence the notion of ** rob- 
bery *' is common to them both (Mk 3 ^'^* Mt 11 

144 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

For Jesus ^ consciousness the healing of 
the demoniacs was therefore a part of 
the secret of the Kingdom of God. It suf- 
ficed for the people, however, to grasp the 
purely chronological connection, 

5. Jesus and the Baptist. 

We have seen above that no one could 
recognise Elijah in the person of the Baptist 
because his ministry and preaching without 
miracle did not correspond with the Scrip- 
tural representation of the Forerunner's 
time. None thought of ascribing to him this 
office and dignity except — for there was one 
exception — Jesus I He it was that first gave 
the people a mysterious hint that this man 
was the Forerunner: ** If ye are willing to 
receive it, he himself is Elijah, the coming- 
one '^ (Mt 11 ^*). He is aware, however, that 
with this he is giving utterance to an in- 
comprehensible secret which to his hearers 
remains just as obscure as the word uttered 
in the same connection about the man of 
violence who since the days of the Baptist 
compel the Kingdom (Mt 11 ^^). Hence he 
concludes both these sayings with the orac- 
ular phrase : He that hath ears to hear, let 
him hear (Mt 11 ^^). 

The people, however, were very far from 

145 



THE MYSTERY OF 

comprehending that this Baptist who had 
fallen into the hands of Herod could be. the 
prodigious personality who was to stand upon 
the threshold between the premessianic and 
the messianic age. So the mysterious word 
of Jesus died upon the air, and the people 
stuck to the opinion that John was really a 
prophet (Mk 11 ^^). 

The rulers also could reach no conclusion 
about the personality of the Baptist. For 
this reason they were worsted in their col- 
loquy with Jesus when they would challenge 
him for his purifying of the Temple 
(Mk 11 53). 

The case was quite the same with the Dis- 
ciples: they were incapable by themselves 
of recognising in John the expected Elijah. 
On the descent from the Mount of Trans- 
figuration they were assailed by scruples 
about the messiahship of Jesus and about the 
possibility of the resurrection of the dead 
which Jesus had touched upon in his dis- 
course. This assumed, indeed, that the mes- 
sianic era was already present, and this could 
not yet have dawned, for ** Elijah must first 
come, as the scribes demonstrate '* (Mk 9 ®'^^). 
Thereupon Jesus replied to them that John 
was this Elijah, even though he was delivered 
into the power of men (Mk 9 ^^* ^^). 

146 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

How did Jesus arrive at the conviction 
that the Baptist was Elijah! It was through 
a necessary inference from his own messiah- 
ship. Because he knew himself to be the 
Messiah, the other must be Elijah. Between 
the two ideas there was a necessary corre- 
spondence. No one could know that the Bap- 
tist was Elijah except he derived this cogni- 
sance from the Messiahship of Jesus. No 
one could arrive at the thought that John was 
Elijah without at the same time being obliged 
to see in Jesus the Messiah, For after the 
Forerunner there remained no place for a 
second manifestation of the kind. No one 
knew that Jesus took himself to be the Mes- 
siah. Therefore in the Baptist men per- 
ceived a prophet and raised the question 
whether Jesus were not Elijah. No one 
understood in their full hearing the myste- 
rious concluding sentences of the eulogy over 
the Baptist. Only for Jesus was John the 
promised Elijah. 

6. The Baptist and Jesm. 

What was the Baptist ^s attitude to Jesus? 
If he had been conscious of being the Fore- 
runner, he must have surmised that Jesus 
was the Messiah. One generally assumes 
this and supposes that he as the Forerunner 

147 



THE MYSTERY OF 

put the question to Jesus whether he were- 
the Messiah (Mt 11 ^"®). This supposition 
seems to us perfectly natural because we al- 
ways represent to ourselves the two charac- 
ters in the relation of Forerunner-Messiah. 

In this connection, however, we forget a 
perfectly obvious question. Did the Baptist 
feel himself to be Elijah, the Forerunner T 
In no utterance before the people did he raise 
such a claim. They stubbornly recognised in 
him only a prophet. Also during his im- 
prisonment he can have claimed no such 
thing, for in Jerusalem the people still held 
to the same opinion, that he was a prophet. 

If somehow or another the presentiment had 
prevailed that he represented the character 
of Elijah, how then could men generally get 
the notion that John was a prophet, Jesus 
the Elijah? That this was the general view 
even after the death of the Baptist, is proved 
by the reply of the Disciples at Csesarea 
Philippi. 

To view the Baptist's query under the pre- 
sumption that the Forerunner is asking 
whether Jesus be the Messiah is to put the 
question in a light which is completely un- 
justified; for whether John took himself to 
be the Forerunner is not in the least to be 
proven. Therefore it is also by no means 

148 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

made out that his question referred to the 
messianic dignity. The people standing by, 
as they did not take John to be the Fore- 
runner, must have interpreted it in a very 
different way, — ^namely, in the sense: Art 
thou Elias? 

The fact is that the usual perspective hides 
a characteristic detail in this very section, 
the fact, namely, that Jesus applies again to 
the Baptist the same designation which the 
Baptist in his question had applied to him I 
Art thou the Coming One ? asked the Baptist. 
Jesus replied: If ye are willing to receive 
it, he himself is Elijah, the Coming One! 
The designation of the ** Coming One'^ is 
therefore common to both speeches, only that 
we arbitrarily refer it to the Messiah in the 
question of the Baptist. This proceeding, 
which appears so natural in the naive per- 
spective, will show itself to be unjustified so 
soon as one becomes aware that it is in fact 
only a question of perspective and not of 
any real standard. For then the phrase 
**He himself^ ^ in Jesus' reply acquires sud- 
denly an unsuspected significance: ^^he him- 
self is Elijah,*' the Coming One! This ref- 
erence compels us to understand by the Com- 
ing One in the Baptist's question, not the 
Messiah, but — as in Jesus' reply — ^Elias. 

149 



THE MYSTERY OF 

**Art thou the expected Forerunner?** — 
thus the Baptist through his disciples makes 
inquiry of Jesus. **If ye are able to re- 
ceive it, he himself is this Forerunner,'* 
said Jesus to the people after he had spoken 
to them about the greatness of the Baptist. 

By this reference the scene now receives a 
far more intense colouring. First of all, it 
becomes clear why Jesus speaks about the 
Baptist after the departure of the messengers. 
He feels himself obliged to lead the people up 
climactically from the conception that John 
is a prophet to the presentiment that he is the 
Forerunner, with whose appearing the hand 
of the world clock nears the fateful hour to 
which refers the word concerning **him who 
prepares the way,** and of whom the scribes 
say **that he must first come** (Mk 9 ^^). 

John, in fact, with his question was back- 
ward in his reckoning of the Messianic time. 
His messengers seek information about the 
Forerunner at the moment when Jesus * con- 
fidence that the Kingdom is immediately to 
dawn was at the highest pitch. He had just 
sent out his Disciples and given them to ex- 
pect that the appearing of the Son of Man 
might surprise them on their way through 
the cities of Israel. The hour is already far 
more advanced — ^that is what Jesus would 

160 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

give the people to understand in his ** eulogy 
over the Baptist/' if they can receive it. 

John reached this surmise about Jesus in 
the same way as did the people. That is to 
say, as he heard of the signs and deeds of 
Jesus (Mt 11 ^), there occurred to him the 
thought that this might be something more 
than a prophet with a call to repentance. So 
he sends messengers to him in order to have 
assurance upon this point. 

Herewith, however, the proclamation of the 
Baptist is put in an entirely different light. 
He never pointed to the coming Messiah, hut 
to the expected Forerunner. So is to be 
explained the proclamation about **him that 
is to come after him'* (Mk 1 '^' ®). As applied 
to the Messiah, the expressions he uses re- 
main obscure. They denote, that is, only a 
difference of degree, not a total difference in 
kind, between himself and the person whom 
he announces. If he were speaking of the 
Messiah, it would have been impossible for 
him to employ these expressions, in which, in 
spite of the mighty difference in rank, he still 
compares the Coming-One to himself. He 
thinks of the Forerunner as like himself, bap- 
tising and preaching repentance unto the 
Kingdom, only that he is incomparably 
greater and mightier. Instead of baptising 

161 



THE MYSTERY OP 

with water, he will baptise with the Holy 
Ghost (Mk 1 «). 

This cannot apply to the Messiah. Since 
when does the Messiah baptise? Then, too, 
the famous pouring out of the Spirit does not 
occur within but before the messianic era! 
Before the coming of the great Day of the 
Lord he will pour out his Spirit upon all 
flesh, and signs and wonders shall be showed 
in heaven and on earth (Joel 2 ^® ff). Before 
the coming of the great Day of the Lord he 
will send Elijah the Prophet (Mai 4 ^). The 
Baptist combines these two chief indications 
of the character of the great events that are 
to precede the Last Time, and he arrives at 
the conception of the Forerunner who is to 
baptise with the Holy Ghost I One sees from 
this what a supernatural light surrounded the 
figure of the Forerunner in the current con- 
ception. Hence it is that John felt himself 
so little before him. 

Jesus was put by this question in a diffi- 
cult position. The Baptist in asking him, 
Art thou the Forerunner? or art thou not? 
had proposed a false alternative to which 
Jesus could answer neither yes nor no. He 
was not willing to entrust the secret of his 
messiahship to the messengers. He there- 
fore replied with a hint of the nearness of 

159, 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the Kingdom which was revealed in his 
deeds. At the same time he thrust his own 
personality mightily into the foreground. 
He alone can be blessed who stands by him 
and who finds no occasion of stumbling in 
him. With this he would say the same as he 
said once also to the people : membership in 
the Kingdom is dependent upon one^s at- 
tachment to him (Mk 8 ^^). 

Jesus ^ remarkable evasive answer to the 
Baptist, in which exegesis has always be- 
lieved that it must discover a special finesse, 
is explained therefore simply by the neces- 
sity of the situation. Jesus could not answer 
directly. Hence he gave this obscure re- 
sponse. The Baptist was to gather from it 
what he would and could. Besides, it was 
of no importance how he understood it. 
Events would soon teach him, for the time is 
already much further advanced than he supr 
poses, and the hammer is already lifted to 
strike the hour. 

It is exceedingly diflficult for us to get rid 
of the notion that the Baptist and Jesus 
stood to one another in the relation of fore- 
runner and Messiah. It is only through in- 
tense reflection that we can reach the per- 
ception that the two characters stand in this 
relation in our perspective only because we 

168 



THE MYSTERY OP 

assume the messiahship of Jesus; but that 
in order to discover the historical relation- 
ship we must calculate and apply the right 
perspective. 

So long as one is still prejudiced in any 
way by the old perspective, one cannot do 
justice to the foregoing investigation. That 
is, one will still have the notion that it is 
a question of **the forerunner of the Fore- 
runner*^ and the Forerunner — an ingenious 
multiplication of the Forerunner by himself. 
That is falsely expressed. A prophet of re- 
pentance, John the Baptist, directs men^s at- 
tention to the prediction of the ndghty figure 
of Elijah the Forerunner, and as he hears in 
prison of the signs of Jesus he wonders if 
this may not be Elijah — and does not dream 
that this man holds himself to be the Messiah, 
and that for this reason he himself will hence- 
forth be designated in history as the Fore- 
runner. That is the historical situation. 

The moment the conception of history was 
defined by the conviction that Jesus was the 
Messiah the historical perspective was neces- 
sarily shifted. The Gospels display this 
shifting in increasing measure. In the in- 
troductory verses of Mark the quotation from 
Malachi about the Forerunner who is to pre- 
pare the way (Mai 3 ^) is already applied to 

164 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

John. According to Matth'ew, the Baptist 
hears in priso^ji of * ' the works of the Messiah* * 
(Mt 11 2). If here it is only a question of 
the casual and unreflecting introduction of a 
new mode of conception, the Fourth Gospel, 
on the other hand, has made a principle of 
it and consistently represents the history in 
line with the presumption that because Jesus 
was the Messiah the Baptist was the Fore- 
runner and must have felt himself to be such. 
The historical Baptist says: I am not the 
Forerunner, for he is incomparably greater 
and ndghtier than I. According to the 
Fourth Gospel the people could conjecture 
that he was the Christ He was obliged to 
say, therefore: I am not the Christ (John 

120)1 

Thus has the relation been altered under 
the influence of the new perspective. The 
person of the Baptist has become historically 
unrecognisable. Finally they have made out 
of him the modern doubter, who half believed 
in Jesus* messiahship, and half disbelieved. 
In this apprehensive indecision, this backing 
and filling, is supposed to lie, in fact, the 
tragedy of his existence I Now, however, one 
may confidently strike him from the list of 
those characters, so interesting to us mod- 
ems, who come to ruin through a tragic 

155 



THE MYSTERY OF 

half-faith. Jesus spared him that For so 
long as he lived he required of no man faith 
in him as the Messiah — ^and yet that is what 
he was I 

7. The Blind Man at Jericho and the Ovation 
at the Entrance to Jerusalem. 

• 

Was the entrance into Jerusalem a mes- 
sianic ovation 1 That depends, in the first 
place, upon how one interprets the cry of the 
people; but then also, upon one^s notion of 
the encounter between Jesus and the blind 
man. If it was actually a question there of 
his being greeted as the Son of David, — ^a 
greeting which he no longer repudiates, but 
tacitly admits, so that the people learn to ap^ 
prehend what he takes himself to be, — ^the 
consequence is inevitable that it was a mes- 
sianic ovation. 

For the exact understanding of the descrip^ 
tion of Jesus ^ entrance into Jerusalem, the 
differences in detail between Mark and the 
parallels are of far reaching importance. 
In Mark we have two clearly distinguishable 
acclamations. The first is directed to the 
person of Jesus in their midst : * * Hosanna I 
Blessed be Hhe Coming One* in the name of 
the Lord** (Mk 11 ®). The second refers to 
the expected coming of the Kingdom: 

156 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

"Blessed be the coining Eongdom of onr 
father David. Hosanna in the highest I*' 
The Son of David is thus not mentioned at 
aUI 

It is different in Matthew. There the peo- 
ple shout: "Hosanna to the Son of David! 
Blessed be the Coming One in the name of 
the Lord. Hosanna in the highest 1^' (Mt 
21 ®). We have here therefore only the cry 
which was directed to the person of Jesus; 
the Eangdom is not mentioned ; men acclaim 
instead the Son of David and, at the same 
time, the Coming One. 

Luke ^s version does not come into account, 
for he deals with reminiscences from the his- 
tory of the infancy: "Blessed be the king 
that Cometh in the name of the Lord. Peace 
in heaven and glory in the highest^' (Lk 19 

Thus Matthew in his account interprets the 
Coming One as the Son of David. We 
possess no direct proof that this expression 
(the Coming One), which is derived from 
Psalm 118 2^ ff., was employed in Jesus' time 
for the Messiah. It has been shown, how- 
ever, that the Baptist as well as Jesus applied 
it rather to the Forerv/nner Elijah. It is 
therefore unhistorical when Matthew repre- 
sents the people as acclaiming in the same 

157 



THE MYSTERY OF 

breath toth the Coming One and the Son of 
David. 

Mark has here, too, preserved in his detail 
the original situation. The people acclaimed 
Jesus as the ** Coming One/' i. e. as the Fore- 
runner, and sings an ^^Hosanna in the high- 
esf to the Elingdom which is soon to descend 
upon earth. A fine distinction is made in the 
use of Hosanna and Hosanna in the highest 
("places'' is to be supplied). The former 
applies to the Forerunner present in their 
midst; the latter, to the heavenly Kingdom. 
The secondary character of the account in 
Matthew is evident in the fact that it applies 
to the Son of David and to the Coming One 
not only an Hosanna but likewise an Hosanna 
in the highest,— whereby the Messiah is first 
assumed to be on earth and then, still in 
heaven! Here it becomes plain that the sec- 
ond Hosanna belonged originally with the 
Kingdom. 

The entrance into Jerusalem, therefore, 
was an ovation not to the Messiah hut to the 
Forerunner. But then it is impossible that 
the people understood the scene with the 
blind man as indicating that Jesus welcomed 
the address "Son of David." 

Here again it is a question of Synoptical 
detail by which the scene is totally changed. 

158 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

The shout in the name of the Son of David is 
incidental. The question is only whether the 
public could and must conceive it as a form 
of address. This conception is evidently 
that of Matthew and Luke, but hy Mark it is 
excluded. 

According to the Matthean account, two 
blind men sit by the wayside and cry, Have 
mercy upon us, Son of David (Mt 20 ^°). 

In Luke the cry runs : Jesus, thou Son ol 
David, have mercy upon me (Lk 18 ®^). 
Thereupon Jesus comes to a stand before 
him, converses with him, and heals him. 

According to Mark, the blind beggar, son 
of Timaeus, is sitting behind the multitude at 
the edge of the road. Jesu^ does not see 
him, cannot address him, but hears only a 
voice, which reaches him as from the ground 
out of the midst of the stir, of one calling 
upon the Son of David for help. Jesus 
comes to a stand and sends to have him 
fetchedl They follow the voice and find the 
man sitting upon the ground. Eise, he call- 
eth thee ! they say to him. He throws away 
his garment, springs up, and presses through 
the crowd to Jesus. As Jesus sees the man 
approaching him thus he can have no idea 
that he is blind! He has to ask him, there- 
fore, what he wants. The distance, the heat, 

159 



THE MYSTERY OF 

the sending to fetch him, the nimble ap- 
proach,^ — all this Matthew has dropped He 
has simplified the situation: Jesus en- 
counters the two blind men on the road and 
at once addresses them. Only he has re- 
tained from the original situation the ques- 
tion, **what is wantedl*^ — ^which in Mark is 
actually necessary, but in Matthew remains 
unaccountable, for there Jesus must see that 
he has to do with two blind men ! 

But if there lay such a distance between 
Jesus and the blind man, no one could have 
an idea that he took the monotonous cry about 
the Son of David as an address to himself i 
It was just simply an annoying cry, which 
the bystanders sought in vain to silence. The 
people attached as little importance to it as 
to the cries of the demons — ^if in fact they 
understood it at all. 

The address of the beggar was of an en- 
tirely different tenor and shows that he no 
more took Jesus for the Messiah than did the 
people: **Eabbi, that I may receive my 
eight.'' For him, therefore, Jesus was the 
rabbi from Nazareth. 

If one keep this situation in view, it will 
be see;n that the bystanders could in no way 
get the idea that Jesus here welcomes a mes- 

160 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

sianio aoclaiin. This, however, was the first 
sign which he again performed after com- 
ing ont of his retirement Thereby he legiti- 
mated himself before the Paschal caravan as 
the Forerunner, for which his adherents in 
Galilee took him before he suddenly with- 
drew into solitude in the north. Now the 
demonstration is let loose, and they prepare 
for him as the Forerunner the ovation at the 
entrance into Jerusalem. 

In demonstrating the proper character of 
this occurrence one has to deal with appar- 
ently insignificant detail to which not every- 
one may be inclined to ascribe due import- 
ance. In view of this the following points are 
to be kept in mind : 

1. In the representation which assumes the 
messiahship of Jesus there must come about 
as of itself a shifting of detail which has the 
effect of describing a messianic entrance. 
This is the case with Matthew. There is no 
evidence of a deliberate purpose on the part 
of the writer. 

2. Mark^s delineation shows such original- 
ity in comparison with the parallels (one has 
but to think of the story of the Baptism and 
the report of the Last Supper) that one can- 
not easily lay too great weight upon the pe- 

161 



THE MYSTERY OF 

cnliarity of his account, — especially when it 
results in so clear and consistent a picture as 
is here the case. 

3. Nothing is accomplished by the assertion 
that proof has not been brought that it was 
assuredly a question of an ovation to the 
Forerunner. For then it remains to demon- 
strate how it was, that, on the presumption 
that it was actually an ovation to the Messiah, 
the transactions in the Jerusalem days make 
no allusion at all to the presumed messianic 
pretension and the venal accusers do not ap- 
peal to any such claims. What must the 
Boman procurator have done if a man had 
marched into the city hailed by the populace 
as the Son of David 1 

4. The true historical apprehension is pe- 
culiarly difficult for us here because of our no- 
tion that the signs and wonders were regarded 
by the contemporaries as a confirmation of the 
messiahship of Jesus. In that opinion we 
share the standpoint upon which the Johan- 
nine representation is based. According to 
the conception of Jesus ^ contemporaries, 
however, the Messiah needs no signs, but 
rather he will be at once manifest in his 
power ! The signs belong on the contrary to 
the period of the Forerunner I 

5. Our translation also has a prejudicial 

162 



v^fimmmfm ^ . » ■ .^^^ 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

effect. The word ipx6/ievo^ denotes in all 
jmssages a personality sharply defined for 
that time. Hence one must in every case 
translate it in accord with this perception, — 
not one time as a substantive [cf. the German 
Bible] and again (in the story of the ova- 
tion) as a verb-form, just as happens to be 
most convenient **The Coming One*' is the 
Forerunner, because before the messianic 
judgment he is to come in the name of God to 
put everything in order* 

We arrive therefore at the conclusion: 
Until the confession before the council Jesus 
was publicly regarded as the Forerunner, as 
he had been already in Galilee^ 



163 



CHAPTER VII 

AFTEB THE MISSION OF THE TWELVE 
UTEBABY AND HISTOBICAL PBOBLEMS 

1. The Voyage on the Lake after the Return 
of the Twelve. 

It is exceedingly difficult to gather from 
the Synoptic accounts a clear picture of the 
events which happened after the mission of 
the Twelve. When did the Disciples retumt 
Where did Jesus betake himself during their 
absence 1 What sort of success did the Dis- 
ciples have 1 What events happened between 
their return and the departure for the north 1 
Were these events of a sort to account for 
Jesus' determination to withdraw with them 
into solitude f 

The accounts supply no answer to these 
questions. Moreover they confront us with 
another, a purely literary problem. The con- 
nection between the several scenes is here 
extraordinarily broken. It seems almost as 
if the thread of the narration were here com- 
pletely lost Only at the moment of depar- 
ture for the journey to Jerusalem do the 

164 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

scenes begin to stand again in a clear and 
natural relationship. 

First of all we have to do with two obvious 
doublettes : the feeding of the multitude and 
the subsequent journey on the lake (Mk 6 ^^* 
^^' Mk 8 ^» ^^). In both instances Jesus is 
overtaken by the multitude as he lands on a 
lonely shore after a journey across the lake. 
Then he returns again to the Galilean village 
on the west shore. Here in his accustomed 
field of activity he encounters the Pharisaic 
emissaries from Jerusalem. They call him 
to account. In the series which contains the 
first account of the feeding of the multitude 
the question at issue is about hand-washing 
(Mk 7 ^'^^), in the second case it is the re- 
quirement of a sign (Mk 8 ^^» ^^). The first 
series concludes with the departure for the 
north, where in the neighbourhood of Tyre 
and Sidon he meets the Oanaauitish woman 
(Mk 7 ^^' ^°). In the second series the jour- 
ney to Caesarea Philippi (Mk 8 ^'^) follows 
upon his encounter with the Pharisees. 

We have here therefore two independent 
accounts of the same epoch in Jesus *s life. 
In their plan they match one another per- 
fectly, differing only in the choice of the 
events to be related. These two narrative 
series are as it were predestinated to be 

165 



THE MYSTERY OP 

united instead of being placed side by side. 
It happens that each of the northern jour- 
neys, according to the narrative, begins and 
ends with a sojourn in Galilee. Mk 7 '^ : After 
leaving the region of Tyre he came through 
Sidon to the Sea of Galilee. MkQ^^'^^: And 
they went forth from thence (L e. from 
Caesar ea Philippi) and wandered through 
Galilee and came to Capernaum. At the end 
of one narrative series one finds oneself again 
at the beginning of the other. Hence if one 
connect the one return from the north with 
the beginning of the other narrative series, 
one has, superficially viewed, a perfectly na- 
tural continuation, — only that Jesus must 
now, incomprehensibly enough, start back im- 
mediately for the north, instead of the return 
to Galilee being a stage on the journey to 
Jerusalem I This is the order that was fiually 
followed, but it is only in the second return 
that the narrative finds a point of attach- 
ment for the journey to Jerusalem. 

This return movement in both series ac- 
counts for the fact that the two narratives, 
though they are really parallel cycles, are yet 
attached to one another in chronological se- 
quence. The present text has completed the 
process of harmonising them. It is not 
simply that the story of the second feeding of 

166 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the mtiltitude makes reference to the first 
in the word '' again* ^ (Mk 8 ^) : the reconcilia- 
tion is in fact carried so far that Jesus in one 
word addressed to the Disciples assumes both 
miracles (Mk 8 ^^' ^^) ! How far this pro- 
cess was already accomplished in the oral 
tradition, and how much is to be charged to 
the account of the final literary composition, 
is a question which we are no longer in a posi- 
tion to answer. 

Only the first cycle is complete. Jesus and 
his Disciples travel by boat north-east along 
the coast and return then again to the coun- 
try of Genezareth (Mk 6 ^^' ^^* ^«). 

The second cycle is iocomplete and fallen 
somewhat into disorder. Jesus is back on 
the west coast after his voyage. Mk 8 ^^ ff. 
corresponds with Mk 6 ^^ ff. and 7 ^ ff . Dal- 
manutha lies on the west coast. But instead 
of his departing now directly for the north, 
there comes first another voyage to the east 
coast (8 ^^). It is not till they reach Beth- 
saida ihat he starts with his Disciples north- 
ward ( Mk 8 22' 27^^ rjijjLg gj.g^ cycle on the 

other hand relates this voyage to Bethsaida 
as an episode of the famous coasting voyage 
and places it immediately after the feeding of 
the multitude (Mk 6 *^ ff.). And as a matter 
of fact the second narrative series also shows 

167 



THE MYSTERY OF 

that this was the original connection. For 
here, too, as in the first series, the conversa- 
tion upon landing deals with the foregoing 
miracle. Mk 6 ^^: **For they understood 
not concerning the loaves, but their heart was 
hardened. '' Mk 8 ^^^ 21 . a yHiqj^ i brake the 

five loaves — ^when the seven — do ye not yet 
understand? *^ It is therefore impossible 
that between this voyage and the feeding of 
the multitude all the events were crowded 
which were enacted upon the west shore. 
The minds of all are still full of the great 
event. The new sea journey of the second 
cycle is nothing else but the original continu- 
ation of the voyage to Bethsaida from the 
scene of the feeding of the multitude. 

Therewith the parallelism of the two series 
is proven. The events follow one another in 
this order: coasting voyage from the west 
shore, feeding of the multitude, continuation 
of the voyage to the north-east, ** walking up- 
on the sea*' and conversation in the boat, 
arrival at Bethsaida, return to the region of 
Genezareth, discussion with the Pharisees, 
departure with the Disciples to the north. 

2. The Supper hy the Seashore. 

The Disciples' proclamation of the imme- 
diate approach of the Kingdom must have 

168 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

had a great success. A mighty multitude of 
such as believed the. message crowded around 
Jesus. He had about him a community in- 
spired by the most lively eschatological ex- 
pectation. They would not let go of him. In 
order to be alone with his Disciples he em- 
barks in a boat. He meant to withdraw to 
the north-east shore. But the people, when 
they learned that he would take himself away, 
streamed together from all sides and followed 
him along the beach. Mk6^^»^^: ** For there 
were many coming and going, and they had 
no leisure so much as to eat. And they went 
away in a boat to a desert place apart. And 
the people saw them going, and many knew 
them, and they ran there together on foot 
from all the cities and outwent them.'* 

They meet him in a lonely region and im- 
mediately surround him. The hour comes 
for the daily meal. In the accounts of the 
following miracle the meal which they cele- 
brated is preserved to us. The occasion was 
a solemn cultus-medll After the loaves 
which he had broken were consecrated by a 
prayer of thanksgiving Jesus has them dis- 
tributed to the multitude by his Disciples. 
Except for the addition of the two parables 
[**My body — ^my blood' ^ we have absolutely 
the same solemn ceremony at the Last Sup- 

169 



THE MYSTERY OF 

per. There he personally distributed the 
food to his table-companions. The descrip- 
tion of the distribution of the bread in the 
two cases corresponds perfectly. Mk 6 *^: 
He took the loaves, and looking up to heaveUi 
he blessed them, and he gave to tiie Disciples 
to set before them. Mk 14 ^^: He took a 
loaf, and when he had blessed, he brake it, 
and gave to thenu 

Hence the solemn act of distribution con- 
stitutes the essence, as well of' that meal by 
the seashore, as of the last meal with his 
Disciples. The **Lord^s Supper ^^ is a name 
appropriate to both, for that meal by the sea 
also took place at the evening hour. Mk 6 
^^ : And when the day was now far spent his 
Disciples came to him, etc. Here the table- 
company is composed of the great multitude 
of believers in the Kingdom : at the Last Sup- 
per it was limited to the circle of the Disci- 
ples. The celebration, however, was the 
same. 

The story of this event has been distorted 
into a miracle: the cultus-meal which Jesus 
improvised by the seashore has been repre- 
sented as a hearty and filling supper. That 
the scanty provision which was at hand, the 
food designed for himself and his Disciples, 
was solemnly distributed to the people is his- 

170 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tone. That this meal took the place of the 
evening repast likewise corresponds with the 
fact. But that through a supernatural pro- 
cess the multitude was filled by it, — that be- 
longs to the miraculous character which the 
later age ascribed to the celebration because 
its significance could not be apprehended. 

The historical procedure is the following: 
The Disciples ask Jesus to send the people 
away that they may be fed. For him, how- 
ever, it is not an appropriate moment to 
think of an earthly meal and so to disperse, 
for the hour is near when they shall all be 
gathered about him at the messianic banquet. 
Hence he would not have them go yet, but be- 
fore he dismisses them he commands them 
to recline as at table. In place of the full 
meal he introduces a ceremonial meal, in 
which the satisfaction of earthly appetite has 
no part, so that the food intended for him- 
self and his Disciples sufficed for all. 

Neither the Disciples nor the multitude un- 
derstand what goes on. As Jesus afterwards 
in the boat directs the conversation to the 
significance of the meal — ^this alone can be 
the historical meaning of the obscure intima- 
tions of Mk 6 ^^ and Mk 8 ^^» ^\ it appears 
that the Disciples have understood nothing. 

He celebrated, therefore, a sacred cultus- 

171 



THE MYSTERY OF 

meal the meaning of which was dear to him 
alone. He did not count it necessary to ex- 
plain to them the meaning of the ceremony. 
The memory, however, of that mysterious 
supper on the lonely seashore lived on vividly 
in the tradition and grew to the account of 
the miraculous feeding. Wherein did the 
solemnity of this distribution consist for 
Jesus f The gathering at the feast is of an 
eschatological character. The people that 
gathered about him by the seaside were 
awaiting with him the dawn of the Eangdom. 
In replacing now the customary full meal 
with a sacred ceremonial meal, at which he 
distributed food with thanksgiving to God, he 
acted at the prompting of his messianic con- 
sciousness. As one who knew himself to he 
the Messiah, and would he manifested to 
them as such at the imminent dawn of the 
Kingdom, he distrihutes, to those whom he 
expects soon to join him at the messianic 
hanquet, sacred food, as though he would 
give them therewith an earnest of their par- 
ticipation in that future solemnity. The time 
for earthly meals is passed: hence he cele- 
brates with them a foretaste of the messianic 
banquet. They, however, understood it not, 
for they could not guess that he who distrib- 
uted to them suoh consecrated eucharistic 

172 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

food was conscious of being the MessiaH Bud 
acted as suck 

In this connection there falls a light upon 
the nature of the Last Supper at Jerusalem. 
There the Disciples represented the com- 
munity of believers in the Kingdonu In the 
course of that last meal Jesus distributed to 
them with a word of thanksgiving food and 
drink. But now they know what he assumes 
to be : he had disclosed to them the secret of 
his messiahship. From this they are able to 
divine in his distribution the reference to the 
Messianic banquet. He himself gave this 
significance to his action in the fact that he 
concluded the ceremony with a hint of their 
proximate reunion when he should drink the 
wine new with them in his Father ^s King- 
dom I 

The supper by the seaside and the supper 
at Jerusalem therefore correspond com- 
' pletely, except that in the latter Jesus sig- 
nified to his Disciples the nature of the cere- 
mony and at the same time expresses the 
thought of the Passion in the two parables 
[**My body— my blood ^^]. The cultus-meal 
was the same: a foretaste of the messianic 
banquet in the circle of the fellowship of the 
believers in the Kingdom. Now for the first 
time one is able to understand how the na- 
ns 



THE MYSTERY OP 

ture of the Last Supper can he independent 
of the two parables. 

3. The Week at Bethsaida.. 

During the ceremony Jesus was deeply 
moved. For this reason he urged immediate 
departure and dismissed the people. He 
himself withdrew to a mountain in order to 
be alone in prayer. On the beach at Beth- 
saida, whither he had charged them to row, 
he again met his Disciples. They, battling 
with wind and wave, had the illusion that a 
supernatural apparition approached them as 
they descried his figure on the beach. They 
still were so much under the influence of the 
impression lately made upon them by the 
mighty personality who with mysterious maj- 
esly had distributed to the multitude 
sacred food and then had suddenly broken 
off the ceremony (Mk 6 *^' ^2). 

Whither had he sent away the multitude? 
What did they do at Bethsaidaf How long 
did they stay there? Our text merely re- 
counts that they returned again to Genezarr- 
eth. 

At this point, however, we encounter a dif- 
ficult literary problem, in the Synoptical 
narrative of the period immediately preced- 
ing the departure for Jerusalem (Mk 9^^). 

174 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

According to Mk 8 ^^' ^^' Jesus is now alone 
with his Disciples far away in the north, in 
heathen territory, — ^from which point also he 
sets out on the rapid march through Galilee 
to Jemsalem (Mk 9 ^® ff.) • **And they went 
forth from thence and passed through Gali- 
lee, and he would not that any man should 
know it.^' Between the disclosure of his 
messiahship and this departure there inter- 
venes only one scene (Mk 8 ^*' 9 ^^), where he 
appears , surrounded by a great multitude of 
people. In company with the three intimate 
Disciples he leaves the multitude, only to re- 
turn to them shortly again. It is nowhere re- 
counted how this multitude suddenly gets to 
him in heathen territory. And just as little 
are we informed how it leaves him again, so 
that (according to Mk 9 30 ff.) he can march 
through Galilee alone with his Disciples and 
unrecognised. 

But it is not only the multitude that appears 
unexpectedly: the whole scenery also is al- 
tered. One finds oneself in a familiar region, 
for Jesus enters with his Disciples * ^ into the 
house, ^' while the people stay without (Mk 
9 28)1 

The literary context in which the section 
stands is absolutely impossible, for this can- 
not have been enacted in heathen territory, 

176 



THE MYSTERY OF 

bnt only in Galilee I Bnt as Jesns snbse* 
quently had only a fleeting contact with Gali- 
lee, passing through it incognito, this piece 
belongs in the Galilean period before the de- 
parture for the north, and more precisely, at 
the time of the return of the Disciples, for it 
is then that he was constantly surronnded by 
a throng of people and was seeking to be in 
solitude with his Disciples I 

The situation, however may confidently be 
defined with still greater exactness. Jesus 
dwelt in a village (Mk 9 ^®) in the neighbour- 
hood of which there was a mountain to which 
he betook himself with the three Disciples 
(Mk 9 ^). All this agrees, however, most 
certainly with the sojourn in Bethsaida. The 
mountain which he seeks with the Three is 
the mountain on the north shore of the lake 
where he pjrayed in the night when he came to 
Bethsaida! 

The passage Mk 8 ^^ 9 ^^ belongs there- 
fore in the days at Bethsaida I It is no 
longer possible to make out by what process 
it came into the present impossible context. 
The adoption of the present order may have 
been prompted in part by the consideration 
that the impressive word about the obligation 
of following Jesus in suffering (Mk 8 ^*» 9 ^) 
seemed to form a most natural conclusion to 

. 176 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the prediction of the Passion at Caesarea 
PliiUppi(Mk 8 «!•««)• 

Moreover the transformation of the ac- 
count of Jesns meeting his Disciples at their 
landing into a miracle made it difficult to ef- 
fect a natural connection with the events 
which occurred the following morning. And 
yet Mk 8 ^* ff. may fairly be said to imply 
such measures as were adopted the evening 
before (Mk 6 *^' *''). Jesus had dismissed 
the people, had himself retired to solitude, 
and while it was yet night had overtaken 
his Disciples at Bethsaida, where they found 
lodging in a house (Mk 9 ^®). The next day 
he calls the people about him with the Dis^ 
dples (Mk 8 ^*) and speaks to them about the 
requirement of self-denial on the part of his 
followers, readiness to endure shame, scorn, 
ridicule, rather than prove untrue to him. 
This conduct is justified by the nearness of 
the coming of the Son of Man, who will per- 
form judgment in the person of Jesus. 

This admonition concludes with a word 
about **the coming of the Kingdom of God 
with power, ^' i. e. the eschatological realisa- 
tion of it In its present form it is toned 
down : some of them that stand by shall not 
taste of death till that moment arrive. As 
the conclusion of this address, however, it 

177 



THE MYSTERY OP 

must have run: Ye who stand here shall 
soon experience the great moment of the 
mighty dawn of the Kingdom of God I Thus 
this earnest address at Bethsaida reflects the 
expectations which stirred Jesus and the 
throng about him. 

Six days after that address at Bethsaida 
Jesus took with him the Three and led them 
to the mountain where he had prayed in soli- 
tude at evening after the great cultus-meal 
in common. At their return they find the 
other Disciples surrounded by the people. In 
spite of the authority over demons of which 
they had made proof during their progress 
through the cities of Israel, they were now 
not able to master a demoniac boy who was 
brought to them. Jesus takes the father and 
boy apart. The very moment that the peo- 
ple come running together (Mk 9 ^^* ^'^) the 
crisis begins, after which Jesus takes by the 
hand the lad, who was lying as dead, and 
raises him up. 

This passage, therefore, which has been 
wrested so strangely out of its connection, 
contains a striking account of the first and 
last days of the week which Jesus passed in 
Bethsaida between the return of the Disciples 
and the departure for the north. 

It win now be perfectly clear how unhis- 

178 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

torio is the view that Jesus left Galilee in 
consequence of growing opposition and 
spreading defection. On the contrary, this 
is the period of his highest triumph. A mul- 
titude of people with faith in the Kingdom 
thronged him and pursued him everywhere. 
Hardly has he landed upon the west coast 
but they are already there. Their number 
has grown still greater and increases more 
and more (Mk 6 *^' ^®). That they deserted 
him, that they even showed the least motion 
of doubt or defection, the texts give no in- 
timation. It was not the people that deserted 
Jesus hut Jesus that deserted the people. 

This he did, not out of any fear of the 
emissaries from Jerusalem, but only as carry- 
ing out what he already had in mind since the 
return of the Disciples. He wishes to be 
alone. The people had defeated this aim by 
following him along the shore as he sailed. 
When he had returned to the west coast he 
found himself again surrounded. Because he 
felt it absolutely necessary to be alone with 
the Disciples, and because he was ndt able to 
effect this purpose in Galilee, for this cause 
he suddenly vanished and betook himself into 
heathen territory. The journey into the 
north country is not a flight, rather it has 
the same motive as the voyage on the lake^ 

179 



CHAPTER VIII 

THE SSCBET OF MESSIAHSHIP 

1. From the Mount of Transfiguration to 
Casarea PhUippi 

Coming after Csesarea Philippi the Trans- 
figuration is an obscure episode devoid of 
historical significance. The Three learn no 
more about Jesus than Peter had already 
confessed in the presence of the Twelve and 
Jesus himself had confirmed. Thus the 
whole section is plainly an intrusion : the 
apotheosis and obscure dialogue have no his- 
torical significance. 

If, however, as has been proved above by 
literary evidence, this scene was enacted 
some weeks after the mission of the Twelve 
and before Csesarea Philippi— not upon the 
mountain of the legend, but on the mountain 
in the lonely region by the seashore near 
Bethsaida, — ^then we behold an idle addendum 
transformed at one stroke' into a Galilean 
occurrence of far reaching historical impor- 
tance, which explains the scene at Caesarea 
Philippi, and not vice versa. What we call 

18Q 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the Transfiguration is in reality nothing else 
but the revelation of the secret of messiah- 
ship to the Three. A few weeks later conies 
then its disclosure to the Twelve. 

This revelation to the Three is handed 
down to ns in the form of a miracle-tale. It 
has undergone the same transformation as 
have all the incidents of that voyage along 
the north coast. The scene on the mountain, 
like the feeding of the multitude and the en- 
counter of Jesus with his disciples at dusk, 
bears evident marks of the intense eschato- 
logical excitement of the moment. For this 
reason the historical facts are no longer clear 
in detail. There appear unto them Moses 
and Elijah, the two characters most prom- 
inently associated with the expectation of the 
last times. To what extent may ecstatic 
conditions, and perhaps glossolalia, have con- 
tributed to this experience? The present 
form of the story permits us to infer some- 
thing of the sort (Mk 9 ^•^). Does the voice 
out of the cloud (Mk 9 '^^ **This is my beloved 
Son, hear ye him^^) repeat in some sort 
Jesns^ experience at his baptism? 

There is in fact an inward connection be- 
tween the Baptism and the Transfiguration. 
Li both cases a condition of ecstasy accom- 
panies the revelation of the secret of Jesus' 

181 



THE MYSTERY OF 

person. The first time the revelation was 
for him alone ; here the Disciples also share 
it It is not clear to what extent they them- 
selves were transported by the experience. 
So much is sure^ that in a dazed condition, 
out of which they awake only at the end of 
the scene (Mk 9 ®), the figure of Jesus ap- 
pears to them illuminated by a supernatural 
light and glory, and a voice intimates that he 
is the Son of Gtod. The occurrence can be ex- 
plained only as the outcome of great escha- 
tological excitement. — 

It is remarkable that the revelation of the 
secret of Jesus' messiahship appears always 
to be connected with such conditions. At 
Pentecost, when Peter openly proclaimed 
Jesus as the Christ, we have an example of 
glossolalia. Peter, to be sure, had already 
had a taste of such an experience as the rev- 
elation was made to him on the mountain 
near Bethsaida. Paul also was in a state of 
ecstasy when he heard the voice before the 
Damascus gate. 

It has been shown above that no one could 
conclude from Jesus' speech or behaviour 
that he regards himself as the Messiah. 
Properly the question is not, how the people 
could remain ignorant of Jesus' messianic 
claim, but how Peter at Csesarea Philippi and 

18« 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

the High Priest at the trial could come into 
possession of this secret. 

The Transfiguration answers the first ques- 
tion. Peter knew that Jesus is the * * Son of 
God*' through the revelation which he in 
connnon with the two other Disciples received 
on the mountain near Bethsaida. For this 
reason he answered the question with such 
confidence (Mk 8 ^^ ). The text of St. Mat- 
thew's Gospel records an additional saying 
of Jesus which seems to allude to the very 
experience in which this knowledge was 
supematurally imparted to Peter : * * Blessed 
art thou, Simon Bar- Jonah: for flesh and 
blood hath not revealed it unto thee, but my 
Father which is in heaven '^ (Mt 16 ^''). 

Moreover, the scene which follows upon 
Peter's answer clearly has to do with a se- 
cret common to hinj. and to Jesus. When 
Jesus disclosed that he must die in Jerusa- 
lem Peter turns upon him impetuously, takes 
him apart, and speaks to him in excited tones. 
As Jesus sees that the other Disciples are 
attentive he abruptly turns away from Peter 
with a sharp word, calling him the Tempter, 
who minds not the things of God but the 
things of men (Mk-S ^2, ss)^ 

Why this agitation of Peter over Jesus' 
disclosure about the fatal journey to Jeru- 

188 



THE MYSTERY OF 

salem? Because it comes as a new factor, 
above and beyond what was disclosed on the 
mountain near Bethsaida. About that ex- 
perience he dare not speak in the presence 
of the other Disciples, because Jesus had for- 
bidden it For this reason he takes Jesus 
apart. Jesus, however, seeing that the other 
Disciples are listening, cannot explain mat- 
ters to him, and so with passionate abrupt- 
ness enjoins silence. 

Only the connection with the foregoing 
Transfiguration explains the characteristic 
traits of the scene at CaBsarea PhilippL 
Psychological observations about the quick 
apprehension and lively temperament of 
Peter — ^the common expedients of modem in- 
terpretation—do not in fact begin to explain 
why he alone should arrive with such confi- 
dence at the knowledge of Jesus' messiah- 
ship, only to fall a moment later into such 
misunderstanding that he gets into an excited 
dispute with Jesus. Why do they both go 
apart together? Why, instead of instructing 
him, does Jesus leave him there with a hard 
word of rebuke? 

Taken by itself the whole scene at Caesarea 
Philippi is an enigma. If, however, we as- 
sume that the Transfiguration preceded it, 
the enigma is solved and the scene is illumi- 

184 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Bated down to the smallest details. The rev- 
elation to the Twelve was preceded by the 
disclosure to the Three of the secret of Jesus ^ 
messiahship. 

2. The Futuristic Character of Jesus^ Mes- 
siahship. 

Meanwhile the revelation of the secret of 
his messiahship alters nothing in the behav- 
iour of the Disciples to Jesus. They do not 
sink before him in the dust as if now the man 
whom they had known was become a super- 
human being. They only manifest in con- 
sequence of this revelation a certain awe. 
They dare not interrogate him when they fail 
to understand his words (Mk 9 ^^), and as 
they company with him they appear to be 
aware that he carries within him a great 
secret. 

Are we to imagine then that after this rev- 
elation of his secret Jesus was henceforth re- 
garded by his disciples as the Messiah? No, 
not yet was he the Messiah. It must con- 
stantly be kept in mind that the Kingdom and 
the Messiah are correlative terms which be- 
long inseparably together. Now if the King- 
dom was not yet come, neither was the Mes- 
siah. Jesus' disclosure had reference to the 
time of the dawning of the Kingdom. When 

186 



THE MYSTERY OP 

that honr shall strike, then shall he appear 
as Messiah, then shall his messiahship be re- 
vealed in glory. Such was the secret which 
he solemnly made known to his disciples. 

Jesus ' messiahship was a secret, not merely 
because he had forbidden it to be spoken, but 
in its very nature it was a secret, inasmuch 
as it could be realised only at a definite time 
in the future. It was a conception which 
could be formulated fully only in his own con- 
sciousness. Wherefore the people could not 
understand it — and need not know anything 
about it. It was enough if by his word and 
his signs he might convert them to faith in 
the nearness of the kingdom, for with the 
coming of the Kingdom his messiahship 
would be manifest. 

It is almost impossible to express in mod- 
em terms the consciousness of messiahship 
which Jesus imparted as a secret to his Dis- 
ciples. Whether we describe it as an iden- 
tity between him and the Son of Man who is 
to appear, whether we express it as a conti- 
nuity which unites both personalities, or 
think of it as virtually a pre-existent mes- 
siahship, — ^none of these modem conceptions 
can render the consciousness of Jesus as the 
Disciples understood it. 

What we lack is the ^^Now and Then'' 

186 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

which dominated their thinking and which 
explains a curious duality of consciousness 
that was characteristic of them. What we 
might call identity, continuity, and potential- 
ity was in their mind confounded in a 
conception which quite eludes our grasp. 
Every person figured himself in two entirely 
different states, according as he thought of 
himself now, in the pre-messianic age, or then 
in the messianic. Expressions which we in- 
terpret only in accordance with our unity of 
consciousness, they referred as a matter of 
course to the double consciousness familiar 
to them. Therefore when Jesus revealed to 
them the secret of his messiahship, that did 
not mean to them that he is the Messiah, as 
we modems must understand it; rather it 
signified for them that their Lord and Mas- 
ter was the one who in the messianic age 
would be revealed as Messiah. 

They think of themselves also in terms of 
this double consciousness. As often as Jesus 
made known to them the necessity of his suf- 
fering before entering upon his rule they 
questioned within themselves what manner 
of persons they should be in the coming age. 
Wherefore, following upon the prophecies of 
the Passion we find rivalry among the Disci- 
ples as to which shall be the greatest in the 

187 



THE MYSTERY OP 

Kingdom, or to whom shall be accorded tba 
seats of honour on either side of the throne. 
In the meanwhile, however, they remain what 
they are, and Jesus remains what he is, their 
Teacher and Master. The sons of Zebedee 
address him as ** Master'' (Mk 10 ^*). As 
Teacher they expect him to give promise and 
assurance of what shall come to pass when 
the Kingdom dawns and his messiahship is 
revealed, 

In this sense, then, Jesus' messianic con- 
sciousness is futuristic There was nothing 
strange in this either for him or for his Dis- 
ciples. On the contrary, it corresponded 
exactly to the Jewish conception of the hidden 
life and labour of the Messiah (Cf. Weber: 
System der oltsynagogalen Theologie, 1880, 
pp. 342-446). The course of Jesus' earthly 
life preceded his messiahship in glory. The 
Messiah in his earthly estate must live 
and labour unrecognised, he must teach, and 
through deed and suffering he must be made 
perfect in righteousness. Not till then shall 
the messianic age dawn with the Last Judg- 
ment and the establishment of the Kingdom. 
The Messiah must come from the north. 
Jesus' march from Cassarea Philippi to Je- 
rusalem was the progress of the unrecog- 
nised Messiah to his triumph in glory. 

188 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Thus in the midst of the messianic expec- 
tation of his people stood Jesus as the Mes- 
siah that is to be. He dare not reveal him- 
self to them, for the season of his hidden 
labour was not yet over. Hence he preached 
the near approach of the Eongdom of 
God. 

It was this futuristic consciousness of mes- 
siahship which prompted Jesus in the Tem- 
ple to touch upon the messianic dogma of the 
Scribes, as though he would call their atten- 
tion to the secret which lurks behind it. The 
Pharisees say, **The Messiah is David's 
Son;^' but David calls him his Lord. How 
can he still be his Son (Mk 12 s^^^) ? 

The Messiah is David's Son — that is, sub- 
ordinate to him — since in this era he is bom 
of human parentage and lives and labours 
in obscurity. David's Lord, because at the 
dawn of the coming era he will be revealed 
as Christ in glory. Jesus has no notion of 
impeaching the pharisaic dogma. It is cor- 
rect, the Scripture so teaches. Only, the 
Pharisees themselves cannot properly inter- 
pret their dogma, and so cannot explain how 
the Messiah can be in one instance David's 
Son and in another, David's Lord. 

This saying of Jesus to the people in 
the Temple — (only Matthew has made of 

189 



THE MYSTERY OF 

it an embarrassing polemic) — ^is on a line 
with his utterance about the Baptist. Who- 
ever could apprehend with what author- 
ity John baptised — ^that is, with the power and 
authority of Elijah, — ^whoever could under- 
stand how the Messiah could be in one in- 
stance David *s son, in another David's Lord, 
— ^he must know also who he is that so speaks. 
He that hath ears to hear, let him hear! 

3. The Son of Man and the Futuristic Char- 
acter of Jesus' Messiahship. 

The expression **Son of David'* contains 
an enigma. Therefore Jesus never used it 
in speaking of his messiahship, but always 
refers to himself as the **Son of Man/' 
Consequently this designation must have 
been peculiarly apt as a rendering of his mes- 
sianic consciousness. 

It is evident that he chose this term de- 
liberately. Every other messianic designa- 
tion that is applied to him he corrects and 
interprets by **Son of Man." 

As they descend from the mountain where 
the Disciples had come to recognise him as 
the Son of God he speaks of himself as the 
**Son of Man" (Mk 9 ^•»). 

Peter proclaimed him before the others as 
**the Anointed one" (Mk 8 ^^). Jesus im- 

190 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

mediately proceeds to instruct them about 
the fate of the *^Son of Man'' (Mk 8 "). 

**Art thou the Christ the Son of the Bles- 
sed!'' the High Priest asked him (Mk 14 "). 
**Ye shall see the Son of Man sitting at the 
right hand of power and coming with the 
clouds of heaven," is Jesus' answer. That 
signifies, Yes. The same expression occurs 
in the second and in the third prophecy of 
the Passion (Mk 9 ^^-^^^ 10 ^a-s*) and in the 
saying about serving (Mk 10 *^). 

The messianic title **Son of Man" is futur- 
istic in character. It refers to the moment 
in which the Messiah shall come upon the 
clouds of heaven for judgment. From the 
beginning this was the sense in which Jesus 
had used the expression, whether in speaking 
to the people or to the Disciples. In send- 
ing out his Apostles he warned them of the 
impending approach of the day of the Son of 
Man (Mt 10 ^^). He spoke to the people of 
the coming of the Son of Man as an exhor- 
tation to be faithful to him, Jesus (Mk 8 ^®). 

Withal, he and the Son of Man remain for 
the people and for the Disciples two entirely 
distinct personalities. The one is a terres- 
trial, the other a celestial figure ; the one be- 
longs to the age that now is, the other to the 
messianic period. Between the two there ex- 

191 



THE MYSTERY OP 

ists solidarity, inasmuch as the Son of Man 
will intervene in behalf of such as have 
ranged themselves on the side of Jesus, the 
herald of his coming. 

These are the passages one must take as 
the point of departure in order to under- 
stand the significance of this expression in 
Jesus' mouth. Jesus and the Son of Man 
are different persons for such as do not know 
his secret. They, however, to whom he has 
revealed his secret are aware of a personal 
connection between the two. Jesus it is who 
at the messianic day shall appear as the Son 
of Man. The revelation at CaBsarea Philippi 
consists in this, that Jesus reveals to his Dis- 
ciples in what personal relationship he stands 
to the coming Son of Man. As the one who 
is to be the Son of Man he can confirm Peter's 
confession of him as the Messiah. His re- 
ply to the High Priest is affirmative in the 
same sense. He is the Messiah — ^that they 
will see when he appears as the Son of Man 
upon the clouds of heaven. 

**Son of Man" is accordingly the adeqilate 
expression of his messiahship, so long as he, 
in this earthly aBon as Jesus of Nazareth, has 
occasion to refer to his future dignity. 
Hence when he speaks to the Disciples about 
himself as the Son of Man he assumes this 

192 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

duality of consciousness. **The Son of Man 
must suflFer and will then rise from the dead : * ' 
that is to say, **As the one who is to be Son 
of Man at the resurrection of the dead I must 
sujffer.*' To the same effect we must under- 
stand the word about serving: As the one 
who in the character of the Son of Man is 
destined to the highest rule I must now 
humble myself to the lowliest service (Mk 
10 *^). Therefore he says when th%y come to 
arrest him : The hour is come in the which he 
who is to be the Son of Man must be delivered 
into the hands of sinners (Mk 14 ^^» *^). 

The problem about the Son of Man is here- 
with elucidated. It was not an expression 
which Jesus commonly used to describe him- 
self, but a solemn title which he adopted when 
in the great moments of his life he spoke 
about himself to the initiated as the future 
Messiah, while before the others he spoke of 
the Son of Man as a personality distinct from 
himself. In all cases, however, the context 
shows that he is speaking of one who is yet 
to come, for in all these passages mention 
is made either of the Eesurrection or of the 
appearing upon the clouds of heaven. The 
philological objections do not therefore ap- 
ply here. Initiated and uninitiated must un- 
derstand from the situation that he is speak- 

193 



/'- 



THE MYSTERY OF 

ing of a definite personality of ttie future, — 
and not of man in general, even though the 
expression in both cases would be the same. 

The case is entirely different with another 
set of passages where the expression occurs 
arbitrarily as a pure self-designation, a 
roundabout way of saying **L'' Here all 
critical and philological objections are thor- 
oughly in place. 

Mt 8 2o._The Son of Man hath not where 

to lay his head. 
Mt 11 ^®» — ^The Son of Man is come eating 

and drinking (in contrast to the Bap- 
tist). 
Mt 12 '^' — ^Blasphemy against the Holy 

Spirit is a worse crime than speaking 

evil of the Son of Man. 
Mt 12 ^<>'— The Son of Man will be three 

days in the earth, like Jonah in the 

belly of the fish. 
Mt 13 ^^* ^^ — The Son of Man is the sower ; 

the Son of Man is the lord of the 

reapers. 
Mt 16 ^^' — ^Who do the people say that the 

Son of Man is? 

Here the expression is philologically im- 
possible. For if Jesus had so used it, his 
hearers must simply have understood him to 

19* 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

mean **man/' There is nothing here to in- 
dicate that the word is meant to express a 
future messianic dignity I Here in fact he 
designates by it his actual present condition 1 
But **Son of man^' is a messianic title of 
futuristic character, since it always suggests 
a coming upon the clouds, according to Dan- 
iel 7 ^®» ^\ Furthermore, in all of these pas- 
sages the Disciples are as yet ignorant of 
Jesus' secret For them the Son of Man is 
still an entirely distinct person. The unity 
of the subject is still completely unknown to 
theuL Therefore they were not in a position 
to understand that by this term he refers to 
himself, but they must refer everything to 
that Son of Man of whose coming he also 
spoke elsewhere. Therewith, however, the 
passages would be meaningless, for they im- 
ply that Jesus is thus speaking of himself. 

Historically and philologically it is there- 
fore impossible that Jesus could have em- 
ployed the expression as a purposeless and 
matter of course self-designation. Even as a 
self -designation referable to the future mes- 
sianic dignity that was to be his, only they 
could understand it who knew his secret. 
Hence all the passages are unhistorical in 
which, previous to Ccesarea PhUippi (or, for 
the Three, previous to the Transfiguration), 

195 



THE MYSTERY OF 

he designates himself as Son of Man. Only 
those in that period are historical in which 
he speaks of the Son of Man as a figure yet 
to come, not identical with himself (Mt 10 ^^ 
and Mk 8 ^®). The passages cited above, in 
which the expression is used without its 
proper significance as a mere self-designa- 
tion, are therefore not historical, but are com- 
prehensible only as the result of a literary 
process. How does it come about that a 
later period of Gospel composition regarded 
this expression as ** Jesus ^ self-designation*'! 
This was due to a shifting of the perspec- 
tive. It is observable from the momqnt 
when men began to write the history of Jesus 
upon the assumption that on earth he was 
already the Messiah. From that time on 
men lost consciousness of the fact that for the 
earthly existence of Jesus his very messiah- 
ship was something future, and that by the 
very expression Son of Man he designated 
himself as the future Messiah. Since, then, 
it was an historic fact that he spoke of him- 
self as the Son of Man, the writers appro- 
priated this emphatic term and without sus- 
pecting that it was appropriate only in cer- 
tain sayings and in definite situations, they 
employed it indifferently in any passage 
where Jesus spoke of himself, — and thereby 

196 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

created these philological and historical im- 
possibilities. 

This erroneous use was due therefore to a 
literary development of markedly secondary 
character. In this respect it was like the un- 
historical use of the expression **Son of 
David ^* by Matthew. It agrees thereto that 
the *'Son of Man'* passages here in question 
belong likewise to a secondary stratum of St. 
Matthew ^s Gospel. 

What chiefly reveals their secondary char- 
acter is: the transformation of the simple 
question asked at CaBsarea Philippi Mt 16 
^^); the application of the parable of the 
fiower (Mt 13 ^^' *^) ; and the false interpreta- 
tion of the saying about Jonah (Mt 12 *^). 

No less secondary is the formulation of the 
speech about the sin against the Holy Ghost, 
where a contrast is drawn between blasphemy 
against the Holy Ghost and against the Son 
of Man (Mt 22 ®^), whereas in Jesus' thought 
both came to the same thing, since it was a 
question of conscious hardening against the 
power of the coming Kingdom which worked 
in him. In the passages Mt 8 ^^ and Mt 11 
" the expression is arbitrarily used, for 
Jesus merely wishes to say : / have nowhere 
to lay my head; and, / eat and drink, in con- 
trast to the ascetic practice of the Baptist. 

197 



THE MYSTERY OP 

It is quite a different case which is pre- 
sented by the two unhistorical **Son of Man'* 
passages in St. Mark's Gospel. 

Mk 2 10— The Son of Man hath authority 
to forgive sins upon earth. 

Mk 2 28._The Son of Man is lord of the 
Sabbath. 

The secondary character appears in the 
fact that Jesus is supposed to have used the 
expression here as a s^lf-designation. The 
historical fact is that he used it in that con- 
nection in the third person, referring either 
to the Son of Man as an eschatological figure, 
or to man in general. In either case it makes 
sense. 

1. Man as such can by works of healing de- 
clare the forgiveness of sins upon earth. 

Man as man is lord of the Sabbath. 

2. In view of the coming of the Son of Main 
forgiveness of sins is already available, 
as the works of healing show. 

In view of the coming of the Son of Man a 
higher factor already emerges to modify the 
legalistic observance of the Sabbath. 

The Law yields to something higher. The 
case of David shows it. 

However one may explain these passages, 

198 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

one thing is clear : the expression did actually 
occur here and did somehow modify Jesus' 
statement. The only secondary trait appears 
in the use of the expression as a self-designar 
tion, whereas in fact Jesus spoke of man in 
general or of the Son of Man. These pas- 
sages, therefore, are on the threshold between 
the historical and the literary-unhistorical 
use of the name **Son of Man.*' 

We can now understand the peculiar diffi- 
culty of the * * Son of Man ' ' problem. Hither- 
to, the deeper the investigation went, so much 
the further the solution seemed to recede. 
This was due to the fact that no amount of re- 
flection could effect the separation of pas- 
sages of such unequal worth. Thus the liter^ 
dry and historical sides of the problem re- 
mained confounded with one another. The 
moment, however, the discovery is made, 
from the study of Jesus' messianic conscious- 
ness, that the expression Son of Man is the 
only one by which he could utter the secret 
of his future dignity, the separation is given. 
All those passages are historical which show 
the influence of the apocalyptic reference to 
the Son of Man in Daniel : all are unhistorical 
in which such is not the case. At the same 
time the shifting of the perspective explains 
why for writers of a later generation this 

199 



THE MYSTERY OF 

expression in Jesns' month conld liave only 
the significance of an arbitrary self -designa- 
tion, appropriate in all situations where he 
spoke of himself. 

Finally, the last enigma is also solved. 
Why does the expression disappear from the 
language of the primitive Church! Why 
does no one (with exception of Acts 7 ^®) 
designate the Messiah by the title Son of 
Man, notwithstanding that Jesus had used it 
exclusively to indicate his dignity! This is 
due to the fact that **Son of Man'' was the 
messianic expression for a clearly defined 
episode of the messianic drama. The Mes- 
siah was the Son of Man in the moment of his 
manifestation upon the clouds of heaven to 
reign in judgment over the world. Jesus 
thought exclusively of that moment, since only 
from that moment on was he for men the 
Messiah. The primitive Church, however, 
seeing that a transitional period intervened, 
beheld Jesus as the Messiah in heaven above 
at the right hand of God. He was already 
the Messiah and did not have to become such 
at the moment of the appearing of the Son 
of Man. Because the perspective was shifted 
here also, one used the general e5[pression 
* * Messiah ' ' instead of the title * ' Son of Man' ' 
which pointed to a particular scene. 

SOO 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Jesns would have expressed himself inac- 
curately had he said, I am the Messiah, — for 
that he was to be only when he appeared in 
glory as the Son of Man. 

The primitive Church would have ex- 
pressed itself inaccurately had it said, Jesus 
is the Son of Man, — ^for after the Eesurrec- 
tion he was the Messiah at the right hand of 
God, whose coming as Son of Man the Church 
expected. 

4. The Resurrection of the Dead and the Fu- 
turistic Character of Jesus' Messiahship. 

What is the significance of the resurrection- 
prophecies! It seems to us hard to admit 
that Jesus could have foretold so precisely 
an event of that sort. It seems much more 
plausible to suppose that general utterances 
of his about a glory that awaited him were 
editorially transformed ex eventu into predict 
tions of the Eesurrection. 

Such criticism is in place so long as one 
holds the view that the prophecy of the 
Eesurrection referred to an isolated event in 
the personal history of Jesus. So it appears, 
however, only to our modem consciousness, 
because we think xmeschatologically even in 
the matter of the Eesurrection. For Jesus 
and his Disciples, on the other hand, the 

201 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Besurrection which he spoke about had an 
entirely different significance. It was a 
messianic event which signified the dawn of 
the full glory that was to come. We must 
eliminate from the Besurrection predicted by 
Jesus all modem notions suggestive of an 
apotheosis. The contemporary conscious- 
ness understood this **Bestoration'' (Acts 
3 ^^) as a revelation of Jesus' messiahship at 
the dawn of the Kingdom. Therefore when 
Jesus spoke of his resurrection the Disciples 
thought of the great messianic Besurrection 
in which he as the Messiah would be raised 
from the dead. 

The conversation during the descent from 
the mountain of Transfiguration is decisive on 
this point. Jesus spoke then for the first 
time to his most intimate disciples of *'the 
resurrection of the Son of Man from the 
dead'* (Mk 9 ®). They, however, were quite 
unable to think of *Hhe resurrection of the 
Son of man'* apart from the messianic Besur- 
rection. Their attention was entirely oc- 
cupied with the messianic event which Jesus' 
words suggested to them. They question 
therefore among themselves about the Besur- 
rection of the dead. What should that mean 
(Mk 9 10)? That is to say, the conditions 
thereof, so far as they can see, are not yet 

SOS 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

fulfilled. Elijah is not yet come (Mk 9 ^^). 
Jesus puts their minds at rest with the hint 
that Elijah had already appeared though 
men did not recognise him. He means the 
Baptist (Mk 9 i^, is). 

This conversation, in which otherwise it is 
impossible to detect at all any reasonable 
sequence of thought, becomes perfectly trans- 
parent and natural the moment it is noticed 
how the Disdples are unable to think of the 
resurrection which Jesus' words suggest ex- 
cept in the same thought with the general 
messianic Eesurrection. Therefore this talk 
during the descent from the mountain throws 
a clear light upon Jesus' later prophecies of 
his Passion and Eesurrection, because we are 
here in a position to observe the thoughts 
and questions which these words awaken in 
the hearts of the Disciples. Moreover this 
** resurrection prophecy'' lacks the mention 
of the three days which furnishes precisely 
the occasion for the critical attitude toward 
the subsequent prophecies of the Passion. 
In this respect the prediction during the de- 
scent agrees thoroughly with the last utter- 
ance before the High Priest. Both lack the 
definite indication of the time when the 
Eesurrection or the appearing upon the 
clouds of heaven shall take place. In the 

803 



THE MYSTERY OF 

messianic event both correspond chronologi- 
cally: resurrection and coming on the clouds 
signify only the revelation of Jesus ' messiah- 
ship on the great Eesurrection Day. 

This expectation of the eschatological Ees- 
urrection of the dead ruled the consciousness 
of Jesus and his contemporaries. He as- 
sumes it in his discourses at Jerusalem. Ex- 
pectation of the Kingdom and belief in the 
approaching Eesurrection of the dead be- 
long together^ It is, as we have already ob- 
served, an error in perspective to represent 
Jesus' thought in regard to the coming 
Kingdom as directed toward the future as if 
it had to do with subsequent generations. 
So the modern mind thinks. It was just the 
opposite with Jesus. The Kingdom had to 
do with the past generations. They rise up 
to meet the Judgment which inaugurates the 
Kingdom. 

The Eesurrection of the dead is the con- 
dition precedent to the establishment of the 
Kingdom. Through it all generations of the 
world are lifted out of their temporal se- 
quence and placed before God's judgment as 
contemporaries. For example, such a par- 
able even as that of the Lord's Vineyard re- 
quires the assumption of the Eesurrection of 
the dead (Mk 12 ^■^^). The whole history of 

S04f 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Israel is there described in the conduct of the 
husbandmen. Jesus speaks of the genera- 
tions of Israel from the days of the Prophets 
unto the people then present to whom his 
warning is addressed. The parable, however, 
pictures only one generation, because when 
it is a question of the Judgment, the whole 
people in its consecutive generations appears 
before God as one collective whole, — which 
means that it is raised up as a whole from the 
dead. 

In the same way it is to be explained that 
the people of Sodom of a generation long 
gone by are assured of a more tolerable fate 
than the present inhabitants of Capernaum 

(Mt 1123,24)^ 

Those who believed in the coming of the 
Kingdom beHeved also in the approaching 
Eesurrection of the dead. Wherefore the at- 
tack of the Sadducees was directed precisely 
against this point. Jesus ' reply to them, that 
*'when they shall rise from the dead they 
neither marry nor are given in marriage, but 
are as the angels in heaven '* (Mk 12 ^^), is 
to be understood as descriptive of conditions 
in the Kangdom of heaven, into which they 
enter through the Eesurrection from the 
dead. 

The ** Eesurrection of the dead'* was, in 

,205 



THE MYSTERY OF 

fine, only the mode in which the transforma- 
tion of the whole form of existence was ac- 
complished npon those who had already suc- 
cumbed to death. By the coming of the 
Kingdom of God, however, the earthly form 
of existence in general must be raised to 
another and an incomparably higher estate. 
From this point of view, those also are to 
experience a ** resurrection '* who before the 
great Event have not succumbed to death; 
for by a higher power their mode of exist- 
ence, too, will suddenly be transformed into 
another, which they will then share with 
those that have been awakened from death. 
In comparison with this new form of ex- 
istence the foregoing condition is a matter of 
indifference. It is all one whether from our 
earthly existence or from the sleep of death 
we pass into the messianic mode of being. 
In comparison with the latter -all being is 
'^death. It alone is *4ife.'' 

Wherefore, to the living, Jesus speaks of 
the way that leadeth unto ^^life'^ (Mt 7 ^*). 
He counsels men rather to part with a mem- 
ber of the body, whcjp. **life'' is in question, 
than to fail of gaining through the Eesur- 
rection a. part in the messianic existence 
(Mt 18 ®» ®). The rich young man asks what 
he must do *Ho inherit eternal life.*' Jesus 

206 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

is very sorrowful when he will not follow the 

counsel given him, because it is so hard for 

a rich man *Ho enter into the Kingdom of 
heaven'' (Mk 10 "'25)^ 

This disparagement of the earthly form of 
existence goes to the length of sacrificing 
altogether the earthly life for the sake of 
full assurance of life in the coming age. 
Hence, with the exhortation to follow him 
in suffering and reproach, Jesus declares 
that ** whosoever would save his life shall lose 
it.'' That is to say. Whosoever, through 
anxiety about his earthly existence, makes 
himself unworthy that the Son of Man inter- 
vene for him before God, forfeits thereby the 
messianic life which commences with the Ees- 
urrection (Mk 8 ^*^). 

When the Kingdom dawns it is all one 
whether we exist in a living or in a dead body. 
It is only with this persuasion that a man 
can meet persecution boldly. Wherefore 
Jesus says to the Apostles as he sends them 
forth : Be not afraid of them which kill the 
body but are not able to kill the * ' soul, ' ' but 
fear him who hath power to destroy both 
**souI" and body in hell (Mt 10 ^s). 

Si Paul furnishes a classical instance of 
this same connection between the eschatologi- 
cal exi)ectation of the early Church and the 

207 



THE MYSTERY OP 

EeBurrection of the dead (1 Con 15 ^^^^). 
What we have here is not a specifically Paul- 
ine thought, but a primitive Christian concep- 
tion to which Jesus had already given utter- 
ance. Flesh and blood, whether quick or 
dead, can in no wise have part in the King- 
dom. Therefore when the hour strikes and 
the dead are raised incorruptible, the living 
also shall be changed, putting on incorrup- 
tion and immortality. 

The Besurrection of the dead is the bridge 
from the **Now'^ to the ^^Then.^' It ac- 
counts for the duality of consciousness. 
Hence when Jesus spoke of his resurrection 
the Disciples correlated this word with the 
great context It signified for them the 
general Besurrection in which they too would 
arise in the form of existence appropriate to 
the Kingdom of God. True, they expected 
his resurrection, — ^not, however, as the 
^^Easter event,'^ but as the dawn of the mes- 
sianic Kingdom. Jesus was to be revealed 
as the risen Christ when he should come as 
Son of Man upon the clouds of heaven to usher 
in the messianic day. 

For our feeling, the death of Jesus is re- 
lated to the Besurrection as a discord in 
music* to its resolution. Owing to the dis- 
paragem!ent of every form of existence prior 

S08 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

to the messianic age, a much weaker accent, 
for the Disciples lay upon the death. What 
they conceived was an endless, eternal accord 
f oUowing upon a brief earthly prelude. 

Where we see a juxtaposition of messianic 
claim. Passion prediction, and Eesurrection 
prophecy, the Disciples perceived a much 
stricter connection of thought They beheld 
all in a messianic light. Hence they did not 
draw from Jesus' words three separate con- 
clusions: (1) that he was the Messiah; (2) 
that he must suffer and die ; (3) that he would 
rise from the dead. Bather, the impression 
they received was this : Our master will after 
his death, at the Eesurrection, be revealed as 
the Son of Man. At the same time they ques- 
tion within themselves what sort of persons 
they then will be and what office and dignity 
will fall to their lot in the new existence. 

It can thus be explained why their mes- 
sianic conception was not completely over- 
thrown by the notion of **the suffering and 
dying Messiah.*' Jesus had revealed to 
them neither the suffering, nor the dying, nor 
the risen Christ ; but he spoke to them of the 
Son of Man who was due to appear, and re- 
vealed to them that it was he who should 
come in that character when he had perfected 
himself by suffering here below. 

S09 



THE MYSTERY OF 

It can never be empliasised enough that in 
this respect Jesus' messiahship was com- 
pletely in line with the popular conception. 
The tragedy of his life is not to be accounted 
for by the incompatibility of his notion of 
messiahship and the general expectation, so 
that only conflicts could ensue which must 
bring about his death. This conception first 
appears in the Fourth Gospel. The histor- 
ical Jesus laid claim to messiahship only 
from the moment of the Eesurrection. 

This view of Jesus' messianic disclosures 
in the early Synoptic tradition is absolutely 
required by the conception of the primitive 
Church. The primitive Church assumes that 
Jesus' messianic consciousness was futur- 
istic when he talked to the Disciples and even 
when he gave answer to the High Priest. 
Even Peter's discourse in the Acts dates his 
messiahship from the moment of the Eesur- 
rection. Until then he was Jesus of Naza- 
reth. Only, the provisional condition of sit- 
ting on the right hand of God takes the place 
of the coming upon the clouds of heaven. 
** Jesus the Nazarene, a man approved of 
God xmto you by mighty works and wonders 
and signs which God did by him in the midst 
of you (Acts 2 ^2), him did God raise up 
(Acts 2 ^2) and hath made him both Lord and 

«10 



THE KINGDOM OE GOl> 

Messiah, this Jesus whom ye crucified" 
(Acts 2 8«). 

This testimony to the primitive concep- 
tion of Jesus' messiahship is of itself so 
weighty that it would put to silence the whole 
Synoptical tradition if that were of a dif- 
ferent tenor. How is it conceivable that the 
Disciples proclaimed that Jesus had entered 
upon his messianic existence through the 
Eesurrection, if already upon earth he had 
spoken of his messiahship as a dignity then 
actually possessed! As a matter of fact the 
early Synoptic tradition and the view of the 
primitive Church agree together completely. 
Both affirm with one voice that Jesus' mes- 
sianic consciousness was futuristic. 

If we had not this witness, the knowledge 
of Jesus ^ historical character and personality 
would be forever closed to us. For after his 
death all sorts of presumptions arose to ob- 
scure the consciousness of the futuristic 
character of his messiahship. His resurrec- 
tion as Messiah coincided with the general 
Eesurrection which should usher in the mes- 
sianic age — such was the perspective of the 
Disciples before his death. After his death 
his resurrection as Messiah constituted a fact 
for itself. Jesus was the Messiah before the 
messianic age! That is the fateful shifting 

211 



THE MYSTERY OF 

of the perspective. Therein lies the tragical 
element — ^but the magnificent as well — ^in the 
whole phenomenon of Christianity. 

The primitive Christian consciousness made 
the most strenuous efforts to fill the breach, 
trying in spite of it to conceive of Jesus * res- 
urrection as the dawn of the messianic era 
in the general rising of the dead. There was 
an effort to make it intelligible as analogous 
to a somewhat protracted interval between 
two scenes of the first act of a drama. 
Properly, however, they already stood within 
the messianic Eesurrection. Thus for Paul, 
Jesus Christ, proved to be the Messiah 
through the Resurrection of the dead, * ' is the 
first fruits of them that sleep" (1 Cor. 15 2^). 
The whole structure of Pauline theology and 
ethics rests upon this thought. Because 
they find themselves within this period, be- 
Uevers are in reality buried with Christ and 
with him raised again through baptism. 
They are **new" creatures, they are the 
** righteous," whose citizenship is in heaven. 
Until we grasp this fundamental notion we 
cannot perceive the unity in the manifold 
complications of St. Paul's world of thought. 

The Christian historical tradition sought 
another way out. It assumed a sort of pre- 
resurrection which coincided with the resur- 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

rection of Jesus. It lent to this the colouring 
of the messianic Day. Mt 27 ®^"®^ furnishes an 
example in legendary form of such a method 
of reconciling fact and theory. With Jesus ' 
death upon the cross a new world-era dawned. 
When he yielded up his spirit the veil of the 
Temple was rent from the top to the bottom 
and earthquakes, the signs of the end of the 
world, shook the earth ; the rocks were rent ; 
the graves opened; and many bodies of the 
saints that had fallen asleep were raised. 
After Jesus* resurrection they go forth out 
of the tombs into the holy city and appear 
unto many. So this narrative clings to the 
conception that the general Eesurrection of 
the dead under the omens of the messianic 
Day comes in conjunction with Jesus' death 
and consequent resurrection, — ^but still only 
as a sort of prelude. 

Time, indeed, proved mightier than the 
original conceptions. Inexorably it thrust it- 
self like a splitting wedge between Jesus' 
resurrection and the expected general Ees- 
urrection of the messianic Day, and with 
the temporal coincidence it destroyed also the 
casual connection in the original sense. The 
messiahship of Jesus stood up solidly out of 
the past. Those who confessed it and at the 
Bame time expected the Kingdom as a future 

«1S 



THE MYSTERY OF 

event lost all consciousness of the fact that in 
the preaching of Jesus his messiahship and 
the Eongdom were both of them future and 
coincident events. They began to regard the 
Gospel history from the point of view that 
Jesus was the Messiah. The title for this 
new view of the Gospel history was written 
by St PauL It reads: ^^ Jesus Christ,'* — ^the 
office and dignity of the risen Lord is com- 
bined with the historical personality in one 
idea. The Fourth Gospel has drawn the 
logical consequence therefrom and has so de- 
picted the history of Jesus as if he had come 
upon earth as the Messiah. 

It is the task of the historical investigator 
to emancipate himself for a moment from the 
imhistorical perspective and place the Syn- 
optic accounts in the right light. Only then, 
when one has grasped the futuristic element 
in Jesus' messianic consciousness, can one 
understand why he revealed his dignity to 
the Disciples as a ** secret,** why he desig- 
nated himself thereby as the Son of Man, and 
in what sense he spoke of his resurrection. 

5. The Betrayal hy Judas — the Last Dis- 
closure of the Secret of Messiahship. 

What did Judas actually betray? Ac- 
cording to the accounts of our Gospels it 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

looks as if lie had informed the Sanhedrin 
where at a particular hour they could appre- 
, hend Jesus. But, even if this indication of the 
place did play some part in the betrayal of 
Judas, it could only have been incidental. 
Where Jesus abode they could at any time 
find out, since he did nothing to make his 
coming and going secret. If then they de- 
sired to seize him, they had only to send a 
spy after him as he left Jerusalem in the 
evening, and they could have got all the in- 
formation they wanted. For this purpose 
they did not need one of the inner circle. 

As a matter of fact, however, the principal 
difficulty lay in an entirely different direc- 
tion. Not to arrest him but to convict him 
was what they could not accomplish, for they 
could bring nothing against him. With re- 
spect to him and his following they found 
themselves in the embarrassing fix into which 
every conscientious church discipline must 
necessarily fall some time or another: these 
people were too pious for them, pious beyond 
proper limits, inasmuch as they with too 
great enthusiasm believed what the others 
with seemly moderation of feeling con- 
fessed in their creed, — namely, that the King- 
dom is near. They could not get a convic- 
tion on the ground of the title of Forerunner 

216 



THE MYSTERY OF 

which the people attributed to him, for he 
had justified this attribution by signs. More- 
over he had never openly claimed for himself 
such a dignity. Nevertheless the manner of 
his behaviour was for them dangerous in the 
highest degree. At the head of the pious 
populace he terrorised them. For this 
reason they would gladly have made away 
with him — and could not. 

One can understand the attitude of the 
Sanhedrin and their difficulties if one steadily 
keeps in mind that, in view of Jesus* whole 
activity, the thought had not occurred to any- 
body that he could take himself to be the 
Messiah. Thus they knew no charge to 
bring against him, and had nothing for it but 
to try to catch him in his speech and discredit 
him with the people — and in this they were 
not successful. 

Then Judas appeared before them and put 
the deadly weapon into their hand. As they 
heard what he told them **they were glad,*' 
for now was he delivered into their power. 
Judas now seeks a favourable moment to de- 
liver the betrayed into their hands (Mk 14 ^^). 

What he had betrayed to them we can see 
from the process of the trial. The witnesses 
of the Pharisees can adduce nothing that 
would justify his conviction. When, how- 

X16 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

ever, the witnesses have withdrawn, the High 
Priest puts the question to Jesus directly, 
whether he is the Messiah. To prove such a 
claim on Jesus' part they could not adduce 
the necessary witnesses, — ^for there were 
none. The High Priest is here in posses- 
sion of Jesus* secret. That was the betrayal 
of Judas I Through him the Sanhedrin 
knew that Jesus claimed to be something dif- 
ferent from what the people held him to be, 
though he raised no protest against it. 

They got the decisive charge through the 
betrayed secret of Oaesarea Philippi. To be 
Elijah, the prophet of the last times, was no 
religious crime. But to claim to be Messiah, 
that was blasphemy! The perfidy of the 
charge lay in the High Priest's insinuation 
that Jesus held himself then to be the Mes- 
siah, just as he stood there before him. This 
Jesus repudiated with a proud word about 
his coming as Son of Man. Nevertheless 
he was condemned for blasphemy. 

We have therefore three revelations of the 
secret of messiahship, which so hang together 
that each subsequent one implies the fore- 
going. On the mountain near Bethsaida was 
revealed to the Three the secret which was 
disclosed to Jesus at his baptism. That was 
after the harvest. A few weeks later it was 

«17 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

known to the Twelve, by the fact that Peter 
at Caesarea Philippi answered Jesus' ques- 
tion out of the knowledge which he had at- 
tained upon the mountain. One of the 
Twelve betrayed the secret to the High Priest. 
This last revelation of the secret was fatal, 
for it brought about the death of Jesus. He 
was condemned as Messiah althov^h he had 
never appeared in that role^ 



S18 



CHAPTER IX 

THE SEGBET OF THE PASSION 

1. The Pre-Messianic Affliction. 

The reference to the Passion belonged as a 
matter of course to the esohatological pre- 
diction. A time of unheard of aflBU-ction must 
precede the coming of the Kingdom. Out of 
these woes the Messiah will be brought to 
birth. That was a view prevalent far and 
wide : in no other wise could the events of the 
last times be imagined. 

According to this view Jesus* words must 
be interpreted. It will appear then that in 
his preaching of the Kingdom he brought in- 
to sharp prominence the thought of the Af- 
fliction of the last times. We always assume 
that when he speaks of persecutions which 
his Disciples shall encounter he means to pre- 
dict what they must go through when they are 
left alone and orphaned on earth after his 
death. That is totally false. After his death 
Jesus will be Messiah through the Eesurrec- 
tion, and therewith the glory of the Kingdom 
dawns. Not what they must withstand after 
his death, but what they are to be in the King- 

819 



THE MYSTERY OF 

dom is the thought which concerns the Dis- 
ciples on the way to Jerusalem. 

When Jesus speaks of suffering and per- 
secution it is a question of the afflictions 
which his followers must bear with him be- 
fore the dawn of the Kingdom. What is 
meant is the last desperate attack of the 
powers of this world at enmity with God, 
which shall sweep like a flood over those who 
in expectation of the Kingdona represent the 
divine power in the godless world. Hence 
Jesus constitutes the focus upon which the 
Affliction concentrates. He is the rock upon 
which the waves dash themselves to pieces. 
Whosoever would not be torn away by the 
flood must cling stedfastly to him. 

When he says that his mission is not to 
bring peace upon earth but a sword, when he 
speaks of the uprising which he brings about, 
in which the most sacred earthly ties shall be 
broken, in which one must follow him laden 
with the cross and count one's earthly life 
for naught (Mt 10 s^-*^)^ j^^ means by this 
the great persecution of the last times. He 
who hastens the coming of the Kingdom 
brings also this Affliction to pass, for it is out 
of this travail indeed that the Kingdom and 
the Messiah are bom. 

Hence the harsh accord heard throughout 

220 



THE KINGDOM OE GOD 

the messianic harmonies I Jesus concludes 
the Beatitudes with the intimation that his 
Disciples are blessed if they are hated and 
persecuted and all manner of evil is spoken 
against them for his sake. Then have they 
indeed reason to rejoice and be exceeding 
glad, for in what they must endure is re- 
vealed their right to membership in the Eang- 
dom of God. While they are still afficted by 
the power of this world their reward is al- 
ready prepared in heaven (Mt 5 ^^» ^^). 

^'Preach, saying, the Kingdom of God is at 
hand, ' * was Jesus ' injunction to the Apostles 
when sending them out. Therewith, how- 
ever, he prepared them impressively for the 
Affiction of the last times, for the hand of 
the world-clock approaches the great hour. 
They must know it, in order that they may 
not think that something strange has befallen 
them when they are brought to trial by the 
world-power, when uprising and i)ersecution 
threaten them and bring their life into 
danger. They must know it, in order that 
they may not doubt and deny him and be of- 
fended in him when he is delivered into the 

4 

hands of men, for he himself as the mighty 
preacher of the Kingdom has incited this up- 
rising. When, however, the world-power ap- 
pears to^/conquer, then God in his omnipo- 



THE MYSTERY OF 

tence stands above. Not those that kill the 
body must they fear, but the almighty Lord 
who in the Judgment can destroy both soul 
and body in heU. In this last uprising the 
world-power judges itself: after the Judg- 
ment comes the Kingdom. That is the fun- 
damental thought of the charge to the Apos- 
tles. 

Likewise the embassage to the Baptist con- 
cludes with a similar intimation. The King- 
dom is near, he would have them say to him ; 
my preaching, signs, and wonders confirm it ; 
and he attains blessedness whosoever is not 
, offended in me, i. e. whosoever is faithful to 
me in the pre-messianic Affiction. 

His warning of the heavy time to come is 
directed most impressively, however, to those 
whom the Apostles' preaching has drawn 
about him in trustful expectation of the King- 
dom. In the gathering dusk of evening he 
had celebrated with them the great Supper 
beside the sea. As one who knew himself to 
be the Messiah he had distributed to them 
sacred food, and thereby, without their sus- 
pecting it, had consecrated them to be par- 
takers of the messianic feast. The following 
morning, however, he called them about him 
at Bethsaida and exhorted them to be ready 
to sacrifice their life in the Affliction. Who^ 

222 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

soever shall be ashamed of him and of his 
words in the humiliation which mdst over- 
take him in this adulterous and sinful world, 
him will the Son of Man refuse to recognise 
when he shall appear in the glory of his 
Father surrounded by his angels (Mi 8 ^^-ssj^ 

2. The Idea of the Passion in the First Pe- 
riod. 

The Passion therefore belonged to Jesus* 
preaching from the beginning. In the Af-r 
fliction of the last times his followers must 
pass with him through suffering to glory — 
so his hearers understood him. Only, they 
did not know that he with whom they must 
suffer would be revealed as Messiah. 

In Jesus' messianic consciousness the 
thought of suffering acquired now, as applied 
to himself, a mysterious significance. The 
messiahship which he became aware of at his 
baptism was not a possession, nor a mere ob- 
ject of expectation ; but in the eschatological 
conception it was implied as a matter of 
course that through the trial of suffering he 
must become what God had destined him to 
be. His messianic consciousness was never 
without the thought of the Passion. Suffer- 
ing is the way to the revelation of messiah- 
ship! 



THE MYSTERY OF 

What he experienced in this age repre- 
sented the hidden life and labour of the mes- 
siah. Suffering, however, was allotted to 
this role. It was Jewish doctrine that the 
Messiah must be full of chastisement, for the 
sufferings are necessary to the maldng of the 
perfectly righteous man (Weber, p. 343). 

This messianic consciousness of Jesus 
shows the same deepening of moral tone as 
does his eschatology. According to the cus- 
tomary modernising conception, it is assumed 
that during the greater part of his ministry 
Jesus did not think of the Passion, but was 
first obliged to entertain that thought by the 
malicious enmity of the Scribes. Thus his 
messiahship receives in the first period an 
ethical-idyllic cast, in the second, a modem 
hue of resignation. The historio-eschato- 
logical picture is at once livelier, deeper, and 
more moral. Jesus* character did not under- 
go an ** evolution'* through the acceptance of 
the idea of the Passion. From the beginning 
he knew himself as Messiah only in so far as 
he was resolved through suffering to be puri- 
fied unto perfection. As the one who is des- 
tined to bear rule in the new age he must be- 
forehand be delivered into the power of un- 
godliness in order that he may there approve 



THE KINGDOM OF. GOD 

himself for the divine lordship he is to exer- 
cise. Out of such a messianic consciousness 
as this he adjures those about hhn to remain 
true so that he can recognise them as his own 
when the glory dawns. Thus the active 
ethical trait which constituted the depth of 
the secret of the Kingdom is a controlling 
factor also in the secret of messiahship. 

The historical problem presents itself now 
in this form: In the first period Jesus ex- 
pressed the thought of the Passion much 
more frequently than in the second, and he 
uttered it openly. Every discourse of some 
length concludes with such an intitnation. 
His own Disciples were familiar with the 
thought of seeing hhn humiliated in the Af- 
fliction. In spite of this, however, the dis- 
closure at Caesarea Philippi appeared to the 
Disciples a new thing, and so it was in fact. 
For it was no longer a question simply of the 
suffering which the great herald of the King- 
dom must undergo in company with his own 
in the final Affliction ; but now he suffers who 
is to be the Messiah. This suffering, more- 
over, does not any longer occur in the general 
Affliction of the last times, but Jesus suffers 
alone, and his suffering is now represented as 
a purely earthly, historical event I He will 

225 



THE MYSTERY OF 

be delivered to the Comicil and by it con- 
demned to death I That was the new thing 
which remained a secret for the Disciples. 

3. The ^^ Temptation' ' and the Divine Onv- 
nipotence. 

A peculiar note of hesitancy appears in the 
thought of the Passion. At one time death 
seems an absolute necessity; then again — ^for 
example, in Gethsemane — Jesus recognises 
once more the possibility that the Passion 
may still be spared him. But as a matter of 
fact the idea of the Passion subsisted with- 
out respect to earthly success or failure. 
Therefore the hesitancy ought not to be 
brought into connection with this. As Jesus 
journeyed towards Jerusalem to die he did 
not in a corner of his heart indulge the 
thought that God in his omnipotence might 
j)erhaps be able nevertheless to make his way 
a triumphal march and show himself through 
him victorious over the Pharisees and the 
Council. That, according to his feeling, 
would have been a ** human*' way of think- 
ing, such as he had reproved in Peter 
(Mk8«3). For in the affairs of God's King- 
dom he cannot oppose to one another the op- 
position of the Scribes and the divine omnipo- 
tence; it is a question of a diyine drama 

S26 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

in which they were mere subordinate actors 
with a prescribed role, like the minions that 
arrested him at their behest. The hesitancy 
must therefore have its ground in the divine 
will itself. 

It is the specific characteristic of Jesus* 
view, that the divine will has indeed, on the 
one hand, designedly preordained the mes- 
sianic drama in the well known form ; yet, on 
the other hand again, God remains sover- 
eignly free with respect to his plan. By a 
messianic programme established once and 
for all the divine omnipotence behind it is in 
no wise bound ! It knows no determinism at 
all. 

Jesus expected of this onmipotence that it 
could still receive into the estate of blessed- 
ness even such as by their behaviour had for- 
feited membership in the Kingdom. Ac- 
cording to the accepted standards it is in- 
deed impossible that the rich can enter into 
life. But with God all things are possible 
(Mk 10 27). 

It was a maxini that whosoever would 
reign with the coming Messiah must suffer 
with Jesus. But yet he dared not promise 
his two intimate Disciples, James and John, 
the seats upon the throne, although he ex- 
pected that they would share his Passion. 

287 



THE MYSTERY OF 

He might by this infringe upon God's om- 
nipotence (Mk 10 85-*°). 

Thus ^e Affiction also of the last times 
had its place indeed in the divinely ordained 
course of the messianic drama. But yet it 
lay in God's unrestricted omnipotence that 
he might eliminate it and permit the King- 
dom to dawn without this season of trial. 
Therefore men might pray God that he would 
suffer that heavy hour of probation to pass 
by. Jesus enjoined this upon his Disciples 
in the same prayer in which he taught them 
to make petition for the coming Kingdom. 
He teaches them to implore God for the final 
state of blessedness, in which his name will 
be hallowed and his will be done on earth as 
it is in heaven ; but at the same time they are 
to beg him, not to lead them into the *' Temp- 
tation,'' not to give them into the power of 
the Evil, not to oblige them to make satis- 
faction for their sins by the endurance of 
the Affliction of the last times; but to deliver 
them by • his omnipotence from the power 
of the Evil when the ungodly world for the 
last time asserts itself at the coming of the 
Kingdom for which they pray. That is the 
inner connection of the last three petitions 
of the Lord's Prayer. 

The Lord's Prayer thus exhibits in the 

828 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

first three and the last three petitions a 
purely esohatological character. We have 
the same contrast as in the Beatitudes, the 
charge to the Apostles, the embassage to the 
Baptist, and the discourse at Bethsaida, 
First it is a question of the coming of the 
Kingdom, then of the Affliction of the last 
times. We perceive from the Lord's Prayer, 
however, that there is no absolute necessity 
for this Affliction, but that it is only relatively 
determined in God's almighty will. 

The Affliction, in fact, represents in its 
extremest form the repentance requisite for 
the Kingdom, Whosoever comes through 
that test approved makes satisfaction for his 
transgressions in the godless a^on. Through 
conflict and suffering men wrest themselves 
free from this power to become instruments 
of the divine will in the Kingdom of God. 
That is to be conceived collectively. The 
faithful adherents of the-Kingdom as a com- 
munity make the satisfaction. The indi- 
vidual thereby perfects and approves himself. 
Such is God's will. Jesus, however, prays 
with them to God that he may be pleased in 
his onmipotence to forgive them the debt 
without satisfaction, as they forgive their 
debtors. That means remission pure and 
simple, without atonement. May it please 

^9 



THE MYSTERY OF 

God not to lead them through the '^Temptor 
tion,^' but straightway to release them from 
the power of the world. 

Only so can one understand how Jesus 
throughout his ministry can assume forgive- 
ness of sins and yet here expressly prays for 
it; and how he can speak of a temptation 
which comes from God. It is a question in 
fact of the general messianic remission of 
debts and the Temptation of the messianic 
Affiction. Therefore these petitions con- 
stitute the conclusion of the Kingdom-prayer. 

What Jesus here in common prayer peti- 
tions for the community, that he implores for 
himself when his hour is come. In Geth- 
semane he prostrates himself before God. In 
moving prayer he appeals to God^s omnip- 
otence: Abba, Father, all things are pos- 
sible unto thee (Mk 14 ®^). He would that 
the cup of suffering might pass his lips with- 
out his needing to taste it. Also he rouses 
the three Disciples, bidding them to watch 
and pray God that he may spare them the 
Temptation, for the flesh is weak. 

4. The Idea of the Passion in the Second 
Period. 
With the revelation at Csesarea Philippi 
cease all intimations that the believers must 

890 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

pass with Jesus through the Affliction. Ac- 
cording to the secret which he imparts to the 
Disciples he alone sujBfers. In Jerusalem he 
addressed not one urgent word, either to the 
people or to the Disciples, about following 
him in suffering. Indeed he actually takes 
back what he before had said. The morn- 
ing after the Supper by the seashore, ad- 
dressing those whom he had consecrated unto 
the messianic banquet, he makes their blessed- 
ness dependent upon following him in suffer- 
ing. To the partakers of the Last Supper at 
Jerusalem he calmly stated beforehand that 
they would all be ** offended ^^ in him that 
night I He coupled this with no condemnation 
— ^for it is so determined in the Scripture! 
Is it not written, "I will smite the shepherd, 
and the sheep shall be scattered'*? There- 
fore, even if they are offended in him, if even 
they forsake him, in his glory he will still 
gather them again, and as Messiah — ^for that 
he is as the risen one — ^he will go before them 
unto Galilee (Mk 14 ^e. 28)^ 

What at an earlier period he had required 
of all, that he now does not expect even of 
him who boasted that he alone would stand 
by him. ** Before the cock crow twice thou 
shalt deny me thrice,** said he to Peter (Mk 

231 



THE MYSTERY OF 

This change must be connected with the 
form which the idea of the Passion assumed 
in the second period. There must have oc- 
curred an alteration ia the conception of the 
AflEliotion of the last times. The others are 
freed from the trial of suffering, Jesus suf- 
fers alone ; — and in fact the humiliation con- 
sists in the death to which the scribes con- 
sign him. It is by this means that the final 
affliction now accomplishes itself. His faith- 
ful followers are spared. He suffers in their 
stead, for he gives his life a ransom for many. 

Jesus has not disclosed in what way this 
secret was made known to him in the days of 
solitude after the mission of the Twelve. 
The form of the secret of the Passion shows, 
however, that two experiences had influence 
upon hiuL 

First, the death of the Baptist. The Bap- 
tist for him was Elijah. If he was slain by 
the hand of man before the messianic Day, 
such was God's will, and so it was foreor- 
dained iQ the messianic drama. This oc- 
curred while the Disciples were away. His 
embassage to the Baptist perhaps never 
reached him. He must come now to an under- 
standing of this matter. For this cause he 
wishes to withdraw into solitude with his 
companions. 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

How much he was preoccupied with the 
thought of the Baptist's death is shown by 
the conversation which followed the revela- 
tion to the Three on the mountain. It was 
ordained in the Scripture that Elijah must 
meet such a fate at the hands of meh. So 
also it is written of the Son of Man that he 
must suffer many things and be set at naught 
(Mk 9 i2'i»). 

Hitherto he had spoken only in general 
terms of the final Affliction as an event of the 
last times. Now, however, it has been ful- 
filled upon the Baptist as an historical event. 
That is a sign, which indicates how it will be 
fulfilled upon himself. 

This indication came precisely at the time 
when he was compelled by the course of 
events to reflect upon the final Affliction. 
After the return of the Twelve he had ex- 
pected it as an impending event. But it 
failed to occur. What is more, the Kingdom 
failed therewith to appear! In sending out 
the Twelve he had told them that they would 
be surprised by the overflowing woes ere they 
had gone through all the cities of Israel, — 
and they had returned without witnessing the 
beginning of the woes or the dawn of the 
Kingdom. 

The report with which they returned 

SS3 



THE MYSTERY OP 

showed, however, that all was ready. Al- 
ready the power of ungodliness was broken, 
for else the nnclean spirits would not have 
been subject to them. The Kingdom was com- 
pellingly hastened by the repentance prac- 
tised since the days of the Baptist In this 
respect also the measure was full, — ^that was 
proved by the multitudes which thronged 
about him in faithful expectation. So all was 
ready — and still the Kingdom did not come I 
The delay of the eschatological coming of 
the Kingdom, — ^that was the great fact 
which drove Jesus at that time once and 
again into solitude to seek light upon the mys- 
tery. 

Before the Kingdom could come the Afflic- 
tion must arrive. But it failed to arrive. It 
must be brought about in order that the King- 
dom may thus be constrained to come. Ee- 
pentance and the subjugation of the power 
of ungodliness did not avail by themselves; 
but the violent stormers of the Kingdom must 
be reinforced by one stronger still, the future 
Messiah, who brings down upon himself the 
final Affiction in the form in which it had al- 
ready been accomplished upon Elijah. Thus 
the secret of the Kingdom merges in the 
secret of the Passion. 

The conception of the final Affiction con- 
SSI 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tains the thought of atonement and purificar 
tion. All they who are destined for the King- 
dom, must win forgiveness for the guilt con- 
tracted in the earthly aeon by encountering 
stedfastly the world-power as it collects it- 
self for a last attack. For through this guilt 
they were still subject to the power of ungod- 
liness. This guilt constitutes a counter 
weight which holds back the coming of the 
Kingdom. 

But now God does not bring the Affliction 
to pass. , And yet the atonement must be 
made. Then it occurred to Jesus that he as 
the coming Son of Man must accomplish the 
atonement in his own person. He who one 
day shall reign over the believers as Messiah 
now humbles himself under them and serves 
them by giving his life a ransom for many, in 
order tiiat the Kingdom may dawn upon them. 
That is his mission in the estate which pre- 
cedes his celestial glory. **For this he is 
come^' (Mk 10 ^^). He must suffer for the 
sins of those who are ordained for his King- 
dom. In order to carry this out, he journeys 
up to Jerusalem, that there he may be put to 
death by the secular authority, just as Elijah 
who went before him suffered at the hand 
of Herod. That is the secret of the Passion. 
Jesus did actually die for the sins of men, 

S36 



THE MYSTERY OF 

even thongh it was in another sense than that 
which Ansehn's theory assumes. 

5. Isaiah 40 ^^: The Secret of the Passion 
Foretold in the Scripture. 

**How is it written of the Son of Man? 
That he must suffer many things and be set at 
naught^' (Mk 9 ^^). The new form of the 
secret of the Passion is derived from the 
Scripture. In the picture of the suffering 
servant of God 4,Jesus recognised himself. 
There he foundyfiis vocation of suffering de- 
picted in advance. 

In order, however, to understand how his 
secret came to him from out the Scripture, 
the picture of the suffering servant of God 
must be set in the great framework in which 
it belongs. The modem-historical solution 
cannot do this. It confines itself to the no- 
tion of a meek self -surrender. As soon, how- 
ever, as it is once perceived that Jesus' idea 
of the Passion was eschatological, it is evi- 
dent also in what a great context he must 
view the figure of the suffering servant of 
God. Accordingly, Isaiah 40 ®® was nothing 
else but the prophetic representation of the 
events of the last time in the midst of which 
he knew himself to be. 

The passage commences with the proclama- 

236 



THE KINGDOM OP GOD 

tion that God's reign is about to begin. The 
preparer of the way comes upon the scene. 
He cries that the earthly passes away when 
the Lord, dealing reward and recompense, 
appears in his glory. The hour dawns in 
which he gathers his flock and brings in the 
era of peace. 

The Elect is there. He proclaims right- 
eousness in truth. God has put his spirit 
upon him (Isai. 42 ^ ff.). He shall establish 
judgment upon the earth ; the cities wait upon 
his teaching. But before the glory dawns 
and the bearer of the divine spirit rules with 
power and righteousness over the peoples he 
must pass through an estate of humiliation. 
Others do not understand why he is put to 
shame. They think God has rejected him, 
and know not that he bears tiieir infirmities; 
is pierced for their transgressions, and smit- 
ten for their offences. The oppressed serr 
vant is meek and openeth not his mouth. For 
the transgression of the people he is stricken 
to death. Then, however, will the Lord 
glorify him. He hath called him to this from 
his mother ^s womb. He is ordained to bring 
again Jacob and to save Israel. He shall be 
for a light to the Gentiles, that God's salva- 
tion may extend unto the ends of the earth 
(Isai. 49 Iff.; 52 Iff.; 53 Iff.). 

237 



THE MYSTERY OF 

Upon the delineation of the suffering of 
the servant of God there follows a description 
of the judgment upon the whole worid and 
upon Israel (Isai. 54-65). In the end, how- 
ever, the glory of God breaks foriii. He is 
entlu*oned above the new heaven and the new 
earth (Isai. 65-66). When the Judgment 
is accomplished, then the rejoicing breaks out, 
for the blessed out of the whole world, out 
of every tribe and nation, will gather unto 
him and do him reverence. 

One must grasp the dramatic unity in these 
chapters in order to enter into sympathy 
with one who sought here mysterious intima- 
tion about the things of the last time. Jesus' 
idea of the Passion is in the end completely 
absorbed in that of the Deuterd-Isaiah. Like 
the servant of God, he too is destined to reign 
in glory. But first he appears, meek and un- 
recognised, in the role of a preacher who 
works righteousness. He must pass also 
through suffering and humiliation ere God 
permit the glorious consummation to dawn. 
What he endures is an atonement for the ini- 
quity of others. This is a secret between him- 
self and God. The others caonot and need 
not understand it, for when the glory dawns 
they will recognise that he has suffered for 
them. Wherefore Jesus did not need to ex- 

288 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

plain his Passion to the people and to the Dis- 
ciples, and ought not to do so. It must remain 
a secret, — so it is written in the Scripture. 
Even to those to whom he foretold what was 
coming he uttered it as a secret. At his ap- 
pearing as Son of Man the scales must fall 
from their eyes. In the glory of the King- 
dom they then shall recognise that he has 
suffered in order that they may be spared 
and have peace. The secret is intelligible 
only retrospectively, from the point of view 
of the glory that shall be revealed. 

Therefore it makes no difference if his own 
followers turn away from him in his humilia- 
tion and men are offended in him as though 
he were chastised of God. The Scripture 
does not reckon it against them as sacrilege, 
but has so ordained it. The moment there- 
fore the secret of the Passion is made clear 
to him by the Scripture he no more says, 
Whosoever is ashamed of me in my humilia- 
tion, the same is condemned ; but. Ye shall all 
be offended in me, — ^knowing at the same time 
that they all shall be gathered about him at 
the Eesurrection, 

Under the injBuence, therefore, of the 
Deutero-Isaiah the idea of the general Afflic- 
tion of the last times was transformed into 
tibe personal secret of Jesus' Passion. 

SS9 



THE MYSTERY OF 

i6. The ^^ Human'' Element in the Secret of 
the Passion. 

The innermost nature of the idea of suffer- 
ing underwent no change in consequence of 
the secret of the Passion of the second epoch. 
For Jesus, suffering, even in this form, re- 
mained pre-eminently the moral condition of 
the dignity ordained to him. 

Now, however, the Affliction exhibits the 
concrete traits of a determinate event. Jesus 
brings it down from the vague heights of 
apocalyptic drama to the level of human his- 
tory. Therein lies something prophetic of 
the future of Christianity. After Jesus' 
death the whole messianic drama of the last 
times is dissolved in human history. This 
development began with the secret of the 
Passion. 

Thus it is, too, that the secret of the Pas- 
sion, as compared with the idea of suffering 
of the first period, exhibits more human 
traits. There is a quality of compassionate 
consideration for others in the thought that 
he makes satisfaction in the Passion for the 
adherents of the Kingdom, in order that they 
may be exempted from the trial in which per- 
chance they might prove weak. The peti- 
tion, *'Lead us not into the Temptatic^ but 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

deliver us from the Evil,'' is now fuljBlled 
in his Passion. 

This deeply human trait is especially evi- 
dent in Gethsemane. Only over the three in- 
timate Disciples still hovers the possibility 
that they may be obliged to pass with him 
through suffering and temptation. The sons 
of Zebedee, to secure their claim that they sit 
with him upon the throne, boasted that they 
could drink with him his cup and undergo 
with him the baptism of suffering — and this 
prospect he held out to them (Mk 10 ^®» *^). 
Peter, however, swore that he would not deny 
him; even if all others should forsake him, 
he desired to die with him (Mk 14 ^^) . These 
three Jesus had taken with him to the place 
where he prayed. While he implored God 
that the cup might pass him by, there over- 
came him a sorrowful anxiety for the Three. 
If God does now actually send them with him 
through the Passion, will they hold out as 
they are bold to believe? Wherefore he is 
mindful of them in that sad hour. Twice he 
arouses himself and wakes them out of sleep, 
bidding them watch and pray to God that he 
lead them not into the Temptation, even if he 
will not spare him this cup ; for the spirit is 
willing, but the flesh is weak. That is per- 



THE MYSTERY OP 

haps the most touching moment in Jesus* life. 
Some have dared to call Gethsemane Jesus' 
weak hour; but in reality it is precisely the 
hour in which his supernatural greatness is 
revealed in his deeply human compassion. 

7. The Idea of the Passion in the Primitive 
Church. The Shifting of the Perspective. 

Jesus carried with him to the grave the 
secret of the Passion which was to be revealed 
to the inheritors of the Kingdom at its com- 
ing. But the Kingdom did not come. Thus 
it is to be explained that though he indeed had 
given intimation of his Passion to the Disci- 
ples, yet they, when the event came to pass, 
knew no interpretation of it. Nevertheless, 
in some way they had to explain it, by the 
help of such intimations as they could recall. 
This accounts for the fact that the theory of 
the early Church regarding the Passion of 
Jesus was far poorer than his Secret. The 
explanation of the Church focussed princi- 
pally upon one fact: In consequence of the 
Passion and the Resurrection from the dead 
he is the Messiah. In this sense the Passion 
and the Exaltation are fore-ordained in the 
Scripture. 

While Jesus' Secret brought his death and 
the dawning of the Kingdom into the closest 

»4i2 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

temporal and causal connection, for the primi- 
tive Chnrch, on the other hand, a past event, 
as such, constituted the object to be explained, 
since, the Kingdom had not arrived and the 
original causal connection was dissolved along 
with the temporal. 

Now with reference to his death Jesus had 
spoken also of atonement and forgiveness of 
sins. But the thoughts which he associated 
therewith the events had rendered entirely 
impossible. The indefinite **many,'* who 
were to apply the ransom to themselves in 
the knowledge that he had suffered for them, 
simply did not exist; for the Kingdom had 
not yet appeared. Only from that point of 
vantage, however, could one apprehend that 
he had performed the Atonement of AflKction 
for the inheritors of the Kingdom. 

In the meantime the situation was entirely 
different: *Hhe believers" had taken the 
place of the **many.'' Those who believe in 
the messiahship of Jesus have the forgiveness 
of sins, — ^this sentence, as the sermon at 
Pentecost shows, was a constituent of the 
earlier Apostolic preaching (Acts 2 ®®). But 
to what extent one had thereby forgiveness of 
sins, — ^in that consisted the problem. This, 
however, was historically insoluble, for ac- 
cording to Jesus' secret of the Passion the 

US 



THE MYSTERY OF 

forgiveness of sins applied not to those who 
believe in Jesus-Christ, but to the inheritors 
of the Kingdom. Therefore, however pro- 
found they may be, and however true to the 
religious consciousness of their time, none 
of the attempts to explam the significance of 
the Passion, from Paul to Eitschl, apprehend 
the thought of Jesus, because they proceed 
upon an entirely different assumption. 

As all of these theories sought nevertheless 
to legitimate themselves historically, we wit- 
ness the astonishing spectacle, that the most 
diverse interpretations of his Passion are put 
into the mouth of Jesus,— of which, however, 
not one can even remotely explain how out 
of such a conception the primitive Apostolic 
estimate of the Death could have been derived. 
The same is true of the modem-historical 
solution. If Jesus taught the Disciples to 
imderstand > the ethical significance of his 
death, why did the primitive Christian ex- 
planation of the Passion confine itself to the 
notion of conformity with Scripture and the 
'^forgiveness of sins*'? 

To this question the modem-historical solu- 
tion furnishes no answer. The eschatolog- 
ico-historical, on the other hand, is able to 
take account perspectively of the necessary 
distortion which Jesus' idea of the Passion 

S44 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

underwent in the primitive Church. It in- 
dicates which elements alone of the Passion 
secret could still subsist after his death. Be- 
cause it grasps the cannection between the 
early Christian interpretation and the 
thought of Jesus the eschatologico-historical 
solution is the right one. 

The abolition of the causal connection be- 
tween the death of Jesus and the realisation 
of the Kingdom was fatal to the early Chris- 
tian eschatology. With the secret of the Pas- 
sion, the secret of the Kingdom likewise per- 
ished. This, however, meant nothing less 
than that eschatology lost precisely that 
specific ** Christian '' character which Jesus 
had imparted to it. The active ethical ele- 
ment which served to moralise it dropped out. 
Thus the eschatology of the early Church 
was **dechristianised'' by Jesus' death. 
Therewith it sank back again to the level of 
contemporary Jewish thought. The King- 
dom is again an object of expectation merely. 
That moral conversion is effective actively to 
hasten its coming, — ^this secret was buried 
with Jesus. Now men repented and strove 
after moral renewal as in the days of the 
Baptist. 

This dechristianising was manifest espe- 
cially in the matter of the final Affliction. 

»45 



THE MYSTERY OP 

According to the Passion idea of the first 
period, the believers must suffer along with 
the Messiah ; according to that of the second, 
he was resolved to endure the AfSiction for 
them. In the early Church the believers ex- 
pected the AflBiction before the appearing of 
the Messiah, as was the case in the contempor- 
ary Jewish conception ; for the Passion secret 
of Jesus was not known to them. Therefore 
the Jewish apocalypses belonged to them just 
as much as to Ihe other Jews, only with the 
difference that the crucified Jesus was to be 
the coming Messiah. Early Christian escha- 
tology was therefore still ** Christian'* only 
through the person of Jesus, no longer 
through his spirit, as was the case in the 
secret of the Kingdom of God and in the 
secret of the Passion. 

This furnishes a criterion for judging **the 
Synoptic apocalypse * ' ( Mk 13 ) . Even though 
it may contain single eschatological sayings 
attributable to Jesus, the discourse as such is 
necessarily unhistorical. It betrays the 
perspective of the time after Jesus' deatlu 
During the days at Jerusalem Jesus could 
speak of no general AflKction before the com- 
ing of the Son of Man. The Synoptic apoc- 
alypse stands in direct contradiction to the 
secret of the Passion, since this indeed simply 

246 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

abolishes the general Affliction of the last 
times. Therefore it is nnhistorical. Apoc- 
alyptic discourses with intimation of the 
final Affliction belong to the Galilean period 
at the time of the mission of the Twelve. 
The discourse to the Apostles on that occa- 
sion is the historical Synoptic apocalypse. 
About a time of affliction after his death Jesus 
never uttered a word to his Disciples, for it 
lay beyond his field of vision. 

Therefore with the death of Jesus, and pre- 
cisely by reason of it, eschatology— notwith- 
standing that the primitive Christian com- 
munity still completely lived in it — ^was vir- 
tually done away with. It was destined to be 
forced out of the Christian ** Weltan- 
schauung,'' for it was **dechristianised" by 
the fact that in parting with the secret of the 
Kingdom of God and the idea of the Passion 
it had forfeited also the inner ethical life 
which was breathed into it by Jesus.- A tree 
in full bloom stricken at the root, — such was 
the fate of eschatology, to wilt and wither, 
although no one at first suspected it was 
doomed. In the fact that subsequent history 
compulsorily created in the Church an un- 
eschatological view of the world, it only ac- 
complished what in the nature of things was 
already determined by Jesus' death. 



THE MYSTERY OF 

The death of Jesus the end of eschatologyl 
The Messiah who upon earth was not such — 
the end of the messianic expectation! The 
view of the world in which Jesus lived and 
preached was eschatological : the ** Christian 
view of the worW which he founded by his 
death carries mankind forever beyond escha- 
tology I That is the great secret of the Chris- 
tian ** scheme of salvation.*' 

For Jesus and his Disciples his death was, 
according to the eschatological view, merely a 
transitional event As soon, however, as the 
event occurred it became the central fact 
upon which the new, uneschatological view 
was built up. In primitive Christianity the 
old and new were still side by side. 

The adherents of Jesus believed in the com- 
ing of the Kingdom because his imposing per- 
sonality accredited the message. The Church 
after his death believed in his messiahship 
and expected the coming of the ElngdonL 
We believe that in his ethical-religious per- 
sonality, as revealed in his ministry and suf- 
fering, the Messiah and the Eingdom are 
come. 

The situation may be likened to the course 
of the sun. Its brightness breaks forth while 
it is still behind the mountains. The dark 
clouds take colour from its rays, and the con- 

248 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

flict of light and darkness produces a play of 
fantastic imagery. The sun itself is not yet 
visible : it is there only in the sense that the 
light issues from it. As the sun behind the 
morning glow, — so appeared the personality 
of Jesus of Nazareth to his contemporaries 
in the pre-niessianic age. 

At the moment when the heaven glows with 
intensest colouring the sun itself rises above 
the horizon. But with this the wealth of 
colour begins gradually to diminish. The fan- 
tastic images pale and vanish because the sun 
itself dissolves the clouds upon which they 
are formed. As the rising sun above the 
horizon, — so appeared Jesus Christ to the 
primitive Church in its eschatological expec- 
tation. 

As the sun at midday, — ^so he appears to 
us. We know nothing of morning and even- 
ing glow; we see only the white brilliance 
which pervades all. But the fact that the 
sun now shines for us in such a light does 
not justify us in conceiving the sunrise also 
as if it were a brilliaDt disk of midday bright- 
ness emerging above the horizon. Our mod- 
em view of Jesus' death is true, true in its 
inmost nature, because it reflects his ethical- 
religious personality in the thoughts of our 
time. But when we import this into the his- 

»^9 



THE MYSTERY OP 

tory of Jesus and of primitive Christianity 
we commit the same blunder as were we to 
paint the sunrise without the morning glow. 

In genuine historical knowledge there is 
liberating and helping power. Our faith is 
built upon the personality of Jesus. But be- 
tween our world-view and that in which he 
lived and laboured there lies a deep and seem- 
ingly unbridgeable gulf. Men therefore saw 
themselves obliged to detach as it were his 
personaUty from his world-view and touch it 
up with modem colours. 

This produced a picture of Jesus which was 
strangely lifeless and vague. One got a hy- 
brid figure, half modem, half antique. With 
much else that is modem, men transferred to 
him our modem psychology, without always 
recognising clearly that it is not applicable 
to him and necessarily belittles him. For it 
is derived from mediocre minds which are a 
patchwork of opinions and apprehend and 
observe themselves only in a constant flux of 
development. Jesus, however, is a super- 
human personality moulded in one piece. 

Thus modem theology does violence to his- 
tory and psychology, inasmuch as it cannot 
prove what right we have to segregate Jesus 
from his age, to translate his personality into 
the terms of our modem thought, and to con- 

S60 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

ceive of him as '' Messiah '* and **Son of God" 
outside of the Jewish framework. 

Genuine historical knowledge, however, re- 
stores to theology full freedom of movement I 
It presents to it the personality of Jesus in 
an eschatological world-view, yet one which 
is modem through and through because His 
mighty spirit pervades it. 

This Jesus is far greater than the one con- 
ceived in modem terms : he is really a super- 
human personality. With his death he de- 
stroyed the form of his ** Weltanschauung," 
rendering his own eschatology impossible. 
Thereby he gives to all peoples and to all 
times the right to apprehend him in terms of 
their thoughts and conceptions, in order that 
his spirit may pervade their ** Weltan- 
schauung" as it quickened and transfigured 
the Jewish eschatology. 

Therefore may modem theology, just by 
reason of a genuine historical knowledge, 
claim freedom of movement, without being 
hampered continually by i>etty historical ex- 
pedients which nowadays are often resorted 
to at the expense of historical veracity. 
Theology is not bound to graze in a paddock. 
It is free, for its task is to found our Chris- 
tian view of the world solely upon the per- 
sonality of Jesus Christ, irrespective of the 

£51 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

form in which it expressed itself in his time. 
He himself has destroyed this form with his 
death. History prompts theology to this nn- 
historical step. 

As Jesus gave up the ghost, the Boman cen- 
turion said, * * Truly this man was the Son of 
God'* (Mk 15 8»). Thus at the moment of 
his death the lofty dignity of Jesus was set 
free for expression in all tongues, among all 
nations; and for all philosophies. 



252 



CHAPTER X 

summa:by of thb ufb of jesus 

The **Life of Jesus '* is limited to the last 
months of his existence on earth. At the 
season of the summer seed-sowing he began 
his ministry and ended it upon the cross at 
Easter of the following year. 

His public ministry may be counted in 
weeks. The first period extends from seed 
time to harvest; the second comprises the 
days of his appearance in Jerusalem. Au- 
tumn and winter he spent in heathen terri- 
tory alone with his Disciples. 

Before him the Baptist had appeared and 
had borne emphatic witness to the nearness of 
the Elingdom and the coming of the mighty 
premessiaoic Forerunner, with whose appear- 
ance the pouring out of the Holy Ghost should 
take place. According to Joel, this among 
other miracles was the sign that the Day of 
Judgment was imminent. John himself 
never imagined that he was this Forerunner ; 
nor did such a thought occur to the people, 
for he had not ushered in the age of miracles. 

£53 



THE MYSTERY OF 

He is a prophet, — ^that was the universal opin- 
ion. 

About Jesus ' earlier development we know 
nothing. All lies in the dark. Only this is 
sure : at his baptism the secret of his exist- 
ence was disclosed to him, — ^namely, that he 
was the one whom God had destined to be the 
Messiah. With this revelation he was com- 
plete, and underwent no further develop- 
ment. For now he is assured that, until the 
near coming of the messianic age which was 
to reveal his glorious dignity, he has to labour 
for the Kingdom as the imrecognised and 
hidden Messiah, and must approve and purify 
himself together with his friends in the final 
Affiction. 

The idea of suffering was thus included in 
his messianic consciousness, just as the no- 
tion of the pre-messianic AflBiction was indis- 
solubly connected with the expectation of the 
Kingdom. Earthly events could not in- 
fluence Jesus' course. His secret raised him 
above the world, even though he still walked 
as a man among men. 

His appearing and his proclamation have 
to do only with the near approach of the 
Kingdom. His preaching is that of John, 
only that he confirms it by signs. Although 
his secret controls all his preaching, yet no 

g54 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

one may know of it, for he must remain tin- 
recognised till the new aon dawns. 

Like his secret, so also is his whole ethical 
outlook ruled by the contrast of "Now and 
Then. * ' It is a question of repentance unto 
the Kingdom, and the conquest of the right- 
eousness which renders one fit for it, — for 
only the righteous inherit the Kingdom. This 
righteousness is higher than that of the Law, 
for he knows that the law and the Prophets 
prophesied until John, — ^with the Baptist, 
however, one finds oneself in the ages of the 
Forerunner, immediately before the dawn of 
the Kingdom. 

Therefore, as the future Messiah, he must 
preach and work that higher morality. The 
poor in spirit, the meek, those that endure 
suffering, those that hunger and thirst after 
righteousness, the merciful, the pure in heart, 
the peacemakers, — ^these all are blessed be- 
cause by this mark they are destined for the 
Kingdom. 

Behind this ethical preaching looms the 
secret of the Kingdom of God. That which, 
as performed by the individual, constitutes 
moral renewal in preparation for the King- 
dom, signifies, as accompUshed by the com- 
munity, a fact through which the realisation 
of the Kingdom in a supernatural way will 

265 



THE MYSTERY OF 

be hastened. Thus individual and social 
ethics blend in the great secret. As the plen- 
tiful harvest, by God's wonderful working, 
follows mysteriously upon the sowing, so 
comes also the Kingdom of God, by reason of 
man's moral renewal, but substantially with- 
out his assistance. 

The parable contains also the suggestion 
of a chronological coincidence. Jesus spoke 
at the season of seed-sowing and expected the 
Kingdom at the time of the harvest. Na- 
ture was God's clock. With the last seed- 
sowing he had set it for the last time. 

The secret of the Kingdom of God is the 
transfiguration in celestial light of the ethics 
of the early prophets, according to which also 
the final state of glory will be brought about 
by God only on condition of the moral con- 
version of Israel. In sovereign style Jesus 
effects the synthesis of the apocalyptic of 
Daniel and the ethics of the Prophets. With 
him it is not a question of eschatological 
ethics, rather is nis world view an ethical es- 
chatology. As such it is modem. 

The signs and wonders also come under a 
double point of view. For the people they 
are merely to confirm the preaching of the 
nearness of the Kingdom. Whosoever now 
does not believe that the time is so far ad- 

256 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

vanced, he has no excuse. The signs and 
wonders condemn him, for they plainly at- 
* test that the power of ungodliness is com- 
ing to an end. 

For Jesns, however, there lay behind this 
aflSrmation the secret of the Kingdom of God. 
When the Pharisees wished to ascribe these 
very signs to the power of Satan, he alluded 
to the secret by a parable. By his acts he 
binds the power of ungodliness, as one falls 
upon a strong man and renders him harm- 
less before attempting to rob him of his pos- 
sessions. Wherefore, in sending out his 
Apostles, he gives them, together with the 
charge to preach, authority over unclean 
spirits. They are to deal the last blow. 

A third element in the preaching of the 
Kingdom was the intimation of the pre-mes- 
sianic Affliction. The believers must be pre- 
pared to pass with him through that time of 
trial, in which they are to prove themselves 
the elect of the Kingdom by stedfast resist- 
ance to the last attack of the power of the 
world. This attack will concentrate about his 
person; therefore they must stand by him 
even unto death. Only life in God's Kingdom 
is real life. The Son of Man will judge them 
according as they have stood by him, Jesus, or 
n^^Thus Jesus at the conclusion of the 

267 



THE MYSTERY OP 

Beatitudes turns to his own Disdples with 
the words: ** Blessed are ye when men per- 
secute you for nay sake. * ' The charge to the 
Apostles turns into a consideration of the 
Affliction. The embassage to the Baptist 
about the imminence of the Kingdom con- 
cludes with the word: ** Blessed is he who- 
soever shall not be offended in me.'' At 
Bethsaida, the morning after he had cele- 
brated the Supper by the seashore, he ad- 
jured the multitude to stand by him, even 
when he shall become an object of shame and 
scorn in this sinful world, — ^their blessedness 
depends upon this. 

This Affliction meant not only a probation 
but also an atonement. It is foreordained in 
the messianic drama, because God requires 
of the adherents of the Kingdom a satisfac- 
tion for their transgressions in this aeon. 
But he is almighty. In this omnipotence he 
determines the question of membership in 
the Kingdom and the place each shall occupy 
therein, without himself being bound by any 
determining cause whatsoever. So also in 
view of his omnipotence the necessity of the 
final Affliction is only relative. He can abro- 
gate it. The last three petitions of the 
Lord's Prayer contemplate this possibility. 
After beseeching God that he would send the 

268 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Kingdom, that his name might be blessed elid 
his will be done on earth as it is in heaven, 
men beg him to forgive them the transgres- 
sions and spare them the Temptation, rescti- 
ing them directly from the power of evil. 

This was the content of Jesus' preaching 
dnring the first period. He remained 
throughout this time on the northern shore 
of the lake. Chorazin, Bethsaida, and Ciapeir- 
naum were the principal centres of his ac- 
tivity. From thence he made an excursion 
across the lake to the region of the Ten Citieii 
and a journey to Nazareth. 

Precisely in the towns which were tii6 
scenes of his chief activity he encountered 
unbelief. The curse which he must uttet 
over them is proof of it. The Pharisees, more- 
over, were hostile and sought to discredit 
him with the people, on account of his very 
miracles. In Nazareth he had experience of 
the fact that a prophet is without honour iii 
his own country. 

Thus the Galilean period was anything but 
a fortunate one. Such outward iUsuccesSj 
however, signified nothing for the coming of 
the Kingdom. The unbelieving cities merely 
brought down judgment upon themselves. 
Jesus had other mysterious indications tot 
measuring the approach of the Kingdom. By 

859 



THE MYSTERY OF 

these lie recognised that the time was come. 
For this reason he sent forth the Apostles 
just as they were returning from Nazareth, 
for it was harvest time. 

By means of their preaching and their 
signs the reputation of his mighty person- 
ality spread far and wide. Now begins the 
time of success I John in prison hears of it 
and sends his disciples to ask him if he is ^^he 
that should come,'* for from his miracles he 
concluded that the time of the mighty Fore- 
runner whom he had heralded had arrived. 

Jesus performed signs, his Disciples had 
power over the spirits. When he spoke of 
the Judgment he laid stress upon the fact 
that the Son of Man stood in such solidarity 
with him that he would recognise only such as 
had stood by him, Jesus. The people there- 
fore opined that he might be the one for whom 
all were looking, and the Baptist desired to 
have assurance on this point 

Jesus cannot tell him who he is. "The 
time is far advanced*' — that is the gist of his 
reply. After the departure of the mes- 
sengers Jesus turned to the people and sig- 
nified in mysterious terms that the time is 
indeed much further advanced than the Bap- 
tist dreamed in asking such a question. The 
era of the Forerunner had already begun 

860 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

with the appearance of the Baptist himself. 
From that time on the Kingdom of God is 
with violence compelled to draw near. He 
himself who asks the question is Elijah — ^if 
they could comprehend it. Men were not ahle 
to perceive that the man in prison was Elijah. 
When he hegan his preaching, they knew not 
the time. That was due not alone to the fact 
that John performed no miracles, but to the 
hardening of their hearts. They are unrea- 
sonable children that do not know what they 
want. Now there is one here who performs 
signs, — ^but even on his testimony they do not 
believe the nearness of the Kingdom. So the 
curse upon Chorazin and Bethsaida concludes 
the ' * eulogy upon the Baptist. * ' 

The sending of the Twelve was the last 
effort for bringing about the Kingdom. As 
they then returned, announced to him their 
success, and reported that they had power 
over the evil spirits, it signified to him, all 
is ready. So now he expects the dawn of 
the Kingdom in the most immediate future, — 
it had seemed to him, indeed, already doubt- 
ful whether the Twelve would return before 
this event. He had even said to them that 
the appearing of the Son of Man would over- 
take them before they had gone through the 
cities of Israel. 

261 



THE MYSTERY OF 

His work is done. Now he requires to 
collect himself and to be alone with his Disci- 
ples. They enter a boat and sail along the 
coast towards the north. But the multittide 
which had gathered about him at the preach- 
ing of the Disciples, in order to await the 
Kingdom with him, now follow after them 
along the shore and surprise them at their 
landing upon a lonely beach. 

As it was evening the Disciples desired 
that he would send the people away to find 
food in the neighbouring hamlets. For him, 
however, the hour is too solemn to be pro- 
faned by an earthly meal. Before send- 
ing them away he bids them sit down and 
celebrates with them an anticipation of the 
messianic feast. To the community that was 
gathered about him to await the Kingdom, 
he, the Messiah to be, distributes hallowed 
food, mysteriously consecrating them there- 
by to be partakers of the heavenly banquet. 
As they did not know his secret, they under- 
stood as little as did his Disciples the signifi- 
cance of his act. They comprehended only 
that it meant something wonderfully solemn, 
and they questioned within themselves about 
it. 

Thereupon he sent them away. He or- 
dered the Disciples to skirt the coast to Beth- 

»6» 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

saida. For his part lie betook himself to the 
mountain to pray and then followed along the 
shore on foot As his figure appeared to 
them in the obscurity of the night they be- 
lieved — ^under the impression of the Supper 
where he stood before them in mysterious 
majesty — ^that his supernatural apparition 
approached them over the turbulent waves 
through which they were toiling to the shore. 

The morning after the Supper by the sea- 
shore he collected the people and the Disci- 
ples about him at Bethsaida and warned them 
to stand by him and not to deny him in the 
humiliation. 

Six days later he goes with the Three to 
the mountain where he had prayed alone. 
There he is revealed to them as the Messiah. 
On the way home he forbade them to say any- 
thing about it until at the Eesurrection he 
should be revealed in the glory of the Son of 
Man. They, however, still remark the failure 
of Elijah to appear, who yet must come be- 
fore the Eesurrection of the dead can take 
place. They were not present at the eulogy 
over the Baptist to hear the mysterious inti- 
DMition he let fall. He must therefore make it 
clear to them now that the beheaded prisoner 
was Elijah. They should take no offence at 
his fate, for it was so ordained. He also who 

263 



THE MYSTERY OF 

is to be Son of Man must suffer many things 
and be set at naught. So the Scripture will 
have it. 

The Kingdom which Jesus expected so very 
soon failed to make its appearance. This 
first eschatological delay and postponement 
was momentous for the fate of the Gospel tra- 
dition, inasmuch as now all the events related 
to the mission of the Twelve became unin- 
telligible, because all consciousness was lost of 
the fact that the most intense eschatological 
expectation then inspired Jesus and his fol- 
lowing. Hence it is that precisely this period 
is confused and obscure in the accounts, and 
all the more so because several incidents re- 
mained enigmatical to those even who had a 
part in the experience. Thus the sacramen- 
tal Supper by the seashore became in the tra- 
dition a ** miraculous feeding,'* in a sense to- 
tally different from that which Jesus had in 
mind. 

Therewith, too, the motives of Jesus' dis- 
appearance became unintelligible. It seems 
to be a case of flight, while on the other hand 
the accounts give no hint how matters had 
come to such a pass. The key to the histori- 
cal understanding of the life of Jesus lies in 
the perception of the two corresponding 
points at which the eschatological expecta- 

264 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

tion culminated. During the days at Jeru- 
salem there was a return of the enthusiasm 
which had already showed itself in the days at 
Bethsaida. Without this assumption we are 
left with a yawning gap in the Gospel tradi- 
tion between the mission of the Twelve and 
the journey to Jerusalem. Historians find 
themselves compelled to invent a period of 
Galilean defeat in order to establish, some 
connection between the recorded facts, — ^as 
if a section were missing in our Gospels. 
That is the weak point of all the '^ lives of 
Jesus J* 

By his retreat into the region of the Gene- 
sareth Jesus withdrew himself from the 
Pharisees and the people in order to be alone 
with his Disciples, as he had in vain tried to 
do since their return from their mission. 
He urgently needed such a retreat, for he 
had to come to an understanding about two 
messianic facts. 

Why is the Baptist executed by the secular 
authority before the messianic time has 
dawned? 

Why does the Kingdom fail to appear not- 
withstanding that the tokens of its dawning 
are present? 

The secret is made known to him through 
the Scripture: God brings the Eangdom 

266 



THE MYSTERY OP 

about without the general 'Affliction. He 
whom God has destined to reign in glory ac- 
complishes it upon himself by being tried 
as a malefactor and condenmed. Where- 
fore the others go free : he makes the atone- 
ment for them. What though they believe 
that God punishes him, though they became 
offended in him who preached unto them 
righteousness, — when after his Passion the 
glory dawns, then shall they see that he has 
suffered for them. 

Thus Jesus read in the Prophet Isaiah 
what God had determined for him, the Elect. 
The end of the Baptist showed him in what 
form he was destined to suffer this condem- 
nation: he must be put to death by the sec- 
ular authority as a malefactor in the sight of 
all the people. Therefore he must make his 
way up to Jerusalem for the season when all 
Israel is gathered there. 

As soon therefore as the time came for 
the Passover pilgrimage he set out with his 
Disciples. Before they left the north coun- 
try he asked them whom the people took him 
to be. For reply they could only say that 
he was taken for Elijah. But Peter, mindful 
of the revelation on the mountain near Beth- 
saida, said: Thou art the Son of God. 
Whereupon Jesus informed them of his se- 

^66 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

cret. Yes, fie it is who shall be revealed as 
Son of Man at the Eesurrection* But before 
that, it is decreed that he must be delivered 
to the high priests and elders to be con- 
demned and put to death. God so wills it 
For this cause they are going up to Jerusa- 
lem. 

Peter resents this new disclosure, for in 
the revelation on the mountain there was 
nothing said to such an effect. He takes 
Jesus apart and appeals to him energetically. 
Whereupon he is sharply rebuked as one who 
gives ear to human considerations when God 
speaks. 

This journey to Jerusalem was the funeral 
march to victory. Within the secret of the 
Passion lay concealed the secret of the King- 
dom. They marched after him, and knew 
only that when all this was accomplished he 
would be Messiah. They were sorrowful 
foipiprhat must come to pass; they did not 
i^lterstand why it must be so, and they durst 
ot ask him. But above all, their thoughts 
e occupied about the conditions that 
'^^f^aited them in the approaching Kingdom. 
When once he was Messiah, what would they 
then be? That occupied their minds, and 
about it they talked with one another. But 
he reproved them and explained why he must 

267 




THE MYSTERY OF 

(Buffer. Only throngli humiliation and the 
meek sacrifice of service is one prepared to 
reign in the Kingdom of God. Therefore 
must he, who shall exercise supreme author- 
ity as Son of Man, make now an atonement 
for many by giving up his life in meek sacri- 
fice. 

With the arrival upon the Jewish terri- 
tory begins the second period of Jesus* pub- 
lic ministry. He is again surrounded by the 
people. In Jericho a multitude gathers to see 
him pass through. By the healing of a blind 
beggar^ the son of Timaeus, the people are 
convinced that he is the great Forerunner, 
just as they thought already in Galilee. The 
jubilant multitudes prepare for him a festal 
entry into Jerusalem. As the one who ac- 
cording to prophecy precedes the Messiah 
they acclaim him with Hosanna. Hoscmna 
in the highest, however, is their acclaim of 
the Kingdom about to appear. Therewitii 
the same situation is reached again as in the 
great days near Bethsaida : Jesus is thronged 
by the multitudes expectant of the Kingdom. 

The instruction contained in the parables 
which were uttered at Jerusalem has to do 
with the nearness of the Kingdom. They 
are cries of warning, with a note of menace 
as well for those that harden their hearts 

368 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

against the message. What agitates men's 
minds is nat the question. Is he the Mes- 
siah, or nof bnt. Is the Kingdom so near as 
he says, or no? 

The Pharisees and Scribes knew not what 
hour had struck. They showed a complete 
lack of sensibility for the nearness of the 
Kingdom, for else they could not have pro- 
pounded to him questions which in view of 
the advanced hour had lost all significance. 
What difference does it make now about the 
Soman tribute? What do the farfetched 
Sadduceean arguments amount to against the 
possibility of the resurrection of the dead? 
Soon, with the advent of the Kingdom, all 
earthly rule is done away, as well as the 
earthly human nature itself. 

If only they understood the signs of the 
times I He proposes to them two questions, 
which should cause them to ponder and hence 
take note that the time they live in is preg- 
nant with a great secret which is not dreamed 
of in the learning of the Scribes. 

By what authority did the Baptist act? 
If they but knew that he was the Forerunner, 
as Jesus had mysteriously suggested to the 
people, then they must know too that the 
hour of the Kingdom had struck. 

How is the Messiah at one time David^s 

269 



,-. -:S 



THE MYSTERY OP 

Son — that is, subordinate to him; at an- 
other, David^s Lord — that is, his superior? 
If they could explain that, then would they 
understand also how he who now labours 
lowly and unknown in behalf of God^s King- 
dom shall be revealed as Lord and Christ. 

But as it is they do not even suspect that 
the messianic indications harbour secrets. 
With all their learning they are blind leaders 
of the blind, who, instead of making the peo- 
ple receptive for the Kingdom, harden their 
hearts, and instead of drawing out from the 
Law the higher morality which renders men 
meet for the Kingdom, labour against it with 
their petty outward precepts and draw the 
people after them to i)erdition. Hence : Woe 
to the Pharisees and scribes! 

True, even among them are such as have 
kept an open eye. The scribe who put to 
him the question about the great command- 
ment and welcomed his reply is commended 
as ** having understanding*' and therefore 
**not far from the Kingdom of God,*' — ^for 
he shall belong to it when it appears. 

But the mass of the Pharisees and scribes 
imderstand him so little that they decree 
his dearth. They had no effective charge to 
bring against Ms behaviour. A disrespect- 
ful word about the Temple — ^that was alL 

870 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

Then Judas betrayed to them the secret. 
Now he was condemned. 

In the neighbourhood of death Jesus draws 
himself up to the same triumphant stature 
as in the days by the seaside, — ^for with 
death comes the Kingdom. On that occasion 
he had celebrated with the believers a mystic 
feast as an anticipation of the messianic 
banquet; so now he rises at the end of the 
last earthly supper and distributes to the 
Disciples hallowed food and drink, intimat- 
ing to them with a solemn voice that this is 
the last earthly meal, for they are soon to 
be united at the banquet in the Father's 
Kingdom. Two corresponding parables sug- 
gest the secret of the Passion. For him, the 
bread and wine which he hands them at the 
Supper are his body and his blood, for by 
the sacrifice of himself unto death he ushers 
in the messianic feast. The Barabolic say- 
ing remained obscure to the Disciples. It 
was also not intended for them, its purpose 
was not to explain anything to them, — for it 
was an enigmonparahle. 

Now, as the great hour approaches, he seeks 
again, as after the Supper by the seashore, 
a lonely spot where he may pray. He bears 
the AflBiction for others. Therefore he can 
say to the Disciples beforehand that in the 

271 



-^ 



THE MYSTERY OF 

night they shall all be offended in him — 
and he does not need to condemn them, for 
the Scripture had so determined it. What 
endless peace lies in this word! Indeed, he 
comforts them: after the Eesnrrection he 
will gather them about him and go before 
them in messianic glory unto Galilee, re- 
tracing the s£une road along which they had 
followed him on his way to death. 

It still remained, however, within the scope 
of God^s omnipotence to eliminate the Af- 
fliction for him also. Wherefore, as once he 
prayed with the believers, **And lead us not 
into the Temptation,*' so now he prays for 
himself, that God may permit the cup of suf- 
fering to pass his lips by. True, if it be 
God's will, he feels himself strong enough to 
drink it. He is sorrowful rather for the 
Three. The sons of Zebedee, to gain the 
seats upon the throne, have boasted that they 
can drink with him the cup of suffering and 
receive with him the baptism of suffering. 
Peter swore that he would stand by him even 
if he must die with him. He knows not what 
God has ordained for them, — ^whether he will 
lay upon them what they desire to under- 
take. Therefore he bids them remain near 
him. And while he prays God for himself he 
thinks of them and twice wakes them up, bid- 

872 



THE KINGDOM OF GOD 

ding them remain awake and beseech God 
that he may not lead them through the Temp- 
tation. 

The third time he comes to them the be- 
trayer with his band is near. The hour is 
come, — ^therefore he draws himself up to the 
full stature of his majesty. He is alone, his 
Disciples flee. 

The hearing of witnesses is merely a pre- 
tence. After they have gone the High Priest 
puts directly the question about the mes_siah- 
ship. *'I am,*' said Jesus, referring them at 
the same time to the hour when he shall ap- 
pear as Son of Man on the clouds of heaven 
surrounded by the angels. Therefore he was 
found guilty of blasphemy and condemned 
to death. 

On the afternoon of the fourteenth of Ni- 
san, as they ate the Paschal lamb at even, he 
uttered a loud cry and died. 



278 



POSTSCRIPT 

The judgments passed npon this realistic ac- 
count of the life of Jesus may be very di- 
verse^ according to the dogmatic, historical, 
or literary point of view of the critics. Only, 
with the aim of the book may they not find 
fault: to depict the figure of Jesus in its 
overwhelming heroic greatness and to imr- 
press it upon the modern age and upon the 
modern theology. 

The heroic recedes from our modern 
** Weltanschauung," our Christianity, and 
our conception of the person of Jesus. 
Wherefore men have humanised and hum- 
bled him. Benan has stripped off his halo 
and reduced him to a sentimental figure, cow- 
ard spirits like Schopenhauer have dared to 
appeal to him for their enervating philos- 
ophy, and our generation has modernised 
him, with the notion that it could compre- 
hend his character and development psycho- 
logically. 

We must go back to the point where we 
can feel again the heroic in Jesus. Before 
that mysterious Person, who, in the form 
of his time, knew that he was creating 

«74 



POSTSCRIPT 

upon the foundation of his life and deatli a 
moral world which bears his name, we must 
be forced to lay our faces in the diist, without 
daring even to wish to understand his na- 
ture. Only then can the heroic in our Chris- 
tianity and in our **. Weltanschauung'' be 
again revived. 



275 



ft*- 



H^T 



